<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR891031-0009 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.10-31-89.f2.A1008</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 209 / Tuesday, October 31, 1989/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF LABOR  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Occupational Safety and Health Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">29 CFR Part 1926 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. S-204] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 1218-AA36 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Occupational Safety and Health Standards_Excavations  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA)hereby amends its Construction Standards for Excavations, 29 CFR part 1926,subpart P. The existing standards regulate the use of support systems, sloping andbenching systems and other systems of protection as means of protectionagainst excavation cave-ins. In addition, the standards regulate the meansof access to and egress from excavations, and employee exposure to vehiculartraffic, falling loads, hazardous atmospheres, water accumulation, andunstable structures in and adjacent to excavations. The revised standard uses performance criteria where possible, rather thanspecification requirements; consolidates and simplifies many of the existingprovisions; adds and clarifies definitions; reformats the standard to eliminateduplicate provisions and ambiguous language; provides a consistent methodof soil classification; and gives employers added flexibility in providingprotection for employees. This Final Rule is being issued after appropriateconsultation with the Advisory Committee on Construction Safety and Health(ACCSH). OSHA initiated this rulemaking action to establish clearly the requirementsfor protection of employees in excavations. The intended effect of thisregulation is to increase safety for these workers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>January 2, 1990.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>In compliance with 28 U.S.C. 2112(a), the Agency designatesfor receipt of petitions for review of the standard, the Associate Solicitorfor Occupational Safety and Health, Office of the Solicitor, Room S-4004,U.S. Department of Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue NW., Washington, DC 20210.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Mr. James Foster, Director, Officeof Information and Consumer Affairs, Occupational Safety and Health Administration,U.S. Department of Labor, Room N-3637, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington,DC 20210, (202) 523-8151.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>A. History Congress amended the Contract Work Hours Standards Act (CWHSA) (40 U.S.C.327 et seq.) in 1969 by adding a new section 107 (40 U.S.C. 333) to provideemployees in the construction industry with a safer work environment andto reduce the frequency and severity of construction accidents and injuries.The amendment, commonly known as the Construction Safety Act (CSA) (Pub.L. 91-54; August 9, 1969), significantly strengthened employee protectionby providing for occupational safety and health standards for employeesof the building trades and construction industry in Federal and federally-financedor federally-assisted construction projects. Accordingly, the Secretary of Labor issued Safety and Health Regulationsfor Construction in 29 CFR part 1518 (36 FR 7340, April 17, 1971) pursuantto section 107 of the Contract Work Hours and Safety Standards Act. Includedin these regulations were the existing safety standards for trenches andexcavations. The Occupational Safety and Health Act (the Act) (84 Stat. 1580; 29 U.S.C.650 et seq.) was enacted by Congress in 1970, and authorized the Secretaryof Labor to adopt established Federal Standards issued under other statutes,including the Construction Safety Act, as occupational safety and healthstandards. Accordingly, the Secretary of Labor adopted the ConstructionStandards in 29 CFR part 1518 as established Federal Standards in accordancewith section 6(a) of the Act (36 FR 10466, May 29, 1971). Part 1518 wasredesignated as part 1926 later in 1971 (36 FR 25232, December 30, 1971).The standards in existing subpart P of part 1926, titled andSection; 1926.650_GeneralProtection Requirements; andSection; 1926.651_Specific Excavation Requirements;andSection; 1926.652_Specific Trenching Requirements; and andSection; 1926.653_DefinitionsApplicable to this subpart, were adopted as OSHA standards as part of thisprocess. The need for review and revision of andSection;andSection; 1926.650 through1926.653 has been recognized by OSHA since the earliest days of the Agency'sexistence. Consequently, after a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (36 FR 19083,September 28, 1971) and after a review by the Advisory Committee on ConstructionSafety and Health (ACCSH), several amendments of a technical nature weremade to subpart P (37 FR 3512, February 17, 1972). Subsequent to the adoptionof those amendments, OSHA found it necessary to further amend the standard.After a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (37 FR 15317, July 29, 1972) andSection;1926.652 was amended to require ladders as a means of access and egressin trenches greater than four feet (1.2 m) in depth_instead of three feet(.9 m) in depth (37 FR 24345, November 16, 1972). In 1976, OSHA, in response to continued complaints concerning the adequacyof the standards in subpart P, engaged the National Bureau of Standards(NBS) to study the compatibility of the technical provisions in the regulationswith actual construction practice. In addition, NBS was to examine thestate of the knowledge in geotechnical and structural engineering; to reviewthe field experience accumulated since the promulgation of the standards;and to recommend potential modifications that could improve the effectivenessof the standards. Findings and preliminary recommendations of the NBS studies were presentedand discussed at a federally-sponsored workshop in September 1978. Sixreports were then completed as a result of NBS' work, and these were publishedin 1979 and 1980. Copies of these reports are part of the public record(Exs. 2-1 through 2-6). As a result of the development of these recommended changes, private industryproposed and sponsored a series of five workshops in the spring and summerof 1981 to discuss and comment on ways to implement the NBS recommendations.An unpublished text was used at these workshops (Ex. 2-7). Final recommendationsfor technical changes to the standards incorporating the comments fromthe industry-sponsored workshops were prepared by NBS in May 1983 (Ex.2-26).Excavation-related accidents resulting in injuries and fatalities havecontinued to occur at construction sites despite the development and promulgationof the OSHA Construction Standards in 1971 and 1972. Based on a carefulreview of compliance problems and public comments received since 1972,OSHA believed that the present standard needed updating. Therefore, theAgency developed a proposed revision to the existing standard. A draft of the proposed changes to the standard was reviewed by ACCSH inOctober 1982. Transcripts of this meeting are part of the public record(Ex. 2-8). The Committee's comments and recommendations, and those of otherinterested parties, were carefully analyzed in connection with the proposedrulemaking. Many of the changes in the proposed standard reflected therecommendations and suggestions of these participants. Relevant ACCSH commentsare discussed below in section III_``Summary and Explanation of the FinalRule.'' Committee discussions that were inconclusive have been considered,but are not discussed in this preamble. Several suggestions for changesto the draft standard were made by members of the ACCSH. OSHA sought morediscussion on these suggestions and, therefore, raised individual pointsas issues in the preamble of the proposal. On April 15, 1987, OSHA issued a notice of proposed rulemaking (NPRM) onexcavations (52 FR 12288). The NPRM established a sixty day period, whichended June 15, 1987, for submission of written comments. Several commentersrequested an extension of the written comment period. Therefore, on June16, 1987 (52 FR 22799), the Agency extended the written comment perioduntil October 14, 1987.  On August 5, 1987, OSHA consulted with the ACCSH for a second time, regardingthe issues raised in the NPRM. In addition to making recommendations regardingthese issues, the ACCSH suggested changes to the proposed regulations.The transcript of this meeting is part of the record of this rulemaking(Ex. 4-119). During the extended comment period, OSHA received requests for an informalpublic hearing. On February 23, 1988, OSHA announced it would convene aninformal public hearing on April 19, 1988, and extended the period forsubmitting testimony, documentary evidence, and additional comments untilApril 1, 1988 (53 FR 5280). The hearing was held on April 19, 1988, withAdministrative Law Judge Michael Schoenfeld presiding. At the close ofthe hearing, Judge Schoenfeld set a period, ending May 20, 1988, for thesubmission of additional data, and a period ending June 20, 1988, for thesubmission of briefs and arguments. At the request of one participant at the public hearing, Judge Schoenfeldextend the comment period until June 24, 1988, for the submission of additionaldata and until July 29, 1988, for the submission of additional views andarguments (Ex. 31).  On December 15, 1988 Judge Schoenfeld certified the hearing transcriptand related submissions, closing the record for this proceeding. OSHA received over 150 comments in response to its NPRM and hearing notice.A wide range of employers, businesses, labor unions, trade associations,state governments and other interested parties contributed to the developmentof this record. OSHA appreciates the efforts interested parties have madeto help develop a rulemaking record which would provide a sound basis forthe promulgation of a Final Rule. B. Problems with the Existing Standards OSHA's efforts to revise its excavation and trenching standards were initiatedprimarily because the Agency has experienced difficulty in enforcing theexisting standards. Several of these problems are discussed in detail below.<ITAG tagnum="81">(1) ``Specific Excavation''/``Specific Trenching Requirements'' </ITAG>The first major problem with the existing standards is that because andSection;andSection;1926.651 and 1926.652 are two separate sections, one entitled ``SpecificExcavation Requirements'' and the other ``Specific Trenching Requirements,''the standards are not clear as to whether the excavation requirements mustalso be followed when digging trenches. It was intended by OSHA that manyof the excavation standards would also apply to trenches since a trenchis a type of excavation, but that intention is not clearly stated. The Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission (OSHRC), and two UnitedStates Court of Appeals, have sanctioned the application of the excavationstandards in andSection; 1926.651 to trenches (Dobson Brothers ConstructionCompany, 3 BNA OSHC 2035 (R.C. 1976); <T3>Texas Eastern Products Pipeline Co. </T3>v. <T3>OSHRC,</T3> 827 F. 2d 46 (7th Cir. 1987); and <T3>D. Federico Company, Inc. </T3>v. <T3>OSHRC and Usery,</T3> 558 F. 2d 614 (1st Cir. 1977) 5 BNA OSHC 1528,respectively). However, other Courts of Appeals have held, to the contrary,that excavation standards cannot be applied to trenches (<T3>Lloyd C. Lockrem, Inc. </T3>v. <T3>OSHRC,</T3> 609 F. 2d 940 (9th Cir 1979) 8 BNA OSHC 1316; <T3>Kent Nowlin Construction Co. </T3>v. <T3>OSHRC, </T3>593 F. 2d 368 (10th Cir. 1979)). This Final Rule resolves the uncertainty left by these decisions and bythe ambiguous language of the existing standards by establishing one setof requirements which are applicable to all excavations, including trenches.Where there are requirements intended to be applicable only to trenches_suchas the requirement that ladders or equivalent means of egress be providedevery 25 feet horizontally_the Final Rule makes it clear that the requirementapplies only to those excavations which are also trenches (see andSection;1926.651(c)(2)). <ITAG tagnum="81">(2) Excavations (Non-Trench) </ITAG>A second major problem with the existing standards involves the requirementsfor protecting employees in non-trench excavations from the hazards ofcave-ins. Existing andSection; 1926.651(c) currently requires that ``Thewalls and  faces of all excavations in which employees are exposed to dangerfrom moving ground shall be guarded by a shoring system, sloping of theground, or some other equivalent means.'' The term ``danger from movingground'' is not defined in the standard and, thus, the standard does notspecify when an employer must take precautions to protect employees froma cave-in. Furthermore, the standard does not specify what degree of precautionan employer must take even when employees are exposed to a ``danger frommoving ground.'' Requirements contained in existing andSection; 1926.651(e),  (f), (g), and (h), discuss employee protection again, however, onlyin very general terms.The language was resolved somewhat when the OSHRC, in agreement with theSecretary of Labor, interpreted the standard to require shoring or slopingin accordance with Table P-1 of subpart P, whenever employees are exposedto unstable soil in excavation sides (M.J. Lee Construction  Company, 7BNA OSHC 1140 ((R.C. 1979)); Terra Motus Company,  Inc., 5 BNA OSHC 1696((R.C. 1977)); D. Federico Company,  Inc., 3 BNA OSHC 1970 ((R.C. 1976))affirmed on other  grounds 558 F. 2d 614 ((1st Cir. 1977)) 5 BNA OSHC 1528). However, this problem was revived by two OSHRC decisions  which are inconsistentwith the cases mentioned above. In  the first case, Seaward ConstructionCompany, Inc., 5 BNA  OSHC 1422 ((R.C. 1977)), the OSHRC interpreted andSection;1926.651(c)  to require sloping and shoring only if OSHA  establishes thatthe ground to which employees are exposed  is actually moving. In the secondcase, Pipe-Rite Utilities  Ltd., Inc., 10 BNA OSHC 1289 ((R.C. 1982)),the OSHRC,  relying on Seaward vacated a citation and did not address the other cases interpreting existing andSection; 1926.651(c). These decisionsreestablished the uncertainty as to when and to what degree an employermust slope, shore or otherwise protect employees in a non-trench excavation.OSHA has long maintained that employees exposed to potential cave-ins mustbe protected by shoring or sloping long before the excavation face is inimminent danger of collapse. Another problem with the existing standards for non-trench excavations(andSection; 1926.651) is that the degree of protection required is not alwayseasily determined. With regard to sloping, the existing andSection; 1926.651(g)provides that ``All slopes shall be excavated to at least the angle ofrepose except for areas where solid rock allows for line drilling or presplitting.''To find the angle of repose an employer must consult Table P-1, which appearsat the end of andSection; 1926.652, ``Specific Trenching Requirements.''Table P-1 is titled ``Approximate Angle of Repose for Sloping of Sidesof Excavations.'' The difficulty with table P-1 is that it describes theapproximate angle of repose for various soil types in terms that are notthe same as terms commonly used in the industry to classify soils. In addition,the terms are not defined in the standard. Thus, it is sometimes very difficultto determine what OSHA considers to be the appropriate degree of slopingfrom this table. OSHA recognizes a problem with the term ``angle of repose.'' The term isused in the standard in a manner which is inconsistent with its meaningin the civil engineering profession. In the American Society for Testingand Materials (ASTM) Standard D653-67, ``Standard Definitions of Termsand Symbols Relating to Soil and Rock Mechanics,'' the term ``angle ofrepose'' is defined as follows: ``The angle between the horizontal andmaximum slope that a soil assumes through natural processes. For dry granularsoils the effect of height is negligible; for cohesive soils the effectof height is so great that the angle of repose is meaningless.'' Thus,to talk in terms of a single ``angle of repose'' is technically inaccurate.The ``angle of repose'' for cohesive soil depends on the depth of the excavation,whereas the ``angle of repose'' for granular soil depends largely on itsdensity and changes in environmental conditions of exposure, such as thedrying process. This Final Rule resolves the uncertainty created by the ambiguous languageof the existing standard by establishing requirements for the sloping ofall excavations that convey clearly when precautions must be taken to protectemployees and the degree of protection that is necessary. The Final Ruleuses terms that are consistent with both the civil engineering professionand the construction industry. <ITAG tagnum="81">(3) Need for Clarification of Trench Requirements . </ITAG>OSHA learned from its enforcement experience with andSection; 1926.652, ``SpecificTrenching Requirements'' that much needed to be done to clarify the meaningand intent of these standards. The key provisions of the current specific trenching standards are andSection;1926.652(b) (for trenches in soft or unstable material) and andSection; 1926.652(c)(for trenches in hard or compact soil). The main difficulty with existingandSection; 1926.652 (b) and (c) is that the terms ``soft or unstable'' soiland ``hard or compact'' soil do not, in some instances, provide sufficientguidance to employers as to the requirements applicable to digging a trench.The OSHRC has held that any trench requiring a slope less steep than 63degrees from the horizontal under table P-1 must be considered to be insoft or unstable soil, within the meaning of andSection; 1926.652(b). TheOSHRC has ruled:<ITAG tagnum="21">Since andSection; 1926.652(c) requires a slope of not steeper than \1/2\to 1 for hard or compact soil, it is evident that these materials listedin Table P-1 as having a less steep angle of repose must be consideredsoft or unstable, and are therefore regulated by andSection; 1926.652(b).(<T3>Connecticut Natural Gas Corporation, </T3>6 BNA OSHC 1796, (R.C. 1978)).</ITAG>Although the OSHRC ruling harmonized the existing regulations, OSHA prefersemployers to know which requirements they are subject to before determiningthe extent to which they must slope, rather than determining the slopefirst and then determining the regulation with which they must comply.In some instances, this determination is not a difficult problem underthe current standard. For example, for many granular soils, an employeris not going to have a problem determining that a slope of \1/2\ to 1 (approximately63 degrees from the horizontal) is inadequate, and that andSection; 1926.652(b)applies to the trenches excavated in such soil. Indeed, the OSHRC has ruledthat there is a rebuttable presumption that predominately sandy soils,unless cemented, are soft or unstable within the meaning of 1926.652(b).(Duane Meyer d/b/a D.T. Construction Company, 7 BNA OSHC 1560 ((R.C. 1979)).However, there are situations in which under the existing standard it isnot easily determined which sloping angle applies. For example, if a trenchis excavated in previously disturbed cohesive soil, the existing standardgives little guidance as to which standard applies or what constitutesan adequate slope under table P-1. And, since the sloping requirementsof andSection; 1926.652 are contained in table P-1, the shortcomings of thattable (previously discussed above under non-trench excavations) are alsoa problem with the existing standards regulating trenches. In additionto the technical misuse of the term ``angle of repose,'' the table classifiessoils in a manner that is difficult to relate to the soil descriptionsused in andSection; 1926.652(b) and (c), and the terms used are not the sameas terms generally used in the construction industry. The Final Rule rectifies these problems in two ways. First, it providesemployers with a soil classification system in appendix A which describesthe variables in soil composition an employer can encounter; and secondly,it sets forth sloping and shoring requirements in accordance with the typesof soil, as determined with respect to the soil classification system.In OSHA's opinion, the soil classification system in appendix A will makeit much easier for employers to determine whether their slopes comply withOSHA's requirements.Paragraph 1926.652(c) has caused compliance problems in one other importantrespect. The standard requires sloping of at least \1/2\ to 1 (horizontalto vertical), but requires only that sloping begin five feet (1.52 m) fromthe bottom of the trench. This standard has been interpreted as permittinga trench dug in hard or compact soil to be vertical for the first fivefeet (1.52 m) from the bottom, and sloped not more than 63 degrees fromthe horizontal beginning at the five feet (1.52 m) level (Horowitz Brothers,Inc., 3 BNA OSHC 1131 ((R.C. 1975)). OSHA believes that this interpretationis inadequate because it is, in most instances, dangerous to allow employeesto work in a trench excavated in soils in which the sides are verticalfor the bottom five feet (1.52 m) portion and then sloped starting at thefive foot level. This is particularly true in a relatively deep trenchin which the weight of cohesive soils adversely affects the stability ofthe trench side. OSHA has always interpreted and enforced this provisionto require shoring or a trench shield in the unsloped, vertical sided portionof the trench. The proposed standard required that trenches and excavations be slopedor benched from the bottom instead of from the five foot (1.52 m) level,unless a qualified person or qualified engineer designs an alternate configuration.Acceptable configurations for sloped excavations were illustrated in FigureB-1 of appendix B of the proposal. OSHA still believes that sound engineering principles dictate that a fivefoot deep vertical-sided portion should be shored in most instances. TheAgency notes that the National Bureau of Standards depicts a similar situationin Figure A-2 (Ex. 2-3), but recommends only a three foot maximum vertical-sidedportion and a slope of not more than 1 horizontal: 1 vertical (45anddegrees;).Additionally, Figure A-7 depicts another similar situation where the depthof the vertical-sided portion is approximately four feet deep, shored,and the slope is 1 horizontal : 1 vertical (45anddegrees;). OSHA solicitedcomment on the appropriateness, and costs and benefits of the configurationsdiscussed above with special emphasis on the OSHA interpretation. The Final Rule addresses this situation by allowing employees to use trenchconfigurations with a vertical portion in the bottom of the trench in accordancewith the limitations that have been successfully used in the State of California,or with the approval of a registered professional engineer. <ITAG tagnum="81">(4) Trench Boxes and Shields </ITAG>The requirements for trench boxes and shields are contained in existingandSection; 1926.652(k). The requirements are not clear as to their intentwith regard to the design of shields. For example, the standard requiresthat such devices ``shall be designed, constructed, and maintained in amanner which will provide protection equal to or greater than the sheetingor shoring required for the trench.'' In addition, the standard definesa trench shield as ``A <T3>shoring system </T3>(emphasis added) composed of steel plates and bracing* * * which support the walls of a trench * * *.'' Shields may be constructedof steel, but need not be, and they may provide support to the side ofa trench. However, shields are more often used in a manner where they donot support the side of a trench but rather act as a barrier in the eventa cave-in occurs. Because of the restrictive nature of the existing definition,and since the design of sheeting and shoring is tied to the requirementsfor timber shoring and sheeting set forth in Table P-2 ``Trench Shoring_MinimumRequirements,'' some observers have perceived a lack of flexibility onthe part of OSHA regarding the design of trench shields. Another problem with the existing requirements for trench shields is thelack of coverage addressing hazardous situations that arise out of theuse of shields. Shields are used differently than shoring, and situationscan arise when using shields that do not arise when using shoring.    Forexample, shields are moved into position by sliding them along the trenchbottom or by lowering them into position. Employees who are within theconfines of a shield being repositioned by other than horizontal movementare subject to being injured if the shield suddenly shifts in an unintendedway_a hazard not generally arising when timber shoring is used. The requirements for trench boxes and shields in existing andSection; 1926.652(k)were changed in the proposal to allow employers more flexibility in thedesign of trench shields. The Final Rule also clarifies the way in whichan employer must assure that shields provide equivalent protection to slopingor shoring required by the standard. It allows an employer to use a trenchbox or shield that is either designed or approved by a registered professionalengineer or that is based upon tabulated data prepared or approved by aregistered professional engineer. For manufactured rather than job-made trench boxes or shields, the revisedstandard requires that employers comply with all manufacturer's warningsand instructions which might affect the safety of employees. Because ofconcerns with product liability, the manufacturers typically include instructionalmaterials that establish a method or methods which the manufacturer hasdetermined will provide for safe installation and use of a product. Theemployer is on notice of the precautions set forth in these materials,and is responsible for implementing them. Additionally, requirements wereadded that address the hazardous situations that arise during the courseof using a shield, but are not addressed in the existing standard. In OSHA'sopinion, these requirements will assure that shield systems will adequatelyprotect employees. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. The Nature of Excavation Accidents </ITAG>Accidents and Injuries Studies show that excavation work is one of the most hazardous types ofwork done in the construction industry (Ex. 2-9 and Ex. 2-10). Accidentsin excavation work occur more frequently than do accidents in constructionin general. The primary type of accident of concern in excavation-relatedwork is a cave-in. The actual number of cave-in accidents is not largewhen compared to the total number of accidents occurring in all of construction.However, those that do occur tend to be of a very serious nature. Cave-inaccidents are much more likely to be fatal to the employees involved thanother construction-related accidents. The true extent of excavation-related injuries and deaths cannot be readilydetermined from available accident data such as those maintained by theBureau of Labor Statistics (BLS). This is because a large number of cave-inaccidents are classified under a general ``accident-type'' heading thatdoes not specifically identify whether the accident involved a cave-in.For example, cave-in accidents are most likely to be recorded under the``accident-type'' categories of ``caught in, under, or between'' or ``asphyxiation,''which encompass many accidents that are not excavation-related, such asthose in which an employee becomes caught in the moving parts of machinery.There is no apparent way to separate out those accidents that are cave-ins.Furthermore, many cave-ins are not reported to BLS. OSHA received testimonyat the public hearing asserting that the exemptions for small employersfrom the BLS reporting and recordkeeping requirements contributes significantlyto the undereporting of excavation injuries and fatalities (Tr. 4/19/88pp. 62-69).Nevertheless, estimates of the number of injuries and fatalities occurringin excavations have been made. In a 1975 study, based primarily on a previousstudy of newspaper articles and other data made available from OSHA files,it was estimated that more than 100 persons were killed in excavation cave-inseach year (Ex. 2-11). In a recent report prepared by NIOSH, based on OSHA'sinspection data, it was estimated that at least 73 persons were killedeach year in cave-in accidents, and at least 97 persons were killed asa result of all excavation-related accidents (Exs. 2-24, 2-30, 2-31 and2-32). Using the same inspection data, OSHA has estimated a fatality ratedue to excavation-related work injuries of .318 per 1,000 full time workersfor all SIC's involved and .508 per 1,000 full-time workers for SIC 1623.These rates are at least similar to, if not higher than the fatality rateof .248 per 1,000 full time workers due to all types of work injuries occurringin construction SIC's in general. The fatality rate for trenching workwas estimated to be as high as 112 percent greater than the rate for constructionin general. Estimates of non-fatal injuries in excavation and trenching work have alsobeen made. California has reported that the ratio of non-fatal, lost-timeinjuries to fatalities for all types of accidents in sewer, pipeline, andtrenching work was 50 to 1. That is, one fatality occurred for every 50non-fatal, lost time injuries. In contrast, the ratio for all contractconstruction was 174 to 1 (Ex. 2-9). In another report specifically related to cave-ins, California reportedthat the ratio of lost-time injuries to fatalities due only to cave-inaccidents was 17 to 1. In contrast the lost-time work injuries to fatalitiesfor all types of accidents in all industries in California was 250 to 1(Ex. 2-10). As a measure of the seriousness of cave-in accidents, Thompson and Tannenbaumstated that ratios of injuries to fatalities due to cave-ins as high as10 to 1 and 14 to 1 have been reported (Ex. 2-11). OSHA has determined that the available accident and injury data clearlyestablish a significant risk to employees working in and around excavations.A high rate of injuries has continued to occur in excavations throughoutthe years since subpart P was first adopted by OSHA. OSHA believes thatthis revision of subpart P will help reduce the current accident toll associatedwith excavation work. <ITAG tagnum="84">III. Summary and Explanation of the Final Rule </ITAG>In order to solicit desired public comment, OSHA identified fifteen issuesin the preamble of the proposal on which the Agency needed additional information.These issues, the comments received relating to these issues, and OSHA'sdetermination on the appropriate way to address these issues are discussedbelow. Issue 1, raised in the preamble of the proposed rule (52 FR 12293), solicitedpublic input on the suggestion that OSHA include a ``standard practice''in its revision of Subpart P in addition to those set forth in the appendices.These data, in the form of charts and tables, would be used to protectemployees against cave-ins, and would be capable of being understood andused by the journeyman worker. As an alternative, the employer could havea qualified engineer design the protective system. These data (standardpractice) would include generic tables and charts for metal hydraulic shoring,timber shoring, trench shields, protection for footing excavations (bell-bottompier holes), and sloping and benching systems. OSHA received 13 comments on this issue. Several commenters supported theincorporation of a standard practice and suggested that OSHA adopt theCAL-OSHA Title 8 standards as the National ``standard practice'' (Exs.4-28, 4-35, 4-37, 4-82, 4-102, 4-106 4-109 and 4-115). Another commenter(Ex. 4-96) favored OSHA providing this type of data as an alternative tothe use of an engineer, but made no suggestions as to a specific sourcethat OSHA should use for these data. On the other hand, several commenters disagreed with the incorporationof a standard practice. In particular, the Building and Construction TradesDepartment (BCTD) of the AFL-CIO (Ex. 4-17) noted that the approach wasfeasible, but not recommended because of the difficulty of making revisions,and the difficulty of incorporating the necessary flexibility. Union ElectricCompany (Ex. 4-35) commented that ``We do not see the need for such chartsand/or tables in addition to that already included.'' In addition, theNational Utility Contractors of America (NUCA) (Ex. 3-91) contended thatit would be inappropriate for OSHA to sponsor any particular set of chartsor tables, and that this approach would not be feasible because regionalwork practices are different. NUCA also expressed support for the flexibilityof the performance-oriented approach of the proposal. The Washington Metropolitan Area Construction Safety Association (WMACSA)(Ex. 4-101) commented that ``Standard practices appear to have been providedfor by the options provided by OSHA.'' WMACSA also pointed out the difficultyof revision and in deciding, regionally, what was appropriate. Finally, Lone Star Gas Company, (Ex. 4-105), commented that charts andtables need to incorporate flexibility and permit the option of individualdesign to meet unique circumstances. OSHA notes that many responses to this issue included comments on othersections of the proposal. These comments will be addressed later in thispreamble as appropriate. Based on the above discussion, OSHA has determined that a ``standard practice,''in the context of Issue 1, would not be appropriate because it would limitflexibility and would not recognize regional work practices. The Agencybelieves that the current format, as revised, provides the necessary degreeof flexibility; provides a mechanism for the recognition and use of regionalshoring and sloping practices; and allows rapid introduction and use ofnew products and technology, while insuring that appropriate employee protectionis provided. OSHA believes that adoption of CAL-OSHA standards as the National ``standardpractice,'' as suggested by some commenters, would not be appropriate asthose standards were developed regionally for local interests, and arenot recognized nationally as appropriate for all regions. However, OSHAnotes that the flexibility of the final rule permits California contractorsto use any standard approved by a registered professional engineer, whilecontractors in other states may choose to use other standards which areequally effective, and which reflect the necessary regional differencesin soils, climate, and work practices. Therefore, with respect to this issue the agency makes no change and promulgatesthe standard as proposed. In Issue 2 of the NPRM (52 FR 12294), OSHA requested comment on whetheror not it should limit design responsibility to a ``qualified engineer,''which was defined in the proposal as ``A person who has attained (throughengineering education and experience) a special knowledge of mathematical,physical, and engineering sciences and the principles and methods of engineeringanalysis and design; and who, therefore, is qualified to practice engineering,i.e., apply the principles and methods of engineering analysis and designto specific problems.'' The proposal permitted design by either a ``qualifiedperson or a qualified engineer.'' The Agency also solicited information, opinion, and comment on costs; the rationale for requiring or not requiringa ``qualified engineer;'' situations which would require a ``qualifiedengineer;'' the proposed definition; criteria to evaluate experience; impactson small businesses; the rationale for requiring or not requiring a ``registeredprofessional engineer;'' and any evidence supporting or disproving thatrequiring a ``qualified engineer'' decreases the risk of injuries and fatalities.OSHA received 30 comments on this issue, including input from the ACCSH(Tr. 8/5/87 pp. 456-470). Some comments supported the idea that a ``qualifiedperson'' could properly perform design work. Several comments, like thatof H. J. Schneider Construction, Inc. (Ex. 4-3), expressed support for``qualified person,'' but provided no rationale. Other commenters, likethe Underground Construction Co. and the Associated Builders and Contractors,Inc. (ABC) (Exs. 4-57 and 4-78), argued that allowing only a ``qualifiedengineer'' to do design work would deprive contractors of the ability touse capable supervisors to do such work. However, ABC also stated thata qualified engineer would be appropriate in complex cases such as excavationsunder foundations and trenches deeper than 15 feet. Several other commenters, such as W. M. Lyles Co., Kaweah ConstructionCo., ARB, Inc., and Herman Weissker, Inc. (Exs. 4-5 and 4-82, 4-13, 4-102and 4-109), objected to the suggestion of limiting design responsibilityto a ``qualified engineer'' because of severe cost implications; however,they supplied no specific cost data or supporting rationale. These commentersalso objected to the suggested use of a registered professional engineer,stating that they felt experience and training were more important thanregistration as an engineer. However, the commenters did not indicate whatamount of experience or training would qualify a person to do this typeof work. In addition, these commenters apparently misinterpreted the proposalas requiring an engineer's involvement with every excavation because theyalso noted that their firms do not employ engineers to be involved withevery excavation. Three commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102 and 4-109) noted that the State of Californiahas laws which require such design to be done by engineers, but they objectedto this becoming a national standard. The three commenters argued thatthey knew of no evidence that requiring a ``qualified engineer'' to dodesign work would reduce the risk of fatality or injury. They also contendedthat the proposed definition of ``qualified person'' contained adequatecriteria for evaluation of an individual's qualifications. Union Electric Company (Ex. 4-35) objected to limiting design responsibilityto engineers, noting that their designs were often developed in the fieldor adapted to field conditions on site, within accepted parameters. TheCompany also noted that the adequacy of their design was verified by companyengineers. The Carolina Branch of the Associated General Contractors (CBAGC) (Ex.4-54) objected to limiting design responsibility to engineers in ``routinesituations.'' However, they noted that a ``qualified engineer'' shouldbe required in complicated situations, such as excavations under foundationsand trenches deeper than 15 feet. The CBAGC also stated that they haveno evidence that a qualified engineer would improve safety. The Laclede Gas Company (Ex. 4-88) commented that it was unnecessary tolimit design responsibility to qualified engineers, considering the definitionof ``qualified person,'' and noted that field experience is as importantas formal training. The Public Service Electric and Gas Co. (Ex. 4-89) commented that companysupervisors trained in the proper application of existing standards andaware of field conditions are their primary means of controlling on-the-jobsafety. The commenter recognized the need for a ``qualified engineer''to do basic planning and design on large projects such as building construction,tunnel construction, and major infrastructure installation and noted thatthis is a current business practice. The commenter also stated that theyknew of no evidence to support the fact that injuries and fatalities woulddecrease by the presence of a ``qualified engineer'' at the excavationsite. Lone Star Gas Company (Ex. 4-105) stated that limiting design responsibilityto ``qualified engineers'' would exclude individuals who are fully capableof performing the required duties, but do not possess an engineering degree.Lone Star also noted that the risk of injury in an excavation designedby an unqualified engineer or person would be high, and that design ofhigh risk excavation, i.e., excavations under the foundations of buildings,should very likely be performed by a ``qualified engineer.'' Lone Staralso emphasized experience, training, number of years of apprenticeship,and the type of soil in which these individuals gained their experienceas being ``objective criteria'' to determine qualification. Lone Star commentedthat the cost would range from $30,000 on up for each job because eachjob would require an engineer on site at all times. Lone Star also commentedthat it knew of no evidence to support the conclusion that requiring a``qualified engineer'' would decrease the risk of injuries and fatalities.Underground Contractors, Inc. (Ex. 4-115), objected to limiting designresponsibility to ``qualified engineers,'' citing a financial burden. Theyestimated the cost for engineers would be $60 to $100 per hour. The commenteralso objected to the use of ``registered professional engineer'' for thesame reason. Underground Constructors, Inc. also suggested OSHA considerexperience or specific safety training as proof of qualification for designingprotective systems. As an example, the commenter suggested qualificationrequirements of 10-20 years experience, and noted that individuals whofeel directly responsible for employees in the field may in fact be bettersuited to this duty and more safety conscious than an outside ``card-carryingengineer.'' One other commenter, Schield Construction Co. Inc.  (Ex. 4-56), althoughnot specifically addressing Issue 2, commented that a registered professionalengineer would not always be more qualified than a contractor who has theexperience with trench protective systems. The Agency notes that many of the commenters opposed to a requirement limitingdesign responsibility to a ``qualified engineer'' misinterpreted the proposedrequirement, and concluded, as evidenced by many of the above comments,that such a requirement would require an engineer to be on site at everyexcavation, and that experienced supervisors would no longer be able todetermine the selection of protection systems. This was not OSHA's intent,and, as discussed later in the preamble, the Final Rule will clarify thepoint. Most of the commenters on this issue, as well as the ACCSH, supported limitingdesign responsibility to an ``engineer.'' However, many of the commenters,along with the ACCSH, recommended that the proposed ``qualified engineer''be changed to ``registered professional engineer.'' In order to solicitpublic input on a requirement for the use of a registered professionalengineer, the Agency again raised this topic in its Notice of InformalPublic Hearing (53 FR 5280). Many of these commenters noted the shortcoming of allowing design by a``qualified person'' and pointed out the difficulty of determining whois, in fact, qualified (Exs. 4-17, 4-27, 4-28, 4-37, 4-75, 4-91, 4-101,and 4-114). In particular, Granite Construction Company (Ex. 4-28) statedthat ``While there may be `qualified persons' who by experience and/oreducation can perform design function, we feel the majority of people whomay fit the broad definition of `qualified person' lack the qualificationsnecessary for design of excavation protective systems, in the absence ofstandard practices.'' Granite did not support a requirement for a registeredprofessional engineer, and noted that the cost for hiring a ``qualifiedengineer'' should not fall disproportionally on small businesses becauseit would be passed on to the consumer.Griswald Machine and Engineering, Inc. (GME) (Ex. 4-27) noted that ``a`qualified person' is too subjective a level of expertise,'' and recommendsthat OSHA require that only a qualified engineer, or a person working underthe  direction of a qualified engineer, be allowed to do design work. The Washington Metropolitan Area Construction Safety Association (WMACSA)(Ex. 4-101) pointed out that dropping ``qualified person'' from the standard``* * * would appear to be in the best interest of the industry. Thereis no way to decide if a person is in fact qualified. Anyone can say heor she is qualified by reason of extensive experience, knowledge, and training.The lack of any method to prove or disprove this could be very expensiveto any employer.'' WMACSA also noted that under the proposal, if a companycould not afford to hire an engineer, there were a great many other optionsavailable for providing protection which would not require the servicesof an engineer. WMACSA commented that it would be difficult to prove thatrequiring a ``qualified engineer'' would decrease injuries and fatalities.WMACSA also recommended that a ``qualified engineer'' be a professionalengineer registered in the state where he or she works, because the registeredengineer works with a license that can be withdrawn for cause. The commenteralso pointed out the difficulty for OSHA to set standards for an individualdesigning protective systems and evaluate and certify candidates, and notesthat this would be impractical. Finally, the commenter also noted thatwith all the options available, the use of an engineer should seldom, ifever, be required. Speed Shore Corporation (Ex. 4-114) stated that allowing a ``qualifiedperson'' to design an intricate, detailed safety system would provide a``loophole,'' explaining that terms such as ``extensive knowledge, trainingand experience'' are too general to use for properly qualifying individuals.Speed Shore strongly recommended that protective systems not utilizingthe other more specific options should be designed by a qualified engineerwho works under registration and a code of ethics applicable to his field.The Building and Construction Trades Department (BCTD) of the AFL-CIO (Ex.4-17) recommended eliminating ``qualified person'' from the standard because,in their view, there is no way to determine if a person is in fact qualified.They also supported the use of a registered professional engineer, notingthat registration is a state prerogative, and that engineers are registeredto protect the public for the same reasons and in the same manner as physiciansand attorneys. BCTD argued that it would be hard to find ``prima facie''evidence to support the conclusion that requiring an engineer would decreasethe risk of injury and noted that it would be just as hard to prove thatan attorney practicing at the bar decreases client risk. The commenteralso pointed out the difficulty of incorporating criteria into the standardto define who would be qualified to design protective systems, and, asan example, suggested that OSHA consider the difficulty of incorporatinga surgeon's education into a health standard. BCTD also notes that theoptions available in the standard would avoid the necessity for hiringengineers in most cases. Rader, Addision and Story (Ex. 4-1) supported the use of ``qualified engineer''but pointed out the potential controversy as to who is a qualified engineer.The commenters suggested that a qualified engineer should be a registeredprofessional engineer, for legal reasons. The commenter noted that licensedengineers carry insurance which is negated if all applicable laws, ordinances,rules and regulations of any Federal, state or local government are notfollowed. Additionally, the commenter noted that improperly designed excavationscan only be cured by proper design and accurate construction. The commenteralso pointed out that solving design problems in the beginning (beforedigging begins) decreases costs. Pacific Gas Transmission Co. (PGT) (Ex. 4-37) supported a requirement fordesign by a qualified engineer. The commenter noted that:<ITAG tagnum="21">While we respect the importance of qualified persons in the developmentof the area of trench protection, we feel it is now time to rely on thetraining and tools of the qualified engineer to provide this service. Boththe qualified engineer and the qualified person have the same physicaltools to work with: soil type, plasticity, water content, weight, compaction,etc. The difference is in how these tools are used. Through his trainingthe engineer is able to apply sometimes complex engineering techniquesto design a trench protection system. The qualified person gets his engineeringtraining through trial and error. The preamble to the PRM indicates thatthis trial and error process is costing time and lives.</ITAG>Although the commenter did not directly recommend the use of a registeredprofessional engineer, several comments indicated that PGT did in factsupport this concept. For example:<ITAG tagnum="21">First of all, if the qualified engineer is also a registered engineer,he is legally liable for his work. If he continues to provide faulty designhe is no longer allowed to practice. And the preamble to this PRM indicatesthat the majority of excavation accidents result from the use of designsor systems selected, prepared or implemented by unqualified personnel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">PGT feels that this responsibility should be given to qualified engineers.It should be noted that this responsibility may already be delegated toregistered engineers in some states (e.g., California) and that under mostextraordinary conditions it would be prudent for the employer to hire aconsultant or use in-house engineers to protect his employees as well asavoiding damage to adjoining properties. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In certain states only registered engineers may call themselves ``engineer.''The registration process is the only nationwide certification program inplace that attests to the suitability, through education and experience,of a person to do the required work. As we said earlier, the registeredengineer is legally liable for his work and in some states personally liable.</ITAG>PGT also noted that an engineer would be required only if site conditionsrequired specific expertise in evaluation, or if the employer felt thatthrough special design he or she could realize a project savings. PGT furthercommented that in neither case would this requirement adversely impactsmall business, and that without such a requirement costly and fatal accidentswould continue to occur. The National Utility Contractors Association (NUCA) (Ex. 4-91) endorsedthe use of a registered professional engineer or a person working underthe direction of a registered professional engineer. NUCA pointed out thedifficulty of proving or disproving the qualifications of a qualified person.NUCA also noted the liability consequences of using a qualified person.Cost figures provided by the commenter indicate total design of a protectivesystem would cost approximately $3,000, but did not provide specfic detailsas to the type of system or size of project this cost represents. In addition,the commenter pointed out that small contractors do not bid work wheresuch levels of expertise are necessary. The Los Angeles Section of the American Society of Civil Engineers (LAASCE)(Ex. 4-75) supported the use of registered professional engineers. Thecommenter noted that under the California State Plan, an alternate shoringdesign (i.e., one not specifically permitted in the California standard)for excavations under 20 feet in depth, and all shoring designs for excavationsover 20 feet in depth, must be prepared by a civil engineer registeredin California. The commenter also noted that because of this requirement,the safety record of California has been exemplary compared to the restof the nation. The LAASCE also commented that allowing design preparationby a ``qualified person'' would be considered a significant lowering ofsafety standards for the construction industry and also a possible underminingof professional engineering standards. The commenter also stated:<ITAG tagnum="21">We would prefer to see registration as a civil engineer a requirementin the definition. This would totally relieve OSHA of the responsibilityof determining a person's qualifications to design shoring. Each Statehas its own criteria of what is acceptable to them for a person to practiceengineering. It would also make enforcement by OSHA inspection personnelmuch easier when questioning the qualifications of the person responsiblefor a shoring design.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Qualified engineers use the physical laws of nature to estimate appliedloads and the strength of construction materials with appropriate factorsof safety to ensure against all possible failures of a proposed shoringsystem. A wealth of data is available to help a qualified engineer predictthe behavior of a proposed shoring system. A person designing by ``experience''has but one method to establish his limiting design criteria. That methodis to encounter a design failure in actual practice and relate that tofuture designs. Unfortunately, the application of this design techniquemay come at a high price in injuries and lives. This method of design shouldbe as totally unacceptable to OSHA as it is to us.</ITAG>The commenter did not support including criteria for qualifications ofpersons designing protective systems, noting that it would require theestablishment of an ``OSHA Board of Registration.'' Such a board wouldduplicate State licensing boards, which are currently an adequate meansof setting qualification criteria. Cost data supplied by the commenterindicated that the cost for shoring drawings for a typical $500,000 projectwould run about $800, and noted that often these cost were recovered byincreased efficiency. Finally, the commenter raised the following legalissue:<ITAG tagnum="21">One other question not asked in your proposed rulemaking, but onethat is certainly pertinent, is ``Does the recognition of experience asa qualification for shoring design conflict with any existing laws? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In the State of California, the practice of civil engineering requiresthat an individual be licensed with the Board of Registration for ProfessionalEngineers. Other states have similar statutes which would be in conflictwith your proposed rulemaking. In the event of a civil action regardinga trench bracing failure, what will be a defendant's position regardingcompliance with the law if a workman is injured or killed while workingin a trench shored in accordance with an unprofessionally prepared shoringplan?</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The Structural Engineers Association of Southern California (Ex. 4-80)commented in support of the LASACE position, favoring the use of a registeredprofessional engineer. Consultant Services Institute, Inc. (CSI) (Ex. 4-64) was strongly opposedto the use of a qualified person, and recommended that the standard requirea qualified civil or soils engineer licensed in the state where the workis being done. Neyer, Tiseo and Mundo, Ltd. (Ex. 4-71) also opposed allowing design byanyone who is not an engineer. The commenter noted that design tables andcharts should not be used by people who are unfamiliar with soil mechanicssince the user must know how soils will behave in order to use the chartsand tables properly. The Associated General Contractors (AGC) of California (Ex. 4-106) endorsedthe use of a ``qualified engineer'' for alternative design (anything otherthan a standard practice) and for any design for excavations deeper than20 feet. The commenter stated that their organization could not cite anyevidence that requiring designs by qualified engineers would decrease therisk of injuries and fatalities, but noted that they were not aware ofany failures of engineered plans which were properly followed. The AGCof California did not support the use of a registered professional engineer,but noted the qualified engineer must have expertise and skill in structuraldesign and soils mechanics. The commenter also confirmed the cost datasupplied by the LASACE (Ex. 4-75) discussed above, citing hourly fees of$65 to $75, and complete shoring plans for small to medium projects at$200 to $800. Other commenters, like the State of California, the Michigan Departmentof Labor, and Schield Construction (Exs. 4-4, 4-46 and 4-56) did not addressIssue 2 directly, but supported limiting design responsibility to a ``qualifiedengineer'' or a registered professional engineer (California) in theircomments on the standard. The comments received prompted OSHA to seek additional information in thehearing notice (53 FR 5280) on the suggestion that a registered professionalengineer be required instead of either a ``qualified person'' or ``qualifiedengineer'' for all original design work, for the development of all originaltabulated data, and for determinations regarding the stability of adjacentstructures. In response the Agency received the following comments: Peoples Gas (Ex. 8-6) commented that most companies use qualified engineersfrom within the company to examine special cases.The W.M. Lyles Co. (Ex. 8-7) objected to the suggested requirement fora registered professional engineer. The commenter's objection was basicallythe same as the previously discussed objections to a requirement for a``qualified engineer'' (Exs. 4-5 and 4-82). The Exxon Company (Ex. 8-10) commented that its procedure involved performingsoil borings and laboratory analysis of soils, and based on the results,its ``qualified engineers'' apply previously developed equations to calculatea stable slope. Exxon noted that possession of an engineering license isnot required to apply these equations safely. The Milwaukee Construction Industry Safety Council and the Associated GeneralContractors of America (Exs. 8-14 and 8-16) commented that they did notsupport deletion of ``qualified person'' or ``qualified engineer,'' northe substitution of registered professional engineer. The Associated General Contractors of California (Ex. 8-18) did not supportthe use of the term ``registered professional engineer.'' The Carolina Branch of the Associated General Contractors of America (Ex.8-19) agreed with the use of a registered professional engineer in specialsituations, but recommended retention of the term ``qualified person,''because of the implied experience factor. Several commenters (Exs. 8-21, 8-22, 8-26, and 8-29) responded to the hearingnotice with objections to using the terms ``qualified person'' or ``qualifiedengineer'' for design work, but did not address the use of registered professionalengineer. However, these commenters did not state clearly whether theircomments were support for the use of a registered professional engineeror an objection to any limiting of design responsibility. The South Dakota Engineering Society (Ex. 8-24) was in total support ofthe ACCSH recommendation to use a registered professional engineer. Southern California Gas Company (Ex. 8-25) commented that the use of aregistered professional engineer in lieu of ``qualified person'' or ``qualifiedengineer'' was unnecessary, but provided no rationale for this statement.The Texas Department of Highway and Public Transportation (Ex. 8-27) recommendedthat OSHA not require a ``registered professional engineer'' to performthe work required in the standard, but did recommend ``the most competentpossible person be used to insure safety in excavation work.'' Mr. William E. Patten (Ex. 8-3) did not specifically address this issue,but in his comments suggested design by a qualified engineer for any alternativemeans of protection. In addition to the comments received specifically addressing Issue 2, OSHAalso received comment on other provisions of the standard which relateto this issue and are discussed here in order to provide a complete discussionof this Issue in one place. The following comments were received on proposedandSection; 1926.650(b)(14), which defined ``qualified person.'' Granite Construction (Ex. 4-28) agreed with the criticism of the definitionof ``qualified person,'' as discussed under Issue 2, and also raised anobjection to allowing the competent person to choose among the optionsallowed in andSection; 1926.652(b) and (c). The commenter noted that thiscould be dangerous because there was no limit on the depth of excavationfor which this person was permitted to choose or to design protective systems.The National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health (NIOSH) (Ex.4-30) recommended tying the qualification of a ``qualified person'' tothe opinion of a registered engineer with required documentation of thatopinion. OSHA notes that the Final Rule recognizes this type of arrangementby not specifying who designs a set of plans or tabulated data, but requiresthat plans or data be approved by a registered professional engineer. TheAgency does not require the documentation suggested by NIOSH but notesthat the ``responsibility'' for the design rests with the registered professionalengineer. Exxon Pipeline Company (Ex. 4-53) recommended that OSHA allow the competentperson to design less complex protective systems. The Agency notes thatin the Final Rule the competent person is permitted to design protectivesystems under the limitations of the appendices, manufacturer's data, orother tabulated data without an engineer's approval. In addition, the competentperson can develop original designs, but these designs must be approved(simply by stamping and signing the design) by the registered professionalengineer before use. Finally, the BCTD and WMACSA (Exs. 4-17 and 4-111) recommended eliminationof the term, ``qualified person'' as they did in their direct responseto Issue 2. After careful consideration of the comments received, OSHA has determinedthat the term ``qualified person'' should be dropped from the standard.This decision is based on the evidence in the record which indicates thatmost of the individuals who fit this broad definition lack the qualificationsnecessary to do original design work and may often have insufficient incentiveto provide adequate protection to employees. The Agency agrees with themany commenters who point out that the proposed definition of ``qualifiedperson'' was so broad and subjective that almost anyone with constructionexperience would meet the requirements and, therefore, be permitted todesign protective systems for excavations. The Agency's position is supportedby commenters, like Johns Hopkins University (Ex. 4-11), who highlightedthe frequency of accidents where experienced ``qualified persons'' dugunprotected excavations which caved in, resulting in unnecessary fatalitiesand injuries. The Agency disagrees with those commenters who suggest that experience,per se, qualifies an individual to design protective systems. The principlesof soil mechanics are too complex to learn on a trial and error basis.In addition, OSHA notes that many of the commenters that supported designby a ``qualified person'' conceded that engineers were necessary in somesituations, or stated that field-developed designs were verified by engineers(Exs. 4-35, 4-54, 4-78, 4-105, and 8-6). The Agency wants to emphasize that this decision does not limit the employer'sability to use supervisors who meet the criteria for competent personsto choose protective systems from the numerous other options available.OSHA notes that these persons are permitted to design protective systemsusing the appendices to Subpart P, manufacturers data, or other tabulateddata, in accordance with this Final Rule. However, they may not developoriginal designs (i.e., those not based on any of the other options), unlessthe supervisor is also a registered professional engineer or has the designapproved by a registered professional engineer.The Agency also notes that this revision does not mean that an engineermust be on site at every excavation, as suggested by some commenters. In addition, OSHA has determined that the term ``qualified engineer'' shouldbe replaced by the term ``registered professional engineer'' in the finalrule. This decision is based on evidence in the record which demonstratesthe need for original designs to be developed by a person whose qualificationsin this field have been demonstrated and are readily recognizable. TheAgency agrees with the commenters who point out the difficulty OSHA wouldhave in establishing criteria, evaluating individuals and certifying theseindividuals as qualified to develop original designs for protective systems.The commenters also note that such a process would be impractical and aduplication of state licensing boards. OSHA recognizes that the registrationprocess is the only nationwide certification program in place that atteststo the qualifications of a person to do the required work. OSHA also recognizesthat registered professional engineers are legally liable for their work,work under a code of ethics, and have a license which can be withdrawnfor cause. The Agency also notes that the current registration system allowseach state to establish the criteria necessary to practice engineeringin that state, and would make enforcement by OSHA easier in regards tothe qualifications of the person responsible for any design. The wording of the Final Rule, requiring approval of original designs by``a registered professional engineer'' recognizes the industry practicewhere junior engineers, engineers-in-training, or non-engineers may, infact, develop the actual design, but the design is verified and approvedby a registered professional engineer. Finally, OSHA agrees with the many commenters who recommended that excavationsunder foundations, excavations deeper than 20 feet, and excavations whereunusual site conditions exist require the expertise of an engineer in allcases. The Agency has revised this final rule to reflect these concerns.Therefore, with respect to the issues, the agency has determined that revisionof the standard is justified and promulgates the standard as revised. Issue 3 of the proposed rule (52 FR 12294) sought to determine if OSHAshould require specific visual or manual tests when using proposed appendixA to classify soils. OSHA received 17 responses to this issue (Exs. 4-3, 4-5, 4-13, 4-17, 4-28,4-35, 4-37, 4-57, 4-82, 4-88, 4-91, 4-101, 4-102, 4-105, 4-106, 4-109,and 4-115). Although the rationale expressed in these responses differed,almost all commenters agreed that a specific test(s) should not be required.One commenter, Union Electric Co. (Ex. 4-35), observed that mandated testingwas unnecessary because most soils can be classified by visual analysis.OSHA disagrees with this observation because of the complexity of soilmake-up and the number of conditions that affect soil stability. On theother hand, most commenters agreed that some type of soil testing is necessary,but that the method of testing should be left as an employer prerogative.OSHA agrees that soil testing is necessary, but has determined that mandatinga specific test would lock in current procedures and discourage new development.Therefore, with respect to this issue, the Agency promulgates the standardas proposed. A complete discussion of acceptable tests is provided belowin the summary and explanation of appendix A. Issue 4 of the proposed rule (52 FR 12294) solicited public input on andSection;1926.652(b), which would permit employers to have a steep slope for excavationsopen less than 72 hours (short term), but which would require flatter slopesfor excavations open longer than 72 hours (long term). OSHA received 16 comments on this issue, and additional input from theACCSH. Several commenters (Exs. 4-5, 4-13, 4-28, 4-57, 4-82, 4-102, 4-106 and4-109) disagreed with the concept. Many of these commenters assumed thisprovision would create a paperwork burden, and felt any time frame establishedwould be arbitrary. They also pointed out that the effect of time on anexcavation depends on the type of soil, and noted that weather, vibration,water, and superimposed loads must also be considered. In addition, thesecommenters pointed out that there is no technical or engineering basisfor establishing any specific time frame to differentiate long term orshort term, and that this concept should not be made part of the standard.One of these commenters, the AGC of California (Ex. 4-106), asserted thatthe proposed provision would be overly restrictive, and supported slopeangles presented by R.T. Frankian which, for simple slopes, were somewhatsimilar to the short term slopes presented by OSHA in the proposal. Another commenter, Underground Contractors, Inc. (Ex. 4-115), suggestedthat the passage of time should not be recognized in the standard, butprovided no rationale. One commenter, the Tennessee Valley Authority (Ex. 4-39), argued that onlyone set of slopes should apply to excavations, the ones that provide thegreatest protection regardless of the time the excavation is open, whileanother commenter (Ex. 4-78) argued that protection should match site conditions,not time. Another commenter, Lone Star Gas (Ex. 4-105), asserted that time definitelyhas an effect on the stability of an excavation, noting, however, that72 hours may not be the appropriate dividing line. The commenter provideda qualified endorsement for a 24 hour cut off, but noted that the effectsof the environment should be the basis for calculating time limitations.Other commenters (Exs. 4-17 and 4-101) noted that the critical time iswhen the trench is first opened and recommended that ``short term'' shouldbe considered to be 24 hours or less. Two commenters (Exs. 4-27 and 4-91) endorsed the proposed handling of shortterm/long term as a necessary improvement, with one commenter (Ex. 4-91)enthusiastically supporting the 72 hour dividing time. In addition, the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87 p. 520) suggested the time divisionbe reduced to one work shift or eight hours. After careful consideration of the entire record, OSHA has determined that,while there is no scientific basis to delineate short time exposure, timemust be considered to some extent in the regulation because long term stressesare different from short term stresses. The Agency points to documentsin the record (Ex. 2-1 p. 2-3 and pp. B-44 and B-47 and Ex. 2-5 pp. 20,21, 28-30 and 70-71) which support the recognition and use of short term/longterm time frames for sloping. One commenter (Ex. 41) submitted severalstudies to the record which support the use of this practice. However, because of the great concern expressed by many commenters regardingsoil type and environmental factors, the Agency has determined that itis appropriate to limit the use of steeper slopes for short term exposureto Type A soils, as defined in appendix A. These soils have the greateststrength, next to stable rock, and field experience has shown that thesesoils can stand on a slope steeper than \3/4\ horizontal:1 vertical (asprescribed in Table B-1 of the Final Rule) for short term exposures toa depth of 12 feet and still provide adequate employee safety. OSHA disagrees with those commenters who believe this concept would createa paperwork burden. The Agency notes that no recordkeeping burden was requiredor implied in the proposal. The Agency believes the information neededto verify the amount of time the excavation is open can be readily obtainedby questioning employees on site. While the Agency accepts the argument that no specific time frame has scientificbacking, and that selection of a time frame, to some extent, is arbitrary,OSHA believes the amount of time an excavation is open does play an importantrole in employee protection. The Agency raised this issue in order to determinea reasonable time frame for distinguishing between long term and shortterm excavations. OSHA also notes that this short term/long term conceptmust be used with the soil classification system in Appendix A, which recognizesother important conditions that affect soil stability. These other conditionswere also noted by many commenters.OSHA disagrees with the AGC of California (Ex. 4-106) position that a longterm/short term concept is overly restrictive. The Agency notes that theslopes proposed by OSHA on that basis were less stringent in many casesthan those already required by the State of California. In addition, OSHAnotes that the use of long term/short term distinction is only one of theoptions available to employers under andSection; 1926.652(b). The employercan comply with one of the other options provided, and, therefore, mayuse different slopes from those listed. The Agency realizes that the allowableslopes and required soil classification system in Appendix A may, in someinstances, be conservative, but believes this is necessary since this optionis intended for  use by field personnel, without benefit of laboratorygenerated soils analysis. OSHA has also determined that the time frame for differentiating long termfrom short term excavations in the case of Type A soil should be reducedto 24 hours. Although there was no clear consensus on a time frame, thisperiod has more support in the record than the proposed 72 hours or theone work shift recommended by the ACCSH. This decision also is in linewith the Agency's belief that it is best to have an excavation open forthe shortest reasonable amount of time. OSHA believes that a period oftime less than 24 hours could be disruptive and would not be appropriate,in light of the other requirements in subpart P, such as andSection; 1926.651(k)which requires daily inspection of the excavation. Therefore, based on the above discussion OSHA promulgates the standard,as revised, in regard to this issue. Issue 5 of the proposed rule (52 FR 12295) raised ACCSH suggestions thatdesign specifications for shields be available at the worksite, and thatshields should be certified that they can withstand the specified maximumloads. The proposal also asked for information on the effects of such requirementson manufacturers and users, and for information on current industry practice.OSHA received 14 comments on this issue. Eight commenters opposed a requirementfor design specifications to be available on site. Four of these commenters(Exs. 4-82, 4-102, 4-106, and 4-109) argued that design specificationscontain proprietary information and should not be available on site. Thesecommenters did recommend that the design maximum load for the shield bedisplayed on the shield. Two other commenters (Exs. 4-35 and 4-115) recommendedthat these specifications should not be on site, but should be made availableto OSHA upon request within a reasonable amount of time. Another commenter(Ex. 4-54) noted that ``paper at the jobsite inhibits attention to productivityand safety.'' The last commenter (Ex. 4-57) to disagree with the proposedrequirement for design specification availability at the worksite alsonoted that the specifications often contain certain proprietary informationand would be of minimal value on site. The commenter went on to state thatwhat would be more important to have at the site are installation and placementinstructions, drawings, allowable load restrictions, weights, lift pointsand maintenance instructions. Three commenters (Exs. 4-27, 4-28, and 4-78) supported the suggestion torequire shield design specifications to be available at the job site. Twoother commenters (Exs. 4-101 and 4-105), in addition to supporting thesuggestion, noted that manufactured shields usually have the load requirementsstamped on them, and also noted that design specifications are easily obtainedfrom the manufacturers. Finally, one commenter (Ex. 4-14) recommended thatdesign specifications, which indicate the circumstances under which theshield can be used, should be on site to enable a competent person to knowhow to use the shield properly under changing soil conditions. OSHA has determined that detailed drawings, which usually contain proprietaryinformation, would be of little use on the job site because the Agencyhas no way to confirm certain criteria, such as the grade of steel usedin a shield. However, as suggested by several commenters, the Agency willrequire that information necessary for the safe installation, placement,use, and removal of a shield must be on site. OSHA has also determined,based on the above comments and testimony presented at the informal publichearing (Tr. 4/19/88 p. 184), that most manufacturers already provide theabove information with their product, and, therefore, such a requirementwill not impose a significant burden. Therefore, with respect to this issue,the Agency is promulgating the standard as revised. Issue 6 of the proposal (52 FR 12295) solicited input on a suggestion torequire design specifications (a plan or drawing) and a statement of asupport system's limitations to be available at the worksite. OSHA received10 comments on this issue. Three commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, and 4-109)stated that it would be unreasonable to require design specifications forsupport systems to be on site, but noted that the requirement should befor the employer to furnish the design specifications to OSHA, given reasonablenotice. Two other commenters (Exs. 4-106 and 4-115) objected to the proposalthat design specifications for <T3>all </T3>(emphasis added) support systems be maintained at the jobsite. These commenters noted that under CAL/OSHA, only alternate or specialdesigns must be made available. Another commenter (Ex. 4-105) stated thatsuch a requirement would likely eliminate shop-built protection, and wouldrequire an engineer on each job. On the other hand, two commenters (Exs. 4-17 and 4-101) agreed that specificationsnecessary for the proper use of the support system should be on site whilethe system is in use, in order to enable the employer to make modificationsto the system if necessary. These commenters also noted that reputablemanufacturers already furnish this type of information for their product.This was also confirmed by testimony presented at the informal public hearing(Tr. 4/19/88, p. 184). Another commenter (Ex. 4-28) recommended that designplans and specifications for support systems be available at the job sitefor any unusual or alternate design. One other commenter (Ex. 4-37) noted that if the system is designed byan engineer, the requirement would have little effect on the employer,since a set of drawings would be on site anyway. Based on the record, OSHA has determined that the information necessaryfor the safe installation, placement, use, and removal of a support systemmust be available at the work site. Further, the Agency has determinedthat this information is usually supplied by the manufacturers of thesesupport systems when the systems are delivered to the site or to the user.Therefore, with respect to this issue, the Agency is promulgating the standardas revised. Issue 7 of the NPRM (52 FR 12295) solicited comments on an ACCSH recommendationthat OSHA require some form of warning along the edges of excavations thatare five feet or more in depth to warn employees who work adjacent to excavations,but who are not directly involved with the excavation activity, that afall hazard exists. The Agency received 17 comments on this issue. Two commenters (Exs. 4-54and 4-101) supported such a requirement, but supplied no rationale. Oneof these commenters (Ex. 4-54) indicated that a barrier bank (the spoilpile) was itself an effective means of warning.Other commenters (Exs. 4-37, 4-49, and 4-105) noted that a requirementfor some kind of warning along the edges might be appropriate for someexcavations but was impractical for larger (longer) excavations such aspipeline excavations. One commenter (Ex. 4-49) pointed out that most pipelinesgo through remote areas with little potential for unwarranted access. Anothercommenter (Ex. 4-37) stated that the surface disturbance resulting fromconstruction provides enough delineation. A third commenter (Ex. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">4-105) noted that it is present practice to provide such warningsexcept for trenches of great length. Two commenters expressed strong support for such a requirement. The firstcommenter, BCTD (Ex. 4-17), recommended that this requirement be implementedat multiple contractor worksites because employees not directly involvedwith the excavation may not be aware of the specific location of the excavation.The second commenter (Ex. 4-39) noted that a warning system not only protectsworkers not directly involved in the excavation, but should help to maintainthe stability of the excavation by keeping mobile equipment away from theedge of the excavation. On the other hand, many other commenters disagreed with this type of requirement.Several commenters (Exs. 4-5, 4-13, 4-82, 4-102 and 4-109) implied thatthis type of requirement will not prevent falls into excavations, becausemost falls are the result of inattention. The commenters also noted thatfalls occur despite the fact that employees are aware that excavation activityis being undertaken. Another group of commenters (Exs. 4-57 and 4-115)noted that warning barriers would only result in more problems, becausethey would become additional obstacles in the work environment, and material,such as shoring, would have to be moved around, over or under these obstacles,creating other unspecified hazards. Finally, several commenters noted that this type of requirement is impracticaland unnecessary (Ex. 4-28) because many types of work, such as pipelineexcavations, are completed or move from one area to another too fast forbarricades to be effective (Ex. 4-91), and their use should be left tothe discretion of the employers as site conditions require (Exs. 4-35 and4-106). Additionally, one commenter (Ex. 4-19) noted that contractors workingat one site for any length of time normally provide this type of protectionas a matter of course. OSHA appreciates the input received on this issue. However, the Agencyhas determined that this subject is more appropriately addressed in itsFinal Rule revising subpart M, ``Safety Standards for Fall Protection inthe Construction Industry,'' (Docket S-206) which is on OSHA's Regulatorycalendar for publication in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> later this year. The proposal was published onNovember 26, 1986 (51 FR 42718). The revised subpart M will also incorporate the fall protection requirementsin existing andSection; 1926.651(t). Therefore, in respect to this issue, the agency promulgates the standardas proposed. In Issue 8 of the proposed rule (52 FR 12295) OSHA solicited public commenton the ACCSH recommendation that a written log or record of all requiredinspections be kept at the job site. OSHA received 16 responses to thisissue. An overwhelming majority of the commenters opposed such a requirement.Most of these commenters (Exs. 4-5, 4-13, 4-35, 4-57, 4-82, 4-91, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">4-101, 4-102, 4-106, 4-109, and 4-115) stated that the benefit ofa record to verify inspection was questionable, and that a record couldbe falsified. Further, they contended that the time spent by the competentperson filling out a record of required inspections would be better spentmaintaining and improving worker safety. Two commenters (Ex. 4-28 and 4-78),while disagreeing with the proposed requirement for a written log, notedthat if other commenters established an overwhelming need for a writtenrecord, then a certification would be adequate. Other commenters, whilenot directly endorsing the recommended written log, noted that maintaininga log of inspections might not be necessary if the competent person wereconstantly vigilant (Ex. 4-17), but that keeping records and logs wouldnot add a financial burden because the inspector is already on the jobsite (Ex. 4-105). Finally, one commenter (Ex. 4-37) suggested that a logbe kept of conditions that vary from those for which the system was designedand of any subsequent actions taken to bring the system into compliance.Based on the above comments, the Agency has determined that a written logor record of inspections is not necessary. OSHA agrees with the commenterswho note the questionable value of a record in this situation. The informationcontained in a log can be obtained by other means, such as communicatingwith the competent person and with employees on the site, and by reviewingthe elements of the protective system being used by the employer. Further,OSHA agrees that the time required to fill out a log could be better spentby the competent person ensuring worker safety. Therefore, in regard tothis issue OSHA promulgates the final rule as proposed. Issue 9 of the NPRM (52 FR 1295) solicited input on whether or not theAgency should require that a ``top man'' be present to observe work conductedwithin the excavation, and to watch constantly for signs of danger whenemployees are in an excavation. This issue also solicited input on theextent to which such a requirement would increase safety, on other dutiesthat could be assigned to the ``top man,'' on the responsibilities the``top man'' should have; and on the cost of such a requirement. OSHA received 20 comments on this issue, including input from the ACCSH(Tr. 8/5/87 p. 477). The ACCSH recommended that a ``top person'' (as opposedto ``top man'') be defined as ``a person at the top of the excavation constantlyin visual and oral contact with the workers in a trench or excavation,and able to recognize and respond to hazardous trenching or excavationconditions.'' Further discussion by the ACCSH indicated that the ``topperson'' should not necessarily be the competent person required by proposedandSection; 1926.651(k), but rather, could be someone with less experiencewho is still able to respond to hazardous conditions and effect a rescue.The rationale for this suggestion was that the competent person would beengaged in other activities (Tr. 8/5/87 p. 477-79.) Three commenters fully supported the use of a ``top person.'' In particular,the Building and Construction Trades Department of the AFL-CIO (BCTD) (Ex.4-17) noted that a ``top person'' was essential for all trenches and forall excavations until a permanent protection system was in place. BCTDalso commented that reputable contractors already provide a ``top person,''that the ``top person'' would logically be the competent person, and thatthe main responsibility of the ``top person'' would be the safety of theworkers. A second commenter, the Washington Metropolitan Area ConstructionSafety Association (WMACSA) (Ex. 4-101), indicated that such a requirementwould improve safety. WMACSA also noted that the logical ``top man'' wouldbe the competent person, that the primary responsibility would be workersafety, and that many contractors currently have a ``top man.'' A thirdcommenter, Lone Star Gas (Ex. 4-105), noted that a ``top man'' is industrypractice and serves to decrease the risk of injury. Lone Star also commentedthat the ``top man'' should not perform any duties that would prevent theperformance of his or her safety function, and that the ``top man's'' responsibilitiesare to warn those in the excavation of danger and to remove workers indanger as quickly as possible. Many other commenters objected, however, to a requirement for a ``top person''for every excavation.Several commenters (Exs. 4-5, 4-13, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">4-37, 4-82, 4-88, 4-102, 4-106, and 4-109) noted that it is industrypractice to have a ``top person'' in many situations, but that not everysituation requires one. Most of these commenters also indicated that evenwhen needed, a ``top person'' could perform other duties in many situationswithout detracting from the safety function. Additionally, three of thesecommenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, and 4-109) pointed out that limiting thisperson's functions could decrease rather than enhance safety because ofboredom and the accompanying lack of attention. Other commenters (Exs. 4-28, 4-37, 4-54, 4-78, 4-106, and 4-115) opposedthis requirement, commenting that it was primarily the foreman's (competentperson) responsibility, and a secondary responsibility of other workers,to watch for signs of danger. Two commenters (Exs. 4-35 and 4-115) also pointed out that the job of a``top person'' would be a boring job where concentration would waver, andreally would not provide any effective protection or safety. Two other commenters (Exs. 4-49, and 4-91) supported the need for an observeron excavations five feet or greater in depth. Additionally, one of thesecommenters (Ex. 4-49) supported the intent of this provision on the conditionthat the person be able to perform other responsibilities which do notimpair the duty to watch for signs of danger. The other commenter (Ex.4-91) opposed a mandatory ``top person'' as described in this issue. After careful consideration of the comments on this issue, OSHA has determinedthat a requirement for a ``top person'' for every excavation is not appropriate.The Agency believes that the responsibilities of a ``top person'' are alreadyadequately assigned to the competent person or his/her designee in theFinal Rule. OSHA notes that the majority of the commenters supporting aspecific requirement for a ``top person'' for all excavations agreed thatmost contractors, in fact, already have a ``top person,'' who is also thecompetent person. Issue 10 of the NPRM (52 FR 12295) solicited public input on a suggestedfourth option for sloping, which would permit the use of tabulated datain the same manner as such data would be used in option three, which addressesshoring. The intent would be to allow the use of tabulated data, meetingspecified requirements, in designing sloping or benching systems in a largergeographic area than the proposed sloping option three, which is site specific.The Agency received 13 responses to this issue, with most commenters supportingthe addition of a ``tabulated data'' option for sloping. Two commenters, (Exs. 4-37 and 4-91), disagreed with the addition of anotheroption for sloping. The National Utility Contractors Association (NUCA)(Ex. 4-91) commented that this option would add confusion to the inspectionprocess, and that the proposal already provided enough latitude for thecontractor to work outside the standard. In addition, Pacific Gas Transmission(PGT) (Ex. 4-37) commented that this option would not be appropriate giventhe variety of soil conditions in larger geographic areas. PGT also notedthat seismic activity should be considered in design. However, most commenters supported this suggestion (Exs. 4-28, 4-49, 4-78,and 4-101). Several other commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, 4-106, 4-109, and4-115), in addition to supporting a ``tabulated data'' option for sloping,noted that this type of data is already available in California. Thesecommenters also recommended that, if the data meets the prescribed requirementsin the standard, the only other restriction should be that the use is limitedto the soil classifications and geographic areas specified. Another commenter(Ex. 4-105) suggested that restrictions should apply in areas of previousexcavation and backfill, and where excavations are close to structures.One other commenter (Ex. 4-17) noted that in addition to the criteria listedin the issue, any tabulated data used for sloping should have either politicalor professional stature in the locality where it is being used.After careful consideration of the comments, OSHA has determined that a``tabulated data'' option for sloping is appropriate. The Agency believesthat this addition will not add confusion to the inspection process, becausean employer using this option would be required to provide the tabulateddata, including instructions for the safe use of the data, to the inspectorduring the inspection. OSHA also notes that soil variations in larger geographicareas would be adequately addressed by the standard, since this slopingoption would be required to be based on a recognized soil classificationsystem which takes into account such variations. The Agency declines torequire consideration of seismic activity, because the Agency has no dataon the subject and the commenter did not submit any supporting data. Issue 11 of the proposal (52 FR 12295) solicited comment on allowing employeesto remain inside shields during repositioning of the shields. ProposedandSection; 1926.652(g)(1)(iv) prohibits employees from being inside shieldswhen the shields are being installed, removed, or relocated. OSHA received 14 responses to this issue. Twelve of the commenters (Exs. 4-5, 4-13, 4-17, 4-28, 4-78, 4-82, 4-91,4-102, 4-105, 4-106, 4-109, and 4-115) endorsed permitting workers to remainin shields during repositioning. Two of these commenters, BCTD and ABC(Exs. 4-17 and 4-78), further stated that this practice is acceptable ifthe shield is only moved horizontally and is not lifted. Most of the othercommenters stated that the increased risk of falls that would accompanythe repeated exit and re-entry of a shield would make it safer to remainin the shield. Two other commenters (Exs. 4-39 and 4-101) recommended retaining the prohibitionon employees remaining in shields being repositioned, but supplied no rationale.Based on the comments in the record, OSHA has determined that employeescan remain safely inside a shield being repositioned, provided the movementof the shield is horizontal and the shield is not lifted. Additionally,the Agency agrees that repeated exiting and re-entry will increase thefall hazard to employees. Therefore, OSHA has revised proposed andSection; 1926.652(g)(1)(iv) to permitemployees to remain inside shields being repositioned provided movementis horizontal and the shield is not lifted. Issue 12 of the NPRM (52 FR 12295) solicited comment on a suggestion thathardpan and caliche be moved from a ``Type A'' soil classification to a``stable rock'' classification. OSHA received 13 responses to this issue. Most commenters supported thissuggestion for a variety of reasons. Several commenters (Exs. 4-5, 4-13, 4-57, 4-105, and 4-115) supported thischange for at least some depth beyond five feet, citing a cost benefit.Other commenters (Exs. 4-37, 4-82, 4-102, 4-106, and 4-109) supported thesuggestion, but noted that the hardpan or caliche must be consistent, uniform,and continuous for the full depth of the excavation; it must also be dry;and the depth of the excavation must be limited to 12 to 15 feet in depth.One other commenter (Ex. 4-35) expressed support, but provided no rationalefor the support. On the other hand, one commenter (Ex. 4-17) noted that these terms havetoo diverse a range of properties, and have a different meaning in differentareas of the country. The commenter recommended allowing hardpan and calicheto be classified as stable rock locally, in accordance with the requirementsof the standard. Another commenter (Ex. 4-101) made a similar recommendation.After careful consideration of the comments, OSHA has determined that upgradingthe classification of hardpan and caliche from ``Type A'' soil to stablerock, on a national basis, is not appropriate. The Agency notes that muchof the support for this upgrade is tempered with recommended limitations.OSHA agrees with the comments that these terms have a wide range of meaningsin different areas of the country. The Agency, however, does not precludesuch a reclassification if done on a regional or site-specific basis, providedthat the requirements of the standard are met. Specifically, this wouldrequire approval of a registered professional engineer, as required forthe use of other tabulated data or site-specific designs. Appendix A doesnot permit this reclassification. Therefore, in regard to this issue, OSHA promulgates the Final Rule asproposed. Issue 13 of the NPRM (52 FR 12295) solicited comment on whether or not,in addition to andSection; 1926.652(f), the Agency should provide more specificcoverage for bell bottom pier holes under a separate section of subpartP, and if so, what a separate new section should address. OSHA received nine comments on this issue. Three commenters (Exs. 4-82,4-102, and 4-109) opposed having a separate section addressing bell bottompier holes. Another commenter (Ex. 4-115) noted that bell bottom pier holesshould not be included in this standard. On the other hand, several commenters(Exs. 4-17, 4-72, 4-91, 4-101, and 4-106) agreed that bell bottom pierholes should be addressed under a separate section of this standard. Onlyone of those commenters (Ex. 4-72) provided any input as to what shouldbe addressed in a separate section. Based on the comments received, the Agency believes a separate sectioncovering bell bottom pier holes might be appropriate in the future, butdoes not have sufficient data and information at this time to propose orpromulgate such regulations at present. Therefore, in regard to this issuethe Agency promulgates the Final Rule, as proposed. Issue 14 of the NPRM (52 FR 12295) requested public comment on a suggestionthat OSHA allow the use of established regional practices for the constructionof protective systems. The Agency also solicited comment on the criteriato be used to ensure that these practices are effective.OSHA received 14 comments on this issue, with most commenters supportingOSHA's recognition of regional practices for shoring or sloping. Two commenters opposed the suggestion. One commenter (Ex. 4-91), whilerecognizing the importance of regional practices, recommended that thesepractices be subject to the existing variance procedure. The other commenter(Ex. 4-37) opposed the use of localized standards because they could resultin non-uniform standards and practices, which could lead to on site conflictand misunderstanding.Several commenters (Exs. 4-28, 4-35, 4-37, 4-78, and 4-101) expressed supportfor recognition of regional practices, but provided no criteria for evaluatingthese practices. Other commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, 4-106, and 4-109)supported recognition of regional practices and suggested that evaluationcriteria should include approval by local authorities and a proven safetyrecord. However, they opposed as unrealistic the OSHA suggested requirementof five years of successful use without failure. Another commenter (Ex.4-105) supported the suggestion, but noted that approval by local authoritiesmay be difficult. One commenter (Ex. 4-115) supported the suggestion andagreed that approval of a local authority should be an evaluation criteria,but recommended that the authority be at a state or regional level. Anothercommenter (Ex. 4-17) agreed with the use of regional practices, notingthat this is more likely to lead to voluntary compliance. However, thecommenter also noted the difficulty of evaluating regional practices evenif approved by a political entity, and suggested that these regional practiceshave the support of engineering analysis followed by a trial period. After careful consideration of the comments, OSHA has determined that informationon and evidence of recognition of regional practices should be consideredto be ``other tabulated data'' on the practices in question, and, therefore,must meet the prescribed criteria required in the standard in order tobe acceptable for use. OSHA disagrees with the comment that these local practices should be subjectto the variance procedure before they are recognized. The Agency notesthat the criteria for ``other tabulated data'' will provide sufficientassurance that these regional practices will protect workers. The Agencyalso disagrees with the comment that non-uniform standards and practicescould lead to on site conflict and misunderstanding. OSHA has no evidencewhich shows the recognition of other local standards would cause any problemsor lessen employee protection. In fact, comment on this issue indicatesthat compliance would be more likely if OSHA permits the use of local standardsand practices with which employees and employers are already familiar.Finally, OSHA has determined that the most expeditious way to recognizethese local standards and practices is to evaluate them using the samecriteria required in the standard for ``other tabulated data,'' becausethat criteria will ensure adequate employee protection. Issue 15 of the NPRM (52 FR 12295) solicited comment on allowing a greaterdegree of employer flexibility in the design of protective systems. Inaddition, OSHA requested input on the type of information necessary toensure design adequacy. OSHA received 13 comments on this issue, and all of the commenters expressedsupport for the flexibility of the proposed amendment. Several commenters(Exs. 4-5, 4-13, 4-57, 4-82, 4-102, and 4-109) noted that some employerswill be irresponsible no matter what the rules are. Four commenters (Exs.4-82, 4-102, 4-106, and 4-109) also recommended that OSHA not specify factorsto be considered in a design, but require instead that the designs be inaccordance with accepted engineering practice. Other commenters, in addition to supporting the flexibility allowed bythe proposal, suggested several factors which should be included in thedesign of protective systems, in addition to soil tests and results, intendedor expected load conditions, environmental considerations, and design limitationslisted by OSHA in the proposal. These additional factors include the extentof vibration and depth of excavation (Ex. 4-105); surcharge, depth, andvibration (Ex. 4-17); and ground water elevations, materials specification,required monitoring devices, and dewatering requirements (Ex. 4-37). Anothercommenter (Ex. 4-28) suggested that such designs be made by a qualifiedengineer, using the criteria listed in the issue, and that such designsbe available at the job site. The commenter also recommended that OSHAnot recognize standard practices for trenches deeper than 20 feet. Two commenters (Exs. 4-17 and 4-101) recommended dropping ``qualified persons''from the standard. One of the commenters (Ex. 4-17) recommended the useof a registered professional engineer while the other (Ex. 4-101) usedthe term ``qualified engineer'' in its comment. Both recommended that OSHArequire the same design specifications that are required for manufacturedsystems. The last commenter (Ex. 4-115) supported the flexibility of the proposaland noted that it could eventually save millions of dollars. After careful consideration of the comments received, OSHA has determinedthat employers should have some flexibility in choosing a protective systemfor employees, but notes that, as discussed under Issue 2, original designwill now require the approval of a registered professional engineer. TheAgency has also determined that specific information should be includedon the design, in order to provide a minimum degree of safety, and additionalguidance should be provided by the system designer to employers concerningthe use proper of the design. Therefore, in regard to this issue, OSHA promulgates the standard as revised.Section 1926.650 Scope, Application and Definitions Applicable to thisSubpart Section 1926.650(a) states that this subpart applies to all open excavationsmade in earth surfaces and that excavations are defined to include trenches.Whenever the word ``excavation'' is used in the final standard, it appliesto all excavations, including those also falling within the definitionof a trench. In the preamble of the proposed rule OSHA included a statement intendedto clarify the Agency's jurisdiction with regard to excavations which fallunder the authority of other Federal agencies. The statement noted thatOSHA jurisdiction does not apply to working conditions which fall underthe statutory authority of other Federal agencies to prescribe or enforceoccupational safety or health regulations, if that authority is being exercised.This statement was directed primarily at excavations (surface mines) coveredby the Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA), because MSHA doesprescribe and enforce comprehensive regulations intended to ensure workersafety and health. Almost half of the total number of comments received during the commentperiod were sent by companies involved in excavations related to naturalgas pipelines. About 75 percent of these comments (e.g., Exs. 4-6, 4-8,and 4-14) expressed concern with two of the proposed paragraphs, andSection;1926.651(g)(1)(iii), hazardous atmospheres, and andSection; 1926.651(g)(2)(i),emergency rescue equipment. In general, these commenters stated that theproposed hazardous atmospheres provision was preempted by an existing Officeof Pipeline Safety (OPS) (of the Department of Transportation) regulationwhich directly addresses the same subject. In addition, these commentersalso stated that the proposed regulation for emergency rescue equipmentwas not appropriate for situations dealing with the repair or replacementof natural gas pipelines, since these were routine operations performedby trained personnel and not ``emergencies'' as understood in normal constructionoperations.Other commenters however, asserted that the OSHA excavation regulationsare preempted in their entirety by OPS regulations, even though those regulationsprovide very little guidance in the area of employee safety. OSHA raisedthis subject as an issue in the hearing notice (53 FR 5280) and receivedseveral comments (Exs. 8-11, 8-12, 8-13 and 8-17) and hearing testimony(Tr. 8/19/88 pp. 84-105) in response. Whether an OSHA standard is preempted by a regulation of another agency,such as OPS, will depend on the nature and scope of that regulation, andthe degree to which it regulates a working condition. For example, in <T3>Columbia Gas of Pennsylvania, Inc. </T3>v. <T3>Marshall, </T3>636 F.2d 913 (3rd Cir., 1980), the U.S. Court of Appealsfor the Third Circuit determined that existing paragraph (v) of andSection;1926.651, which required atmospheric testing in a trench where gaseousconditions are possible, was preempted under section 4(b)(1) of the OSHAct by an OPS regulation (49 CFR 192.751), which, in the Court's words,``envisions the working conditions faced by petitioner's employees'' (636F.2d at 916) in the trench. Where another Agency issues and enforces regulationscovering a particular working condition involving employee safety, OSHAcannot enforce its own standard which would otherwise cover that workingcondition. However, the other agency's regulation will be preemptive ofOSHA only insofar as it constitutes an exercise of statutory authorityover employee safety and health. It should be noted that although OSHAdoes not concur with much of the court's rationale on the scope of preemptionin Columbia Gas, the Agency acknowledges that current OPS regulations maywell have a preemptive effect over some provisions of this final OSHA standardon excavations. In considering the appropriate treatment of the preemption question, however,it must also be recognized that other agencies such as OPS may choose torevise or even revoke their regulations, and such actions would clearlyaffect the scope of any preemption. Were OPS to revoke a regulation whichpreempts an OSHA standard, OSHA authority would no longer be preemptedwith regard to the specific working condition. For these reasons, OSHAdoes not believe it appropriate to address preemption directly in the textof this final excavation standard. OSHA believes that preemption is moreappropriately addressed in the enforcement context, in which specific claimsof preemption can be evaluated and decided. Section 1926.650(b) lists and defines all major words used in the FinalRule. Many of the definitions are the same as those in the existing standardand the proposed revision. Others have been revised based on the record,and these changes will be discussed below as appropriate. Section 1926.650(b) defines ``accepted engineering practices'' as ``thoserequirements which are compatible with standards of practice required bya registered professional engineer.'' The existing definition, found in andSection; 1926.653(a), has been in usesince the standard was first promulgated in 1971, and reads as follows:``Those requirements or practices which are compatible with standards requiredby a registered architect, a registered professional engineer, or otherduly licensed or recognized authority.'' That definition was revised in the proposal to clarify its meaning, atthe suggestion of the ACCSH, and also as suggested in the industry sponsoredworkshops (Ex. 2-26) discussed above. The proposed definition read as follows:``Those requirements which are compatible with standards of practice requiredby a registered professional engineer or other duly-licensed or recognizedauthority.'' Prior to the publication of the proposed revision, OSHA received othersuggestions concerning this definition. These included: dropping the words``other duly-licensed or recognized authority'' because they are unclearand imply something broader and less demanding than the standards requiredby engineers; limiting ``accepted engineering practices'' to the standardsof practice required by a registered professional engineer, not just compatiblewith those standards of practice; and defining accepted engineering practicesas those described in published literature, such as a textbook. OSHA received six comments on this definition and on the suggestions setforth above. Four commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, 4-106, and 4-109) recommendedretaining the words ``compatible with'' in the definition, and objectedto defining accepted engineering practices as those described in publishedliterature, because that source is ambiguous. Two commenters, Granite Constructionand the Associated General Contractors (AGC) of California (Exs. 4-28 and4-106), agreed with the suggestion to drop the words ``or other duly-licensedor recognized authority'' because of the ambiguity of the terms. Finally,the National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health (Ex. 4-30) suggestedthat OSHA provide examples of ``other duly licensed or recognized authority,''for clarification purposes. Based on the above discussion and the Agency's desire to provide clearguidance to employers, OSHA is revising the definition to remove the phrase``or other duly licensed or recognized authority,'' which is ambiguousand confusing. However, the Agency is not adopting the suggestion to definethese practices as those described in published literature because, asdiscussed above, doing so would add further ambiguity.Section 1926.650(b) defines ``aluminum hydraulic shoring'' as ``a pre-engineeredshoring system comprised of aluminum hydraulic cylinders (crossbraces)used in conjunction with vertical rails (uprights) or horizontal rails(walers). Such a system is designed specifically to support the sidewallsof an excavation and prevent cave-ins.'' This new definition is includedto clarify the provisions of the new Appendix D (Aluminum Hydraulic Shoringfor Trenches) discussed in detail later in this preamble. Section 1926.650(b) defines ``bell-bottom pier hole'' as ``a type of shaftor footing excavation, the bottom of which is made larger than the crosssection above to form a belled shape.'' The definition for this term replacesthe definition for a similar term, ``belled excavation'' found in existingandSection; 1926.653(d). Although defined, the term ``belled excavation''is not used in the existing standards. Instead, the term ``bell-bottompier hole'' is used in existing andSection; 1926.652(f). OSHA proposed anew definition of ``bell-bottom pier hole'' to replace the term ``belledexcavations'', in order to make the standard consistent. The proposal defined ``bell-bottom pier hole'' as ``a type of shaft orfooting excavation, a portion of which is made larger than the cross sectionabove to form a belled shape.'' OSHA received three comments on this definition.CAL/OSHA and the Associated Builders and Contractors Inc. (ABC) (Exs. 4-4and 4-78) suggested the definition should read ``the bottom of which''not ``a portion of which'', since that more accurately describes the situation.The other commenter, Talbert Corporation (Ex. 4-72), suggested a completelyrevised definition in conjunction with a new section on excavation of pierholes. The commenter's suggestions are discussed in detail under Issue13 abcve. OSHA has determined that the amendment suggested by CAL/OSHAand ABC presents a more accurate description of the defined conditions.Section 1926.650(b) defines ``benching'' as ``a method of protecting employeesfrom cave-ins by excavating the sides of an excavation to form one or aseries of horizontal levels or steps, usually with vertical or near-verticalsurfaces between levels.'' This term is not used in the existing standardand therefore was not previously defined. The definition in the final ruleis virtually identical to the proposal, except that the word ``from'' hasbeen substituted for ``against,'' based on a general comment made by theACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, p. 448). No other comments were received on this definition.Section 1926.650(b) defines ``cave-in'' as ``the separation of a mass ofsoil or rock material from the side of an excavation, or the loss of soilfrom under a trench shield or support system, and its sudden movement intothe excavation, either by falling or sliding, in sufficient quantity sothat it could entrap, bury, or otherwise injure and immobilize a person.''The existing standard did not use or define the term ``cave-in,'' but usedthe terms ``moving ground'' and ``hazardous ground movement'' instead.However, neither of these terms was defined in the existing standard. Inorder to eliminate this deficiency and resolve the confusion as to whatthese terms mean, OSHA proposed to eliminate these two terms and replacethem with a definition of ``cave-in,'' which would accurately convey theintended concept of the hazard by describing the mechanism of the hazardand its results. The proposed definition stated that cave-in means, ``Theseparation of a mass of soil or rock material from the side of the excavationand its sudden movement into the excavation, either by falling or sliding,in sufficient quantity so that it could entrap, bury, or otherwise injureand immobilize a person.'' OSHA received two comments and an ACCSH recommendation (Tr. 8/5/87, pp.449-450) on this definition. Both the ACCSH and the Building and ConstructionTrades Department of the AFL-CIO (Ex. 4-17) noted that the definition didnot cover the loss of soil from under a shield or support system. The Agencyagrees that the hazard noted by the commenters needs to be addressed andhas revised the final rule to reflect this input. The Carolinas Branchof the Associated General Contractors of America (CBAGC) (Ex. 4-54) supportedthe proposed definition of cave-in, but recommended that the term ``hazardousmoving ground'' be retained and properly defined. However, CBAGC did notsuggest a definition for ``hazardous moving ground'' and did not explainthe rationale for recommending the inclusion of another term which hasa similar if not identical meaning to ``cave-in.'' Therefore, with regardto this recommendation, the Agency declines to act. Based on the above discussion, OSHA promulgates this definition as revised.Section 1926.650(b) defines ``competent person.'' This definition is identicalto the definition in andSection; 1926.32(f) of subpart C of the current ConstructionSafety and Health Standards. The term is used throughout existing subpartP, but was not defined within the subpart, and there were no referencesto the existing definition in subpart C. In the proposal, OSHA added thedefinition to subpart P to help those using the standard. In addition,an explanatory note was added at the end of the definition in order toclarify the Agency's intent that the ``competent person can act as theemployer's designee for the purpose of choosing a protective system fromthe options provided in andSection; 1926.652 (b) and (c) below, but cannottake an original design responsibility allowed by andSection; 1926.652 (b)(3),(c)(3) or (c)(4), unless otherwise qualified.'' Although the definition of ``competent person'' in andSection; 1926.650 hasnot been changed from the proposal and is the same as that in existingandSection; 1926.32, it is important to note that what constitutes a ``competentperson'' depends on the context in which the term is used. In order tobe a ``competent person'' for the purposes of this standard one must havehad specific training in, and be knowledgeable about, soils analysis, theuse of protective systems, and the requirements of this standard. One whodoes not have such training or knowledge cannot possibly be capable ofidentifying existing and predictable hazards in excavation work or takingprompt corrective measures. The Agency received only one comment on the actual definition. The MichiganDepartment of Labor (Ex. 4-46) recommended dropping the term from the standardand making a reference to either ``qualified person or qualified engineer.''OSHA declines to act on this suggestion. The ``competent person,'' as defined,is the appropriate person to use whenever an assessment of working conditionsmust be made with respect to safety. By definition, a competent personis capable of recognizing hazards and has the authority to correct them.By contrast, a ``qualified'' person or engineer, as defined in andSection;1926.32(l) might have more technical expertise, but would not necessarilyhave expertise in hazard recognition or the authority to correct identifiedhazards. OSHA did receive input from the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, p. 450) concerning theexplanatory note at the end of the definition. The ACCSH recommended deleting``or otherwise qualified'' from the note because it is ambiguous and thereis no other way to be qualified to develop original designs unless theperson is a registered professional engineer. The Agency recognizes thepotential confusion that could result if the note remained, and has decidedto delete the explanatory note from the Final Rule. Section 1926.650(b) defines ``cross braces'' as ``the horizontal membersof a shoring system installed perpendicular to the sides of the excavation,the ends of which bear against either uprights or wales.'' This definitionis identical to the proposed definition, and replaces the existing definition``braces (trench).'' In the proposal, the term ``stringers'' was droppedfrom the current definitions and replaced with the term ``wales.'' Theexisting standard defines ``wales'' and ``stringers'' identically as ``thehorizontal members of a shoring system whose sides bear against the uprightsor earth.'' OSHA believes use of the term ``wales,'' which is more consistentwith industry terminology, would improve the definition of ``cross braces.''The Agency received no comment on this definition, and therefore, promulgatesthis definition as proposed. Section 1926.650(b) defines ``excavation'' as ``any man-made cut, cavity,trench, or depression in an earth surface, formed by earth removal.'' Theexisting definition in andSection; 1926.653(f) defines ``excavation'' as``any man-made cavity or depression In the earth's surface including itssides, walls, or faces, formed by earth removal and producing unsupportedearth conditions by reason of the excavation. If installed forms or similarstructures reduce the depth-to-width relationship, an excavation may becomea trench.'' In the proposal, the definition was revised to read ``any man-madecut, cavity, trench, or depression in an earth surface, formed by earthremoval, and producing unsupported earth conditions (sides, faces).'' OSHA received two comments (Exs. 4-17 and 4-91) on the definition, anda recommendation from the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, p. 451-52). All the commentersrecommended removing ``and producing unsupported earth conditions (sides,faces),'' because the phrase is confusing and is not necessary to the definition.The Agency agrees that this phrase could cause confusion and, therefore,promulgates this definition as revised. Section 1926.650(b) defines ``faces'' or ``sides'' as ``the vertical orinclined earth surfaces formed as a result of excavation work.'' This definitionand the proposed definition are identical to existing andSection; 1926.653(k),except that the term ``walls'' was dropped from the standard. The Agencyreceived no comments on this definition and therefore promulgates it asproposed.Section 1926.650(b) defines ``failure'' as ``the breakage, displacement,or permanent deformation of a structural member or connection so as toreduce its structural integrity and its supportive capabilities.'' Thisdefinition is intended to apply to protective systems and to the membersand connections of protective systems, where applicable. Use of the conceptof ``failure'' introduces a measure for the performance of protective systems,their members, and their connections. Such a measure is not present inthe existing standard. This concept will help clarify the intent of thestandard and the duty of employers to provide adequate protective systems. There is no definition of failure in the current standard. In the NPRM,OSHA proposed to define ``failure'' as ``the breakage, displacement, orpermanent deformation of a structural member or connection as to affectits supportive capabilities.'' The Agency received two comments on thisdefinition. The Building and Construction Trades Department of the AFL-CIO(Ex. 4-17) merely noted that this was a narrow structural definition. However,CAL/OSHA (Ex. 4-4) suggested revising the definition to read ``so as to<T3>reduce</T3> its <T3>structural integrity</T3> and its supportive capabilities'' (emphasisadded). The commenter felt the revision was necessary to explain more fullywhat constitutes failure. The Agency believes this revision will help clarifythe regulatory intent and therefore promulgates this definition as revised.Section 1926.650(b) defines ``hazardous atmosphere'' as ``an atmospherewhich by reason of being explosive, flammable, poisonous, corrosive, oxidizing,irritating, oxygen deficient, toxic, or otherwise harmful, may cause death,illness, or injury.'' This definition is identical to the proposed definition,which was taken, with some modification, from the definition of ``hazardoussubstance'' in existing andSection; 1926.32(k).  OSHA received seven comments on this definition (Exs. 4-21, 4-23, 4-31, 4-40, 4-42, 4-78, and 4-86). All commenters recommended removing the word``irritating'' from the definition because irritating and hazardous aredifferent. The Agency disagrees with these commenters because irritatingsubstances can incapacitate employees to a point that would hamper escapeduringan emergency, or cause employees to rush jobs, thereby increasing the likelihoodof mistakes and accidents. For example, OSHA notes that it is not uncommonto encounter hydrogen sulfide in excavations. This substance is anirritantat very low concentrations, deadens the sense of smell at or below 100parts per million, and can be lethal in a very short time at concentrationsof 400 parts per million or less. Therefore, OSHA declines to make therequested revisions and promulgates this definition as proposed.  Section 1926.650(b) defines ``kickout'' as ``the accidental release orfailure of a cross brace.'' This definition is identical to the proposeddefinition, which was  taken from existing andSection; 1926.653(i) with somemodification. This  definition was changed by substituting the new term``cross  brace'' for the current term ``brace,'' and by dropping reference to the term ``shore.'' The first change was made for purposes  of consistencyin the use of terms. The second change was  made in order to clarify thedefinition. The term ``shore,'' as  used in the current definition of ``kickout,''is not defined.  However, in accordance with accepted industry terminology,a  ``shore'' is considered to be a vertical member, such as a post,  oras defined in the current standard, an ``upright.'' It is  not OSHA's intention,however, to define ``kickout'' as failure  of any vertical member. Therefore,use of the term ``shore''  was dropped in the proposed revisions of ``kickout.'' OSHA received no comment on this proposed revision and,  therefore, promulgatesthis definition as proposed.  Section 1926.650(b) defines ``protective system'' as ``a  method of protectingemployees from cave-ins, from material  that could fall or roll from anexcavation face or into an  excavation, or from the collapse of adjacentstructures.  Protective systems include support systems, sloping and  benchingsystems, shield systems, and other systems that  provide the necessaryprotection.'' This term is not defined  in the existing standard. Referenceswere made throughout the  proposal to ``protective systems.'' The approachtaken in the proposed standard was to classify, under the term ``protectivesystem,'' all systems and methods of protecting employees from the hazardsset forth in the definition.  OSHA received two comments (Exs. 4-17 and 4-91) and input from the ACCSH(Tr. 8/5/87 p. 456) recommending that ``against cave-ins'' be changed to``from cave-ins.'' The Agency agrees with this change and, therefore, promulgatesthis definition as revised.  Proposed andSection; 1926.650(b)(13), which defined ``qualified engineer''and proposed andSection; 1926.650(b)(14), defining ``qualified person,''have both been deleted from the final rule. The rationale for these deletionswere discussed in detail above, under Issue 2. Although the Agency receivedother comments on this definition, the points raised are more pertinentto other parts of the standard and will be discussed in the appropriatesection of this preamble below.  Section 1926.650(b) of the Final Rule defines ``ramp'' as ``an inclinedwalking or working surface that is used to gain access to one point fromanother, and is constructed from earth or from structural materials suchas steel or wood.'' This definition is basically identical to proposedandSection; 1926.650(b)(15) except for an editorial revision, moving ``thatis'' from before ``constructed'' to before ``used.'' The Agency receivedno comment on this definition and, therefore, promulgates this definitionas revised. Section 1926.650(b) of this Final Rule defines ``registered professionalengineer'' as ``a person who is registered as a professional engineer inthe state where the work is to be performed. However, a professional engineer,registered in any state is deemed to be a `registered professional engineer'within the meaning of this standard when approving designs for `manufacturedprotective systems' or `tabulated data' to be used in interstate commerce.''This definition is similar to the definition recommended by the ACCSH (Tr.8/5/87 p. 466) which was also proposed in the Notice of Informal PublicHearing (53 FR 5281). However, OSHA is deleting language from that definitionwhich becomes unnecessary because the Agency intends to rely on state registrationof professional engineers to demonstrate that the person approving designsis, in fact, qualified. In addition, the Agency is providing an exceptionto the requirement that a registered professional engineer within the meaningof this standard be licensed in the state in which work is being performed.A professional engineer registered in any state (as defined in section3(7) of the OSH Act) who designs support systems, shield systems, or otherprotective systems that are to be manufactured and used in interstate commerce,or who prepared ``tabulated data'' to be used in interstate commerce, isdeemed to be a ``registered professional engineer''  within the meaningof this standard. To limit such work to engineers licensed in the statein which the work is being performed would unduly burden the manufacturersof protective systems and may be counterproductive to employee safety.Moreover, the possibility of product liability actions if manufacturedsystems fail should assure that ``manufactured protective devices'' and``tabulated data'' of general applicability will be designed prudently.The incentive to design manufactured systems safely to avoid such lawsuitsis an adequate substitute for the incentive of an in-state engineer toavoid risking his or her professional license.  Section 1926.650(b) defines ``sheeting'' as ``the members of a shoringsystem that retain the earth in position, and in turn are supported byother members of the shoring system.'' This definition contains some wordingfrom the current definition of ``sheet pile'' (andSection; 1926.653(i)).The definition for ``sheet pile'' has been dropped since the term is notused in the final standard. ``Sheeting'' is a broader term. It includesall special types of sheeting, including sheet piles, where the purposeis to retain earth in position.  In the proposal, andSection; 1926.650(b)(16) defined ``sheeting'' as ``themembers of a shoring system such as dimensional lumber uprights, plywood,or other materials that are driven or placed in contact with the earth,usually in a vertical position, for the purpose of retaining the earthin position  and in turn being supported by other members of the shoringsystem.''  OSHA received three comments on this definition and input from the ACCSH.Two commenters (Exs. 4-17 and 4-91) and the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87 p. 741) recommendeddeletion of ``such as dimensional lumber uprights * * * for the purposeof * * *'' The only other commenter (Ex. 4-111) noted that the standarddid not include directions on the use of plywood, but made no suggestionas to what those directions should be.  The Agency has determined that the recommended deletion is appropriate,as the examples cited could give the false impression that only wood wasacceptable as sheeting. The proposed definition contained the phrase ``orother materials,'' in recognition of other equally effective materials,such as steel sheeting, but the Agency understands that the definition,as phrased, could be misinterpreted, and has made the recommended deletion. In addition, the Agency recognizes that the standard does not include directionsfor the use of plywood, but notes that the use of tabulated data for protectivesystems which utilize plywood sheeting, or a design prepared by a registeredprofessional engineer utilizing plywood sheeting, is acceptable under thestandard. Additionally, OSHA does not believe it is necessary to providedirections for all variations of protective system design.   Therefore, based on the above discussion the Agency promulgates this definitionas revised. Section 1926.650(b) of the Final Rule defines ``shield'' as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">A structure that is able to withstand the forces imposed on it bya cave-in and thereby protect employees within the structure. Shields canbe permanent structures or can be designed to be portable and moved alongas work progresses. Additionally, shields can be either premanufacturedor job built in accordance with andSection; 1926.652(c)(3) or (c)(4). Shieldsused in trenches are usually referred to as ``trench boxes'' or ``trenchshields.''</ITAG>The definition replaces existing andSection; 1926.653(p) which defines ``trenchshield'' as ``a shoring system composed of steel plates and bracing, weldedor bolted together, which support the walls of a trench from the groundlevel to the trench bottom and which can be moved along as work progresses,''and it replaces the proposed definition andSection; 1926.650(b)(17) whichdefined ``shield'' as:<ITAG tagnum="21">A structure that normally will not prevent a cave-in, but is ableto withstand the forces imposed on it by a cave-in and thereby protectemployees within the structure. Shields can be permanent or can be designedto be portable and moved along as work progresses. Additionally, shieldscan be either premanufactured or job-built, in accordance with andSection;1926.652 (c)(3) or (c)(4). Shields used in trenches are usually referredto as ``trench boxes'' or ``trench shields.''</ITAG>The concept of a shield, as used in both the proposed and final standards,is different from the concept of a shield as    defined in the existingstandard. The major difference however, is the manner in which shieldsare defined with respect to how they provide protection. Unlike the currentstandard, the proposed and final standards do not refer to shields as deviceswhich provide protection to employees by supporting the sides of an excavationand thereby preventing cave-ins. Instead shields generally do not preventcave-ins, but, rather, protect employees from cave-ins that do occur. Theyprovide a limited but safe, sheltered space in which employees work. Inaddition, the new definitions do not place any limits on the material fromwhich a shield may be constructed. Shields are one of several types of protective systems that may be usedto guard employees from cave-ins and other hazards. Some shields are designedto be expandable. Once in place they can be altered such that their facesare pressed against and actually begin to support the sides of the excavation.In this configuration, depending on the degree of support provided, sucha device may also be considered a support system. OSHA received three comments and input from the ACCSH on this definition.Two commenters (Exs. 4-17 and 4-91) and the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87 p.474) recommendeddeletion of the phrase ``normally will not prevent a cave-in but'' becausethey felt the language was gratuitous and misleading. The third    commenter(Ex. 4-111) suggested that the definition should read ``not designed toprevent a cave-in.'' The Agency disagrees with the suggestion that shieldsare not designed to prevent a cave-in, and notes that some shields, infact, are designed to be expandable, and can support the sides of excavations.On the other hand, the Agency agrees with the ACCSH and the other two commentersthat the language noted above could be misleading and unnecessary and therefore,deleted this phrase. However, the Agency declines to delete the sentencestating that a shield could be either premanufactured or job-built, asrecommended by ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87 p. 474) and two commenters (Exs. 4-17and 4-91). OSHA assumes the commenters opposed to this part of the definitioninterpreted this sentence as giving total discretion to employers in regardto job-built shields. However, the Agency's regulatory intent is that job-builtshields must be built in accordance with the options provided in andSection;1926.652(c)(3) and (c)(4). The Final Rule has been revised to clarify thispoint. Section 1926.650(b) of the Final Rule defines ``shoring'' (shoring system)as ``a structure such as a metal hydraulic, mechanical, or timber shoringsystem that supports the sides of an excavation and which is designed toprevent cave-ins.'' This term is not defined in the existing standard,even though it is extensively used. The final definition is     almostidentical to the proposed definition in  andSection; 1926.650(b)(19), exceptthat ``metal hydraulic'' shoring is  included in the Final Rule, as recommendedby the only  commenter (Ex. 4-114). OSHA agrees that ``metal hydraulic'' shoring is used extensively and should be included in the  definitionas an example.  Section 1926.650(b) of the Final Rule defines ``sides''  by referring thereader to the definition of ``faces.''  Section 1926.650(b) of the Final Rule defines  ``sloping'' (sloping system)as ``a method of protecting  employees from cave-ins by excavating to formsides of an  excavation that are inclined away from the excavations asto  prevent cave-ins. The angle of incline required to prevent a  cave-invaries with differences in such factors as the soil  type, environmentalconditions of exposure, and application of  surcharge loads.'' This definitionis virtually identical to  the proposed definition, except that ``againstcave-ins'' was  changed to ``from cave-ins'' as recommended by the ACCSH. The definition of ``slope'' found in existing andSection; 1926.653(1)  wasnot used in the proposal because the concept in that  definition was notapplicable in the proposed standard. The  existing definition states that``slope'' means ``the angle with  the horizontal at which a particularearth material will stand  indefinitely without movement.''  The proposed and final definitions of ``sloping'' both    address a broaderconcept of employee protection by referring to ``systems'' or ``methods''of protection which prevent cave-ins. The definitions recognize that theslope or multiple slopes used in a sloping system can vary with the soiltypes involved and site conditions. OSHA received one comment (Ex. 4-46) on this definition, other than theeditorial comment by the ACCSH. The one commenter recommended that ``sloping''should be called ``angle of repose'' and that OSHA should include a definitionfor ``underpinning.'' OSHA disagrees with the suggestion to use the term``angle of repose'' for the reasons discussed above in the section entitled``Problems with the Existing Standard.'' The Agency also declines to definethe term ``underpinning,'' because the Agency believes the term is alreadyreadily understood by the construction industry. Section 1926.650(b) of the Final Rule defines ``stable rock'' as naturalsolid mineral material that can be excavated with vertical sides and willremain intact while exposed. Unstable rock is considered to be stable whenthe rock material on the side or sides of the excavation is secured againstcaving-in or movement by rock bolts or by another protective system thathas been designed by a registered professional engineer. The proposed definition of ``stable rock,'' in paragraph (b)(21), was similarexcept that it did not use the phrase     ``natural solid mineral material''and the second sentence of  the definition was an explanatory note; anddesign by a  ``qualified engineer or a qualified person'' was permitted. There was no definition for rock or rock conditions in the  existing standard.Reference was made to rock in the existing  standard in the footnotes toTable P-2, ``Trench Shoring_Minimum Requirements.'' The footnotes statedthat ``Shoring is  not required in solid rock, hard shale, or hard slag.'' It is recognized in the industry that excavations in rock  normally donot present a cave-in hazard because of the  inherent stability of rock,and the ability of rock to carry  loads. However, rock varies to a greatextent in its ability  to remain intact while exposed, just as soil does.There are  conditions that are found in some rock formations, such as fractures and seams of less stable material, that can present  serioushazards. When such conditions are encountered in  rock, such as shale whichcontains layers of clay, the rock  cannot be considered stable.  The proposed definition for ``stable rock'' was developed  from the definitionthat was proposed by the National Bureau  of Standards (NBS) at the abovediscussed workshops.  Originally, NBS used the term ``unfractured rock,''instead of  ``stable rock.'' However, many comments were made that it is impossible to excavate any rock without fracturing it in some  way. TheConstruction Advisory Committee suggested that the    definition be changedto ``stable rock'' (Ex. 2-8, p. 356). This recommendation was incorporatedinto the NBS definition.   Unstable rock, i.e. rock that cannot be excavated with vertical sides andremain intact while exposed, can be made stable if a proper system is usedto support the excavation side. A note to this effect was placed at theend of the proposed definition of ``stable rock'' to alert the user tothis possibility. Finally, OSHA has adopted the ASTM term ``natural solidmineral matter'' to define rock for clarity. OSHA received two comments (Exs. 4-17 and 4-111) and input from the ACCSH(Tr. 8/5/87 p. 475), concerning the term ``qualified person'' in the proposeddefinition. All three commenters recommended deletion of ``qualified person.''One commenter (Ex. 4-17) and the ACCSH recommended changing ``qualifiedengineer'' to registered professional engineer, similar to the recommendationsreceived on Issue 2, discussed above. An editorial change has been made to incorporate the proposed explanatorynote into the second sentence of the final definition.  Therefore, based on the record, OSHA promulgates this definition as revised.Section 1926.650(b) of the Final Rule defines ``structural ramp'' as ``aramp built of steel or wood, usually for vehicle access. Ramps made ofsoil or rock are not considered structural ramps.'' Proposed paragraph (b)(22) defined ``structural ramps'' as ``ramps builtof material other than soil or rock.'' The Agency received one comment(Ex. 4-106) which suggested the definition should be expanded to describeclearly a ramp of steel or wood for vehicle access. Since this is in linewith the Agency's regulatory intent, the Agency agrees to amend the definitionto express more clearly what OSHA considers to be a structural ramp. Section 1926.650(b) defines ``support system'' as ``a structure such asunderpinning, bracing, or shoring, which provides support to an adjacentstructure, underground installation, or the sides of an excavation.'' Theproposed definition, paragraph (b)(23), is identical to this final definition.There is no definition of support system in the existing standard. However,examples of supporting systems are given in existing andSection; 1926.651(f),such as ``supporting system; i.e., piling, cribbing, shoring, etc., * **'' Theconcept of a support system as used in the proposed standard remainedthe same as in the existing standard. The definition was included to providea more clearly defined concept. A ``support system'' is one type of protective system. It should be notedthat a ``shoring system'' is a type of support system. Support systemsare more broadly defined than shoring systems to include structures thatsupport adjacent structures or underground facilities, whereas shoringsystems are defined as systems that support the sides of an excavation.The Agency received no comments on this definition. Therefore, the Agencypromulgates this definition as proposed. Section 1926.650(b) of the Final Rule defines ``tabulated data'' as ``tablesand charts approved by a registered professional engineer, and used todesign and construct a protective system.'' The definition of tabulated data in paragraph (b)(24) of the proposal didnot recognize the use of local practices, and required preparation by a``qualified person'' or ``qualified engineer.'' The changes made to theFinal Rule are based on the discussion of Issue 2 (qualified person/qualifiedengineer) and Issue 14 (regional practices). In addition, OSHA receivedtwo comments (Exs. 4-17 and 4-111) and input from the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87pp. 475-76). All of these commenters recommended dropping ``qualified person,''and two commenters (Ex. 4-17 and the ACCSH) supported changing ``qualifiedengineer'' to ``registered professional engineer.'' The Agency believes that most tabulated data provides the flexibility necessaryto make minor adjustments to the protective system without requiring theapproval of an engineer provided those changes do not exceed the designlimitationsof the data. The OSHA Tables in Appendix C, for example, provide flexibilityby permitting two or more shoring configurations, in most case, for givensite conditions. This allows the employer to choose the configuration thatbest fits the particular circumstances. Flexibility also is provided inthat the spacing prescribed by some tabulated data is normally the maximumspacing permitted. Of course, an employer can always decrease the spacingof members and still be in compliance. For example an employer, using aconfiguration that allows a maximum horizontal spacing of six feet foruprights, could encounter a situation where the positioning of an uprightat a six foot interval is not feasible due to an obstruction. In this situation,the employer could decrease the spacing for that upright or set of uprightswhatever is necessary to address the situation. This type of change iswithin the limitations of the tabulated data, and would not require approvalof a registered professional engineer. If, on the other hand, the employerwanted to increase the spacing to 6\1/2\ feet or more, that change wouldexceed the design limitations of the data and would require approval bya registered professional engineer. The approval is necessary to ensurethat, in the event of a cave-in, the capacity of individual componentswould not be exceeded resulting in a failure of the system. Section 1926.650(b) of the Final Rule defines ``trench'' (trench excavation)as ``a narrow excavation (in relation to its length) made below the surfaceof the ground. In general, the depth is greater than the width, but thewidth of a trench (measured at the bottom) is not greater than 15 feet(4.6 m). If forms or other structures are installed or constructed in anexcavation so as to reduce the dimension measured from the forms or structureto the side of the excavation to 15 feet (4.6 m) or less (measured at thebottom of the excavation), the excavation is also considered to be a ``trench.''This definition is virtually identical to the definition proposed in andSection;1926.650(b)(25) except that the explanatory note has been incorporatedinto the text of the definition. This definition remains basically unchangedfrom the current definition in existing andSection; 1926.653(n). The changesthat have been made are for the purpose of clarifying the definition. Forexample, the words ``trench excavation'' have been added to indicate moreclearly that trenches are considered to be excavations. A note was added to the end of the definition of the word ``trench'' inthe proposal. The substance of the note came from the second part of theexisting definition of ``excavation'' found in existing andSection; 1926.653(f)and addresses depth-to-width relationships in trenches. The wording wasrevised to indicate more clearly how a portion of a large excavation canbecome a trench, for purposes of the proposed standard, as a result ofcreating a relatively narrow space between the side of an excavation anda structure that has been constructed in the excavation. The proposal and the Final Rule are formatted to indicate that most ofthe provisions of the standards apply to all types of excavations. However,some of the provisions of subpart P apply only to excavations that aretrenches. Forexample, andSection; 1926.651(c)(2) sets forth special requirementsfor means of access and egress in trenches, and andSection; 1926.652(c)(1)sets forth the option of using Appendices A and C for determining the configurationof timber shoring in trenches. Those provisions in the proposal, and nowthe Final Rule, that apply only to trenches are clearly indicated by useof the word ``trench'' within the provision. The only input OSHA received on this point was an ACCSH recommendation(Tr. 8/5/87 p. 480-482) to state specifically that the terms ``trench''and ``excavation'' are interchangeable. The Agency declines to adopt thisrecommendation because those provisions which apply or are appropriateonly for trenches cannot be clearly defined if the two terms are used interchangeably.Blurring this distinction would introduce uncertainty into the standardand would not provide clear guidance to employers as to what provisionsapply. Section 1926.650(b) defines ``trench box'' and ``trench shield'' and refersthe reader to the definition of ``shield.'' OSHA received no comment onthese definitions and promulgates these definitions as proposed.Section 1926.650(b) of the Final Rule defines ``uprights'' as ``the verticalmembers of a trench shoring system placed in contact with the earth andusually positioned so that individual members do not contact each other.Uprights placed so that individual members are closely spaced, in contactwith or interconnected to each other, are often called sheeting.'' Thisdefinition is virtually identical to the proposed definition in andSection;1926.650(b)(28), except that the explanatory note has been incorporatedinto the text of the definition. This definition revises the definition in existing andSection; 1926.653(r).The definition was changed in the proposal to be more consistent with definitionsof other shoring system members that were in the proposed standard, andto expand the concept of the term. The term ``uprights,'' as used in the proposed standard, referred onlyto vertical members used in trench shoring systems. Such uprights are usuallyspaced some distance apart when in position. Normally uprights are referredto as ``sheeting'' when they are very closely spaced, in contact with adjacentuprights, or interconnected. This definition of ``uprights'' is intendedto clarify the application of the proposal in each of these positions.Section 1926.650(b) of the Final Rule defines ``wales'' as ``horizontalmembers of a shoring system placed parallel to the excavation face whosesides bear against the vertical members of the shoring system or earth.''This definition is identical to the proposed definition in paragraph (b)(29).Section 1926.653(s) of the current standard refers the reader to existingandSection; 1926.653(m) for the definition of ``wales.'' That paragraph statesthat ``stringers'' (wales) are ``the horizontal members of a shoring systemwhose sides bear against the uprights or earth.'' However, the term ``stringers''is also referred to in existing andSection; 1926.650(d) as the supports forplank steps, which is inconsistent with its definition. OSHA addressed this problem by dropping use of the word ``stringers.''In the proposal, only the term ``wales'' was defined and used to referto the horizontal members of a shoring system. The term ``stringers'' didnot appear in the proposal nor does it appear in the Final Rule. OSHA received no comment on the definition and, therefore, promulgatesthis definition as proposed. For reasons to be discussed below, the following terms which are containedin the current standard are not used, and therefore need not be definedin the Final Rule: andSection; 1926.653(b) ``Angle of repose''; andSection;1926.653(c) ``Bank''; andSection; 1926.653(h) ``Hard, compact soil''; andSection;1926.653(j) ``Sheet pile''; andSection; 1926.653(l) ``Slope''; andSection;1926.653(m) ``Stringers''; andSection; 1926.653(o) ``Trench jack''; andSection;1926.653(q) ``Unstable soil''; and andSection; 1926.653(t) ``Walls.'' The term ``angle of repose,'' as defined in the existing standard, is notconsistent with its use in the civil engineering field. The existing definitionin andSection; 1926.653(b) defines ``angle of repose'' as ``the greatestangle above the horizontal plane at which a material will lie without sliding.''The specific standards in existing andSection; 1926.651(e), andSection; 1926.651(g)and andSection; 1926.651(h) speak of determining the ``angle of repose,''``excavating to the angle of repose,'' and flattening the ``angle of repose,''all of which suggest that a single ``angle of repose'' can be determinedfor any particular soil. However, in the American Society for Testing andMaterials Standard D653-67, ``Standard Definitions of Terms and SymbolsRelating to Soil and Rock Mechanics,'' ``angle of repose'' is defined asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Angle between the horizontal and maximum slope that a soil assumesthrough natural processes. For dry granular soils the effect of heightis negligible; for cohesive soils the effect of height of slope is so greatthat the ``angle of repose'' is meaningless.</ITAG>What this essentially means is that there is no one ``angle of repose''for a given type of soil, for in practice, most soils encountered havesome degree of cohesion. In addition, while the ``angle of repose'' forgranular soils is unaffected by the height of the cut, it does change inresponse to soil density, and in changes to environmental conditions orexposure. The concept of ``angle of repose,'' as used in the current standard, differsfrom that accepted by the civil engineering community and has led to confusionas to the meaning and intent of the standard. To eliminate this confusion,OSHA believes that use of the term ``angle of repose'' should not be continued.Therefore, it was not used in the proposed standard and it is not usedin the final standard. The term ``bank'' is defined in existing andSection; 1926.653(c) as ``a massof soil rising above a digging level.'' The definition is not entirelyclear in its meaning because the use of the term ``digging level.'' TheOSHRC has interpreted the term ``digging level'' to mean ``the level atwhich digging is commenced'' (2 BNA OSHC 1130). Under this interpretation,the sides of trenches would not be considered ``banks'' because the sidesof trenches would be below ``the digging level'' rather than above it.However, the wording of existing andSection; 1926.652(a) suggests that sidesof trenches be included in the meaning of the term ``bank.'' For example,existing andSection; 1926.652 states:``Banks more than five feet high shall be shored, laid back to a stableslope, or some other equivalent means of protection shall be provided whereemployees may be exposed to moving ground or cave-ins.'' The OSHRC interpretationdoes not conflict with the above wording. However, andSection; 1926.652 goeson to state: ``Trenches less than five feet in depth shall also be effectivelyprotected * * *.'' Thus, the OSHRC interpretation is a contradiction tothe wording of existing andSection; 1926.652(a). In addition, existing andSection;1926.652(a) makes the statement: ``Refer to Table P-1 as a guide in slopingof banks.'' Table P-1 is titled ``approximate Angle of Repose for Slopingof Sides of Excavations.'' Thus, ``banks'' and ``sides'' are again equated.OSHA is eliminating the use of the term ``bank'' to eliminate the problemsdiscussed above. The terms ``hard, compact soil'' and ``unstable soil'' were used in theexisting standard to describe particular soil conditions. These terms werenot used in the proposal,and are not found in the Final Rule. All soilconditions will now be defined in a completely new soil classificationsystem which does not use the terms ``hard, compact soil'' or ``unstablesoil.'' (See discussion of appendix A, Soil Classification, below.) The reasons for eliminating the definitions for ``sheet pile,'' ``slope,''and ``walls'' have been discussed above. The term ``trench jack'' was also not used in the proposed standard orin the Final Rule and needs not to be defined. Section 1926.651 General Requirements Section 1926.651 of the Final Rule contains requirements for the protectionof employees against several different types of hazards of excavation-relatedwork. The section is arranged with eleven major paragraphs, most of whichare revisions of the current requirements in existing andSection;andSection;1926.650, 1926.651, and 1926.652. Changes have been made to clarify ambiguouslanguage and eliminate redundant requirements. Some paragraphs have beenreformatted to improve ease of understanding. Other revisions have beenmade to clarify OSHA's intentions as to the scope and application of currentprovisions. New requirements have been added to protect employees againstknown hazards where gaps in coverage currently exist. Section 1926.651(a), ``surface encumbrances,'' requires that ``all surfaceencumbrances that are located so as to create a hazard to employees shallbe removed or supported, as necessary, to safeguard employees.'' This provisionis similar to the proposed provisions which required that ``Trees, boulders,and other surface encumbrances that are located so as to create a hazardto employees shall be made safe or removed.'' The proposal noted the hazardpresented by surface encumbrances, including trees and boulders, primarilyarises if excavation operations undermine or otherwise cause such encumbrancesto become unstable and fall or collapse onto employees. Surface encumbrancescan also impede smooth traffic flow on excavation sites. The wording ofthe proposed requirement is essentially the same as in existing requirementandSection; 1926.651(b). The requirement applies to all employees involved in construction activitiesat the worksite. The existing paragraph includes the wording ``involvedin excavation work or in the vicinity thereof at any time during operations.''OSHA proposed to drop this additional wording as it is redundant. The requirement that surface encumbrances be removed or made safe ``beforeexcavating is begun'' did not appear in the proposal. In many instances,it is not feasible to remove all surface encumbrances from a site beforeexcavating is begun simply because the site is too large. The proposalrequired such removal but implied that this action would be taken as thesurface encumbrances are encountered. OSHA received two comments (Exs. 4-4 and 4-46), and input from the ACCSH(Tr. 8/5/87 p. 482) on this provision. The ACCSH recommended eliminatingthe words ``trees, boulders, and other'' and replacing these examples with``all.'' One commenter, CAL/OSHA (Ex.4-4), suggested adding ``spoil pile''to the list of surface encumbrances. The other commenter, the MichiganDepartment of Labor (Ex. 4-46), recommended clarifying the phrase ``shallbe made safe'' because it is ambiguous. The Agency has determined thatthe ACCSH recommendation best expresses OSHA's regulatory intent and alsoaddresses the concern expressed by one commenter. In addition, the Agencyhas clarified the meaning of ``shall be made safe'' by defining what actionsthe employer must take. Therefore, based on the comments received OSHApromulgates andSection; 1926.651(a), as revised.Section 1926.651(b) of the Final Rule specifies requirements for dealingwith existing utility and other underground installations that may be encounteredduring excavation operations. Underground installations include all typesof utility lines either in service or abandoned. They also include foundationsand underground storage tanks of all kinds. Employees may be exposed to serious hazards as a result of damage to undergroundinstallations. Flooding, shock, asphyxiation, electrocution, fire, explosion,and collapse of undermined installations are some of the hazards that resultwhen underground installations are damaged. These hazards can be eliminatedif the locations of underground installations are properly identified priorto excavation, and if such installations are properly supported or protectedwhen excavation takes place near them. Paragraph (b)(1) of the Final Rule requires that ``The estimated locationof utility installations, such as sewer, telephone, fuel, electric, waterlines, or any other underground installations that reasonably may be expectedto be encountered during excavation work, shall be determined prior toopening an excavation.'' This requirement is identical to the proposal.The proposal differed from the existing standard, andSection; 1926.651(a),which required only that an effort be made to determine whether such installationswill be encountered and, if so, where such underground installations arelocated. At the suggestion of the ACCSH (Ex. 2-8, p. 358), the proposal was mademore stringent than the existing rule by requiring the employer to determinethe estimated location, at a minimum. OSHA believes that the revision isneeded to prevent many of the accidents resulting from damage to undergroundinstallations. The proposed language was intended to insure that the effortto locate existing installations is carried to the point where, at thevery minimum, an estimated location is determined. OSHA recognizes that the existence of underground installations is notalways readily apparent. However, in many locations there are featureswhich would indicate the presence of underground installations. An exampleof this would be that in a housing subdivision where there are no utilitypoles, it could reasonably be assumed that certain utilities are undergroundin this situation. The proposal also recognized those situations in whichunderground installations are not known to exist beforehand, but can bedetermined through the exercise of reasonable diligence prior to excavating.OSHA received one comment (Ex. 4-91) on this provision which supportedthe proposed language. OSHA also received ACCSH input (Tr. 8/5/87 pp. 483-486)which recommended removing the word ``estimated'' from the provision. TheAgency declines to make this change, noting that it is not always possibleto get an exact location of an underground utility installation prior toopening an excavation. The Agency believes that a reasonable determinationof the estimated location, combined with notification of the affected utility,and a cautious determination of the exact location of the utility linewhen excavation approaches the estimated location, will provide adequateemployee protection. Therefore, OSHA promulgates andSection; 1926.651(b)(1), as proposed. Section 1926.651(b)(2) of the Final Rule requires that ``Utility companiesor owners shall be contacted within established or customary local responsetimes, advised of proposed work, and asked to establish the location ofthe utility underground installations prior to the start of actual excavation.When utility companies or owners cannot respond to a request to locateunderground utility installations within twenty-four hours (unless a longerperiod is required by state or local law), or cannot establish the exactlocation of these installations the employer may proceed, provided theemployer does so with caution, and provided detection equipment or otheracceptable means to locate utility installations are used.'' This provision is similar to the proposal, but has been amended to clarifyOSHA's regulatory intent and to address comments concerning coverage, asdiscussed below. The proposed provision was unchanged from the existingstandard, which required, in andSection; 1926.651(a) that ``utility companiesshall be contacted and advised of proposed work prior to the start of actualexcavation.'' OSHA received three comments and input from the ACCSH on the proposed provision.One commenter (Ex. 4-28) noted that not all underground installations areowned and operated by utility companies. OSHA agrees and has amended thefinal rule to reflect this point. The ACCSH had an extensive discussion (Tr. 8/5/87 pp. 486-494) on a requirementrecommended to the full committee by an ACCSH study group. This requirementwould prohibit the start of an excavation until the utility company markedthe exact location and depth of their underground installations. Duringthe discussion, several participants noted the difficulty of determiningthe exact location of underground installations, and they related instanceswhere detecting equipment was put on the bucket of a backhoe to locateinstallations that even the owners could not pinpoint. Other participantsrecommended differentiating between types of installation (water linesversus high voltage electrical lines) or between an excavation operationand an uncovering operation (used to locate utilities). OSHA also received one comment from the Public Service Electric and GasCo. (Ex. 4-89) noting the existence of ``one call'' programs and attestingto their effectiveness. Another commenter, NUCA (Ex. 4-91), supported theproposed provision but disagreed with any prohibition on starting workuntil the installation has been marked. OSHA recognizes that some utility installations are privately owned, andhas amended the Final Rule to reflect this point. The Agency also recognizesthat the provision, as proposed, did not clearly require the employer torequest all utility companies to establish the location of their undergroundutility installations. In order to clarify OSHA's regulatory intent, theFinal Rule has been amended to state clearly that the employer must requestthe utility owner to locate the installations. OSHA recognizes that in some cases the utility company cannot respond tocontractor requests in a timely manner. The Agency notes that most ``onecall'' or ``Miss Utility'' programs require a prescribed lead time, usually24 to 48 hours prior to excavation. However, in areas with heavy constructionactivity, the utility company resources may not be able to respond as rapidlyas desired. OSHA also notes that, for a number of reasons, the installationowner may not be able to provide an exact location. In each of these casesthe employer might have to begin the work before the exact location isestablished. OSHA believes that, in those instances, the employer shouldbe able to proceed with the excavation work, provided the employer locatesthese utility installations using caution and using detection equipmentor other acceptable means. In the Final Rule OSHA has specified that if a utility company or ownercannot respond to a request to locate underground utility installationswithin twenty-four hours (unless a longer period is required by state orlocal law), or cannot establish the exact location of these installations,the employer may proceed, provided certain precautions are taken. The specificationof waiting period has been added to the Final Rule because it is not OSHA'sintent to allow an employer to proceed with excavation work absent a concertedeffort to have the utility determine the exact location of its installations.The Agency recognizes that a prohibition on starting an excavation untilutility installations are located may not be practical, but believes thesuggestion put forward at the ACCSH meeting, permitting the use of an uncoveringoperation to locate these utilities, is the correct approach in the circumstancediscussed above. OSHA believes most utility owners respond to contractor requests to locatetheir utility's underground installations in the interest of maintainingservice to their customers, and notes the increasing use of ``one call''programs to respond to these contractor requests. However, in those circumstanceswhere the utility cannot respond or cannot identify an exact location,the Agency believes it is appropriate to prescribe a course of action forthe contractor to follow. Therefore, based on the above discussion OSHA promulgates andSection; 1926.651(b)(2)as revised.Paragraph andSection; 1926.651(b)(3) of the Final Rule requires that as theexcavation approaches the estimated location of underground installations,the exact location must be determined by safe and acceptable means. Thisrequirement is similar to the proposal, which was taken unchanged fromthe existing standard. OSHA received two comments (Exs. 4-17 and 4-111) and input from the ACCSH(Tr. 8/5/87 p. 492) on this provision. All commenters recommended dropping``such as probing with hand-held tools'' from the proposed provision, becausethis could create a hazard to employees by damaging the installation orits insulation. The Agency agrees with these comments and, therefore, promulgates andSection;1926.651(b)(3) as revised. Section 1926.651(b)(4) of the Final Rule requires that ``While the excavationis open, underground installations shall be protected, supported, or removedas necessary to safeguard employees.'' This language is almost identical to the proposed requirement, which wasintended to prevent employee injuries resulting from damage to exposedinstallations, contact with energized lines, the collapse of unsupportedinstallations, and other similar hazards. The existing standard requiresonly that installations be properly supported, and as such is insufficientto protect employees adequately because the type of installation, its locationwith regard to the excavation, or other site conditions could render thistype of protection infeasible or ineffective. Removal or protection ofexposed installations can, at times, be more appropriate ways of protectingemployees. OSHA received one comment (Ex. 4-25) on this provision. The commenter expressedconcern that use of the term ``removed'' presupposes or technically requiresdamage to the facility. The commenter suggested amending the provisionto list ``protected'' first in the sequences, and that ``altered in a manneracceptable to the facility owner'' be used in place of ``removed.'' In response, OSHA has changed the sequence of options, because the Agencyhas no preference for how employees are protected in these circumstances,as long as the protection is adequate to ensure the safety of the employees.OSHA emphasizes that ``protected'' is intended to safeguard employees,not to ``protect'' the facility from damage. If both concerns can be addressedat the same time, so much the better, but employee protection is the primaryconcern. The Agency declines to revise the provision to limit employee protectionto what is acceptable to the facility owner. OSHA notes that removal oralteration of an underground installation may be necessary to provide employeeprotection, and this may not be considered acceptable by a facility owner.Such situations will have to be resolved between the employer and the owner,but, as discussed above, employee protection is the primary concern. Therefore, based on the above discussion OSHA promulgates paragraph (b)(4)as revised. Section 1926.651(c) of this Final Rule sets forth the requirements foraccess to and egress from excavations. Similar requirements are found throughoutthe existing standard in andSection;andSection; 1926.650 (b), (c), and (d),1926.651(x), and 1926.652(h). These requirements address hazards resultingfrom inadequate design and construction of ramps and runways and from inadequateplacement of exits in trenches. Paragraph (c)(1) specifies five general requirements for the design andconstruction of ramps and runways. The first of these, under paragraph(c)(1)(i), states that ``Structural ramps that are used solely by employeesas a means of access or egress from excavations shall be designed by acompetent person. Structural ramps used for access or egress of equipmentshall be designed by a competent person qualified in structural design,and shall be constructed in accordance with the design.'' This provision differs substantially from the proposal, which did not differentiatebetween ramps used solely for employee access and ramps used for equipment.The proposed paragraph was intended to address the hazard of structuralramps collapsing under heavy vehicle or personnel load conditions becauseof underdesigned members or connections. In some large excavations, rampsof steel or wood are provided for vehicle access and egress. More frequently,however, earthen ramps are used. These earthen ramps are created out ofmaterial that is left in place as the excavation is made. For this reason,the word ``structural'' was added to clarify when design of particularramps by a qualified individual would be necessary. In addition, the existingprovision, andSection; 1926.651(x), required ramps to be designed and constructedby a qualified person in accordances with accepted engineering practices.However, the actual construction of ramps is usually not spoken of in termsof engineering practices. Therefore, OSHA proposed to revise the existinglanguage to maintain this distinction. The proposed language required thatstructural ramps be ``constructed in accordance with their design'' insteadof in accordance with accepted engineering practice. As noted, the proposedrule required ramps to be designed by a ``qualified person, a qualifiedengineer or a person under the direction of a qualified engineer.'' In the proposal, the current requirement for design by a ``qualified person''was changed so that the language used would be consistent with other languageand requirements in the proposal. OSHA requested comment and data on whetheror not structural ramps used by a limited number of employees (five orfewer) should be required to be designed by a qualified individual or,alternatively, should structural ramps be a certain height before designby a qualified individual is required? OSHA received six comments and input from the ACCSH on this provision.One commenter (Ex. 4-78) stated that earthen ramps should be allowed, andindicated that these would be prohibited by this provision. OSHA disagreeswith this interpretation of the rule, noting that the provision appliesto structural ramps only. Earthen ramps normally consist of dirt left inplace during excavation, and are not required to be ``designed.'' However,among other things, the competent person would be required to inspect theseramps to check for any hazards, as required by andSection; 1926.651(k). The ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87 p.494) suggested requiring only that a ``competentperson,'' rather than a ``qualified person,'' design structural ramps usedsolely by employees as a means of access or egress. Along the same lines,several of the commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, 4-106, and 4-109) recommendedthat only ramps used for vehicle access and egress need to be designedby a qualified individual. Three commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, and 4-109)recommended that design should not be required at all unless ramps areover 10 feet in height, but supplied no rationale for this recommendation.Another commenter (Ex. 4-111) recommended deleting ``qualified person''from the proposed language. The sixth commenter (Ex. 4-91) recommendedthat the phrase ``designed to prevent slipping or tripping'' be added tothe rule. That commenter did not specify who would develop the design.Based on these comments, the Agency raised an issue in the hearing notice(53 FR 5281) concerning design of structural ramps. The Agency received11 responses to this issue. Six commenters (Exs. 8-6, 8-14, 8-16, 8-18,8-25, and 8-27) agreed with the recommendation that competent persons beallowed to design structural ramps used solely by employees. One commenter(Ex. 8-7) opposed any requirement for design unless the ramp was over 10feet high and used for equipment. This commenter did not provide any rationalefor this recommendation. Several other commenters (Exs. 8-21, 8-22, 8-26,and 8-29) objected to the use of a competent person to design structuralramps for the sole use of employees, but were unclear as to whether theirobjection was to having the competent person design these ramps, or whetherthey objected to a requirement for any design at all. After careful consideration of the record, OSHA has determined that theproposed paragraph should be amended to address separately those structuralramps used only for employee access and those structural ramps used forvehicle and equipment access. However, the Agency declines to act on therecommendation to require the design of a ramp only if it is to be over10 feet high. The Agency has no basis to impose a 10 foot limit since thecommenters did not supply any rationale, and there are no technical reasonsof which OSHA is aware that support this arbitrary limit. Therefore, OSHApromulgates andSection; 1926.651(c)(1)(i) as revised. Paragraphs (c)(1) (ii) through (v) of andSection; 1926.651 address the hazardsof slips, trips and falls, and replace the requirements in existing andSection;1926.650 (b), (c), and (d).Paragraph (c)(1)(ii) of the Final Rule requires that  ``Ramps and runwaysconstructed of two or more structural  members shall have the structuralmembers securely connected  together to prevent displacement.'' This provisionis  virtually identical to the proposed rule except that the term  ``structuralmembers'' has replaced the term ``planks'' at the  suggestion of the ACCSH(Tr. 8/5/87, p. 495). The Agency  agrees with this recommendation becauseit recognizes that  material other than wooden planks can serve as rampsand  runways. OSHA also believes that this change will express  more clearlyits regulatory intent that ramps or runways  constructed of two or more``members'' must have these ``members''  securely connected together, regardlessof what material these  members are made. OSHA received no other substantive comments on this  provision. Therefore,based on the above discussion, OSHA  promulgates andSection; 1926.651(c)(1)(ii)as amended. Paragraph (c)(1)(iii) of the final rule requires that  ``Structural membersused for ramps and runways shall be of  uniform thickness.'' This provisionis virtually identical to  the proposed rule, except that the term ``structuralmembers''  has replaced the term ``planks'' at the suggestion of the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, p. 495). The Agency rationale for making this  change isthe same as discussed above for paragraph  (c)(1)(ii). The Agency receivedno other substantive comments  on this provision. Therefore, OSHA promulgates andSection; 1926.651(c)(1)(iii), as revised. Section 1926.651(c)(1)(iv) of the Final Rule requires  ``cleats or otherappropriate means used to connect runway  structural members shall be attachedto the bottom of the  runway or shall be attached in a manner to preventtripping.''  This provision is similar to the proposed rule except that ``planks'' has been replaced with ``structural members,'' as  discussedabove, and the phrase ``or other appropriate means''  has been added. OSHAadded the new language in recognition of  other acceptable means of securingboth wooden structural  members and structural members made of other materials.For  example, metal structural members could be bolted or clamped  togetherto prevent separation. In addition, the Agency has  deleted the phrase``or be beveled,'' as discussed below. OSHA received one comment on the issue of cleats. That  commenter (Ex.72) stated that attaching cleats and beveling  cleats would require additionallabor, and noted that the  nails used to secure the cleats to the bottomwould penetrate  the plank and would have to be bent over, thereby creatinga  tripping hazard. The commenter also argued that beveled  cleats (onthe top of a runway) do not provide traction and  noted that he was unawareof any tripping injury caused by  unbeveled cleats. OSHA recognizes that nails used to secure cleats to the  bottom of therunway could penetrate the top surface of the  plank and would have tobe bent over. OSHA also notes that  nails that are bent over and hammeredflush would not cause  the problem anticipated by the commenter. In addition, upon reevaluation of the issue of ``beveled''  cleats, theAgency agrees with the commenter, and is dropping  the requirement for``beveled cleats'' from both this provision  and andSection; 1926.651(c)(1)(v)of the final rule. This  decision is in line with the existing andSection;1926.650(d) which  requires only the use of ``cleats.'' Therefore, based on the above discussion, OSHA  promulgates paragraph (c)(1)(iv)as revised. Section 1926.651(c)(1)(v) of the Final Rule requires  ``Structural rampsused in lieu of steps shall be provided with  cleats or other surface treatmentson the top surface to  prevent slipping.'' This provision is similar tothe proposed  rule except that it specifies ``structural ramps'' and  recognizesthe use of other surface treatments to prevent  slipping. These changeswere recommended by a majority of the  11 commenters on this provision(Exs. 4-21, 4-23, 4-30, 4-31,  4-40, 4-42, 4-54, 4-78, and 4-86). One commenter(Ex. 4-111)  merely noted that the provision related to structural ramps. Another commenter (Ex. 4-72) suggested ``beveled'' be deleted  for thesame reasons as discussed above relating to paragraph  (c)(1)(iv). The Agency agrees with the majority of the commenters  that it is appropriateto specify ``structural ramp'' in the  context of this provision and torecognize other equally  effective means of preventing slipping. In addition,the  Agency is dropping ``beveled,'' as discussed above under  andSection;1926.651(c)(1)(iv). Therefore, based on the above  discussion, OSHA promulgatesandSection; 1926.651(c)(1)(v) as amended. Section 1926.651(c)(2) of the Final Rule requires that  ``A stairway, ladder,ramp, or other safe means of egress shall  be located in trench excavationsthat are four feet (1.22 m) or  more in depth, so as to require no morethan 25 feet (7.62 m)  of lateral travel for employees.'' This provisionis virtually  identical to the proposed rule except that the explanatory note allowing a negotiable slope to be used as a means of  egress hasbeen deleted. This provision is similar to  existing andSection; 1926.652(h)except that the final rule recognizes  ramps and other safe means of egress.OSHA received five comments on the proposed rule, and  input from the ACCSH.The ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, pp. 495-496)  suggested deleting the explanatorynote and the word ``trench''  from the definition, so as to require thisprotection for all  excavations. Two commenters (Exs. 4-17 and 4-91) also recommended deleting the explanatory note because the term  ``negotiableslope'' is too subjective. Another commenter (Ex.  4-30) suggested thatOSHA define ``negotiable slope,'' and  pointed out that its personnel haveobserved employees using  sloped areas as access to trenches with the assistanceof  knotted rope lines. This commenter also noted that a knotted  ropeline would not provide ``adequate and rapid escape for  more than one employee''in case of an emergency. One commenter (Ex. 4-46) agreed with the ACCSH  recommendation for inclusionof all excavations in this  provision, but provided no rationale for thecomment. Another commenter (Ex. 4-53) objected to the provision in  its entirety.This commenter stated that its employees do the  bulk of their work onthe bank, and that they do not traverse  trenches at 25-foot intervals.It also raised the issue of  increased compliance costs that would resultif required to  provide crossings every 25 feet. After careful consideration of the record, OSHA has  determined that asafe means of egress every 25 feet is  necessary in trench excavations,but not in every excavation.  The Agency notes that egress during an emergencyin a large  excavation does not pose the same problem as it would in the confines of a trench excavation. The Agency has also determined that the explanatory note,  intended toprovide additional guidance, could be  misinterpreted to permit the situationdescribed by one of the  commenters (Ex. 4-30) above. That is not the Agency'sintent,  and in order to prevent any confusion as to what is necessary to protect employees, OSHA is deleting the explanatory note  from thisFinal Rule. OSHA disagrees with the commenter (Ex. 4-53) who objected  to this provisionin its entirety, and notes that the  commenter apparently misunderstoodthe provision. OSHA points  out that this requirement is intended to provideemployees  working down in a trench with a safe means of escape from the trench in case of an emergency. The provision does not  require a safemeans of crossing (traversing) a trench at 25-foot intervals. Therefore,if the work is done outside of a  trench, as stated by the commenter, andno employees are  required to enter the trench (i.e., there is no exposureto  cave-in hazards), this provision would not apply. Section 1926.651(d) of the Final Rule requires that  ``employees exposedto public vehicular traffic shall be  provided with, and shall wear, warningvests or other suitable  garments marked with or made of reflectorizedor high  visibility material.'' This is virtually identical to the  proposedprovision, except that the word ``public'' has been  added to clarify OSHAregulatory intent. The proposed requirement differed from the existing  requirement in andSection;1926.650(f). The proposal required employees  to ``wear'' vests, whereasthe current standard states the  ``Employees * * * shall be instructedto wear * * *'' The words ``be  instructed to'' were deleted. This change,carried over into  the Final Rule, is necessary to clarify the intent ofthe  standard. Employees, particularly those involved in trenching work,  frequently workwhere vehicular traffic flow is maintained in  close proximity to the excavationoperations. Employees may  be assigned to direct traffic flow adjacentto construction  sites. These employees are exposed to the hazard of being struck by such vehicles. This hazard is increased during dark  or near-darkperiods of the day. The provisions of this  paragraph are intended to reducethis hazard. OSHA received 13 comments on this provision. Four commenters (Exs. 4-82,4-102, 4-106, and 4-109) argued that this provision is not appropriatelylocated in subpart P and should be addressed in another subpart. OSHA disagreeswith these commenters and notes that the specific hazards addressed bythe provision are not covered adequately in another subpart. (OSHA notesthat andSection; 1926.201(a)(4), for example, only applies to flag persons.)Eight commenters (Exs. 4-21, 4-23, 4-31, 4-40, 4-42, 4-54, 4-72, and 4-86)recommended adding the word ``public'' to clarify the intent of the provision.OSHA recognizes that the provision, as proposed, could be misinterpretedto require all on-site employees to wear warning vests, because of exposureto on-site construction vehicular traffic. This is not OSHA's intent and,therefore, the agency is revising the provision to specifically state ``publicvehicular traffic.'' Another commenter (Ex. 4-28) suggested revising the provision to requirewarning vests for all employees on foot exposed to mobile equipment ormotor vehicle traffic. OSHA recognizes that almost every employee on aconstruction site is exposed to mobile equipment or on-site vehicular trafficat some time during the day, but does not believe all employees at a siteshould be required to wear warning vests. The Agency is concerned thatemployees be highly visible to public vehicular traffic which can be ofrelatively high speed and where the drivers are not aware of the presenceof construction employees. These are not conditions which are common withconstruction traffic. Therefore, based on the above discussion, OSHA promulgates andSection; 1926.651(d),as amended. Section 1926.651(e) of the final rule requires that ``No employee shallbe permitted underneath loads handled by lifting or digging equipment.Employees shall be required to stand away from any vehicle being loadedor unloaded to avoid being struck by any spillage or falling material.Operators may remain in the cabs of vehicles being loaded or unloaded whenthe vehicles are equipped, in accordance with andSection; 1926.601(b)(6),to provide adequate protection for the operator during loading and unloadingoperations.'' This requirement is virtually identical to the proposal, except that anexplanatory note used in the proposal has been added directly to the provision.In addition, the basis for an operator exemption from this provision hasbeen included to provide additional guidance to employers. The proposed requirements were basically unchanged from the existing requirementsin andSection; 1926.650(h), except the words ``power shovels, derricks, orhoists'' were changed to ``lifting or digging equipment.'' This changewas made to make the requirements apply to all kinds of lifting or diggingmachines rather than be limited to those listed in the existing standard.In this way, backhoes and other such equipment are clearly included inthese requirements. In addition, the words ``or unload'' were added to the proposed provision.OSHA believes that the hazard to employees from loads falling during unloadingis just as great as during loading. A note within proposed paragraph (e) indicated that operators of vehiclesmay remain in cabs that provide adequate protection from falling loadsduring loading and unloading operations. The Agency received 15 comments on this provision, including input fromthe ACCSH. The ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, pp. 496-497) recommended deleting the explanatorynote because it could cause problems, and because the hazard is coveredelsewhere. OSHA declines to act on this recommendation because the notewas intended to provide additional guidance to employers by making it clearthat operators of vehicles meeting the requirements of andSection; 1926.601(b)(6)may remain in the cab of those vehicles. Two commenters (Exs. 4-17 and 4-91) suggested changing ``equipped'' to``designed.'' The Agency declines to act on this suggestion as the Agencybelieves that a requirement for ``design'' would not ensure that the cabsare unmodified. Another commenter (Ex. 4-46) suggested that the operatornot be allowed in the cab of these vehicles. However, OSHA believes a requirementthat the vehicles be equipped in accordance with existing andSection; 1926.601(b)(6)provides the necessary safeguards. Four commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, 4-106, and 4-109) argued that this provisiondid not belong in subpart P because it is not appropriate in the excavationstandard. Other commenters (Exs. 4-21, 4-23, 4-31, 4-40, 4-42, 4-72, and4-86) recommended revising this provision so it applies only to loads ofexcavated materials handled by digging equipment, noting that slung loads(material, pipe, etc.) must be guided into the excavation by employeeswho may be underneath the load at some point. The Agency recognizes that``slung loads'' may have to be guided into excavations by employees, butdoes not accept the argument that employees must be under the load at somepoint. OSHA notes that this type of load could be guided from a safe position.In those instances where a load, such as pipe, must be positioned as closelyas possible to its final location, the load can be lowered into the excavationto a height where it is not suspended over any employee. From there itcan be guided into its final place by an employee without the danger ofthe load falling and injuring that employee. OSHA, therefore, declinesto revise this provision to exclude ``slung'' loads. Based on the above discussion, OSHA promulgates andSection; 1926.651(e) asrevised.Section 1926.651(f) of the Final Rule requires that ``When mobile equipmentis operated adjacent to an excavation, or when such equipment is requiredto approach the edge of an excavation, and the operator does not have aclear and direct view of the edge of the excavation, a warning system shallbe utilized such as barricades, hand or mechanical signals, or stop logs.If possible, the grade should be away from the excavation.'' This is virtuallyidentical to the proposal except that the explanatory note has been mergeddirectly into the text of the paragraph. This paragraph (f) replaces the requirement in existing andSection; 1926.651(s)which states ``When mobile equipment is utilized or allowed adjacent toexcavations, substantial stop logs or barricades shall be installed.''The language of the current standard is unclear because the word ``substantial''makes it difficult for employers to determine if the intent of the ruleis to provide for physical barriers which will prevent mobile equipmentfrom going over the edge into an excavation, or if the intent is for thelog or barricade merely to alert an operator not to proceed any furthertoward the edge of an excavation. OSHA's intent in this provision is forthe stop logs or barricades to serve as a reminder to the operator of theproximity of excavations. It is OSHA's opinion that there are several effective alternatives availableto protect workers in and around excavations from the danger of mobileequipment. Therefore, the requirement both clarifies when warning systemsare needed and identifies the types of warning systems that are acceptableto protect vehicle operators and workers in excavations. OSHA believesthat signals from observers can be used effectively for the purpose ofprotecting employees against the hazard in question. Signals are currentlyspecified in other existing standards (see andSection; 1926.601(b)(4)) asan acceptable means of guiding mobile equipment which is backing up. OSHA notes that the words ``if possible the grade should be away from theexcavation'' currently appear at the end of the existing paragraph. Althoughthe language is advisory it does provide an example of a safe practiceto follow in addition to the required practices. Therefore, OSHA is maintainingthis language in the Final Rule. OSHA received one comment (Ex. 4-17) and input from the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87,p.497). Both comments merely noted a typographical error in the document.Therefore, the Agency promulgates andSection; 1926.651(f) as revised. Section 1926.651(g) of the Final Rule addresses work in hazardous atmospheres.Paragraph (g)(1) presents the introductory text for requirements relatedto testing and controls. This provision states: ``In addition to the requirementsset forth in subparts D and E of this part (29 CFR 1926.50-1926.107) toprevent exposure to harmful levels of atmospheric contaminants and to assureacceptable atmospheric conditions, the following requirements shall apply:''This is identical to the proposed rule. OSHA received no comments on thisprovision and, therefore, promulgates paragraph (g)(1) as proposed. Section 1926.651(g)(1)(i) of the Final Rule requires that ``Where oxygendeficiency (atmospheres containing less than 19.5 percent oxygen) or ahazardous atmosphere exists or could reasonably be expected to exist, suchas in excavations in landfill areas or excavations in areas where hazardoussubstances are stored nearby, the atmosphere in the excavation shall betested before employees enter excavations greater than four feet (1.22m) in depth.'' This provision is identical to the proposed rule, exceptthe sentence has been reordered to describe first when testing would beappropriate. The proposed and Final Rule require testing for oxygen deficiency or gaseousconditions in excavations greater than four feet (1.2 m) in depth wherethese conditions exist or could reasonably be expected to exist. Further,the rules require that the testing be done before employees enter the excavation.This differs from the existing language in andSection; 1926.651(v), whichwould appear to require that all excavations be tested regardless of employeeexposure. The existing rule states: ``In locations where oxygen deficiencyor gaseous conditions are possible, air in the excavation shall be tested.''The definition of ``confined'' or ``enclosed space'' in existing andSection;1926.21(b)(6)(ii) includes ``* * * open top spaces more than four feetin depth such as pits, tubs, vaults, and vessels.'' The four foot (1.2m) depth requirement in proposed andSection; 1926.651(g)(1)(i) was addedto clarify where testing is required for excavations, and to be consistentwith the above definition. The existing language requiring that tests be performed ``where oxygendeficiency or gaseous conditions are possible'' was changed to a requirementthat OSHA believes is more reasonable, but still provides appropriate employeeprotection. Taken literally, the conditions listed in the existing ruleare possible in any given excavation if the proper circumstances are present.However, hazardous atmospheric conditions are more likely to exist or occurin some circumstances than in other circumstances. For example, work involvingthe extension or maintenance of sewer utility or gas utility systems, worknear refineries or near areas where petroleum distillates are handled orstored, and work near landfills or hazardous waste dumps are situationswhere hazardous atmospheric conditions are likely to occur (Ex. 2-8, pp.224-226, 369-370). Atmospheres in excavations in these types of situationsmust be tested. However, it is OSHA's opinion that it is not reasonable to require thatall excavations be tested routinely since there is limited potential foroxygen deficiency or gaseous conditions in the vast majority of situations.Where the conditions are such that these hazards could not reasonably beexpected to occur, OSHA believes that routine testing should not be required.Accordingly, the final requirement is written to reflect what OSHA believesto be a more reasonable approach to testing. The examples cited above of areas that are more likely than not to be hazardousare not intended to be a comprehensive list. There are many unique circumstancesthat could result in the formation of a hazardous atmosphere in excavation-relatedwork. An excavation that is free of hazardous atmospheric conditions onany particular day may not be safe the following day. To ensure that employeesare continually protected against the development of hazardous atmospheresin excavations, OSHA is requiring in andSection; 1926.651(k)(1) that dailyinspections (not necessarily involving air testing) for evidence of potentiallyhazardous atmospheric conditions be conducted by a competent person. Itis intended that such inspections be conducted to identify areas or situationswhere hazardous atmospheric conditions exist, or could reasonably be expectedto exist, during the course of work. Where such areas or situations areidentified, the requirements of paragraph (g) apply. OSHA received six comments and input from the ACCSH on this requirement.Two commenters (Exs. 4-25 and 4-67) objected to the requirement for testingthe atmosphere, noting that the gas industry normally tests for hazardousatmospheres. Both commenters also contended that respiratory protectionor ventilation should be permitted in lieu of testing. OSHA notes that respiratory protection or ventilation is required by andSection;1926.651(g)(1)(ii) of this final rule, and the requirement for testingestablishes what, if any, precautions or additional precautions are necessary.If an employer chooses to provide adequate employee protection in accordancewith the appropriate regulations as a matter of procedure, the failureto test would be de minimis. One of the commenters (Ex. 4-67) also recommended extending the four-footlevel to six or seven feet. OSHA, however, is not convinced that the four-footlevel should be increased. OSHA points out that the four-foot level isconsistent with other regulations and notes again that the testing requirementdoes not apply to every excavation, only to those where oxygen deficiencyor hazardous atmospheres can be reasonably anticipated. OSHA believes thatthe requirement, as proposed, provides adequate employee protection, withoutbeing unnecessarily burdensome. Two other commenters (Exs. 4-17 and 4-111) suggested modifying paragraph(g)(1)(i) to reorder the sentence, putting the conditions which requiretesting first. Some commenters (Exs. 4-21, 4-23, 4-31, 4-40, 4-42, and4-86) indicated that this whole paragraph (g)(1), as written, implied thatrespiratory protection and ventilation are required at all times when hazardous,flammable, and oxygen-deficient atmospheres exist. OSHA agrees with thesuggested reformatting of this provision, but disagrees with the commentsthat interpret this provision to require respiratory protection and ventilationat all times. The requirement specifies when the atmosphere is or couldbe reasonably expected to be either oxygen-deficient (less than 19.5 percentoxygen) or otherwise hazardous, then testing must be done before employeesenter. Another commenter (Ex. 4-91) supported the provision and suggested a revisionreading in part: ``Where oxygen deficiency [exists] * * * the atmospherein the excavation shall be tested * * *.'' OSHA sees merit in definingwhen testing would be required to alert employers that special precautionsmay be necessary, and therefore has made the recommended reordering ofthe sentence. The ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/88, pp. 497-507) recommended treating all excavationsfour feet or more in depth as confined spaces. The Agency, lacking publicinput on this point, raised such an issue in the hearing notice (53 FR5281). OSHA received 11 comments on the hearing issue, and testimony at the publichearing. Seven commenters (Exs. 8-6, 8-7, 8-14, 8-16, 8-18, 8-19, and 8-25)disagreed with the ACCSH recommendation, most of them noting that excavationsare open to the air or have adequate egress. Testimony at the public hearing(Tr. 4/19/88, pp. 73-74) also opposed this recommendation. Four other commenters (Exs. 8-21, 8-22, 8-26, and 8-29) objected to excavationsfour feet or deeper being considered confined spaces, but provided no rationalefor their objection. Based on the comments received, the Agency declines to act on the ACCSHrecommendation that all excavations four feet or deeper be considered confinedspaces. The Agency believes that testing is only necessary when there isa likelihood of hazardous conditions, and that the requirement for inspectionby the competent person provides continuing assurance that hazardous conditionswill be recognized and addressed appropriately. In addition, the Agencydoes not have any other data to support a requirement that ``every'' excavationbe considered a confined space. Therefore, based on the above discussion, OSHA promulgates andSection; 1926.651(g)(1)(i)as revised. Section 1926.651(g)(1)(ii) of the Final Rule requires that ``Adequate precautionsshall be taken to prevent employee exposure to atmospheres containing lessthan 19.5 percent oxygen and other hazardous atmospheres. These precautionsinclude providing proper respiratory protection or ventilation in accordancewith subparts D and E of this part respectively.'' This provision is similar to the language of the proposed rule which wasadded to clarify when protection against exposure to oxygen deficiencyis required, and to identify the precautions that are necessary to preventsuch exposures. Oxygen deficiency is not specifically defined in the existingexcavation standard. However, the existing requirements for air qualityfor ``supplied air'' in andSection; 1910.134(d)(1) of the General IndustryStandards, have been identified as applicable to the construction industry.andSection; 1910.134(d)(1) states that ``Breathing air shall meet at leastthe requirements of the specification for Grade D breathing air as describedin Compressed Gas Association Commodity Specification G-7.1-1966.'' Thisspecification, as well as andSection; 1910.94, denotes a concentration of19.5 percent oxygen as the lower limit for synthesized air. Therefore,the 19.5 percent limit for oxygen was specifically identified in the proposedstandard in order to be consistent with the existing requirements and toclarify when testing and protection are required. The existing standard requires that employees subjected to oxygen deficiencybe protected with approved respiratory protection as set forth in subpartD. However, the use of increased ventilation can be as effective or moreeffective in dealing with oxygen deficient atmospheres. Therefore, thistype of protection was also identified as acceptable in the proposal. OSHA received one comment on this provision. The commenter (Ex. 4-30) pointedout that the provision seemed to indicate that implementation of subpartsD and E is only to prevent employee exposure to atmospheres containingless than 19.5 percent oxygen. The commenter pointed out that subpartsD and E are also intended to prevent employee exposure to materials andsubstances in the Z-1 tables of andSection; 1910.1000 and other OSHA standards. OSHA agrees with the observation, but received no other input which indicatedconfusion as to the intended application of subparts D and E. However,in order to clarify its' regulatory intent, the Agency has editorily revisedthis provision. The Agency notes that all constuction employers must complywith subparts D and E to prevent employee exposure which exceed the prescribedpermissible exposure limits. The Agency, therefore promulgates paragraph andSection; 1926.651(g)(1)(ii)as revised. Paragraph andSection; 1926.651(g)(1)(iii) of the Final Rule requires that``Adequate precautions shall be taken such as providing ventilation toprevent employee exposure to an atmosphere containing a concentration ofa flammable gas in excess of 20 percent of the lower flammable limit ofthe gas.'' This provision is identical to the proposed rule which addressed the hazardsposed by the accumulation of flammable gases. The proposed standard requiredthat adequate precautions be taken to prevent employee exposure to atmospherescontaining a concentration of flammable gas in excess of 20 percent ofits lower flammable limit (LFL). This differs from the existing requirementwhich states in andSection; 1926.651(v): ``When flammable gases are present,adequate ventilation shall be provided or sources of ignition shall beeliminated.'' As stated, the existing provision requires that ventilation be providedwhen a flammable gas exists in any concentration or, as an alternative,that sources of ignition be eliminated. OSHA believes that this requirementis too restrictive at low concentrations of flammable gas in the atmosphere,but not restrictive enough where high concentrations exist. By settingforth a limit for the allowable concentration of flammable gas, the proposalnotified employers of the level of performance required to protect employees.OSHA received a large number of comments on this  provision, primarilyfrom employers in the natural gas  industry, and input from the ACCSH.Many commenters (for example, Exs. 4-6, 4-8, 4-14 and 4-61) pointed outthat this requirement would, in effect,  prevent the repair of damagedor leaking gas pipelines without  turning off the gas and disrupting serviceto customers. Many  commenters also noted that the Office of Pipeline Safety(OPS)  has regulations which specifically address this type of  situation.They requested that OSHA place a specific  exclusion to the standard tocover these situations. It should be noted that the U.S. Court of Appeals for the  Third Circuithas determined that under section 4(b)(1) of the  OSHA Act, a particularOPS regulation, 49 CFR 192.751, preempts  the current requirements in paragraph(v) of OSHA's excavation  standard with regard to pipeline repair. (<T3>Columbia Gas of  Pennsylvania, Inc. </T3>v. <T3>Marshall,</T3> 636 F.2d 913 (3d Cir. 1980).  Since paragraph (g)(1)(iii)of the revised OSHA standard  covers the same working condition as existingparagraph (v),  OSHA assumes that the new paragraph would also be preempted. However, OSHA declines to place a specific reference to  preemption intothe standard itself, as noted earlier. Indeed,  if OPS were to change orrevoke its regulations, pipelines  might once again fall within OSHA jurisdiction.The placement  of an exemption within the OSHA standard would unduly restrict the standard's coverage in such situations. Therefore, no  specific exemptionis being incorporated into the standard. The ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, p. 507) recommended adding the  words ``or explosivegas or vapor'' after the word flammable.  The Agency declines to make thischange because the term  ``flammable gas'' is a generic term which alreadyincludes  ``explosive gas or vapor.'' Therefore, based on the above discussion OSHA promulgate  andSection; 1926.651(g)(1)(iii),as proposed. Section 1926.651(g)(1)(iv) of the Final Rule requires  that ``When controlsare used that are intended to reduce the  level of atmospheric contaminantsto acceptable levels,  testing shall be conducted as often as necessaryto ensure  that the atmosphere remains safe.'' This provision is identical to the proposed rule. The  proposed paragraphwas a new requirement, added to clarify  further the intention of the existingrequirements for  testing. Testing is not an effective method of preventing exposure to hazardous atmospheres if it is used only to detect  hazardousconditions initially and then not used again.  Therefore, the proposalrequired the employer to conduct  additional testing to ensure that atmospheresremain safe  whenever controls are used that are intended to reduce the levels of atmospheric contaminants to acceptable levels. The Agency received input from the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, p. 508) recommendingcontinuous monitoring when employees are  present. No other comments werereceived on this provision.  The Agency has determined that continuousmonitoring would not  be appropriate in many situations. Further, evenin those  situations when it might be appropriate, the Agency believes it appropriate to permit the use of alternative monitoring  methods whichare also effective. For example, in trench  situations where work is proceedingrapidly and the trench is  being backfilled shortly after the work in asection is  completed, installation and calibration of the continuous testing instruments may not be completed before employees move  to anothersection. The provision is written so that adequate  monitoring is required,regardless of the situation. This  recognizes that in some instances continuousmonitoring would  be appropriate and would be required, however in other situations periodic monitoring would be more appropriate due  to siteconditions. Therefore the Agency declines to act on  this recommendation,and promulgates andSection; 1926.651(g)(1)(iv), as  proposed. Section 1926.651(g)(2)(i) of the Final Rule requires  that ``Emergencyrescue equipment, such as breathing apparatus,  a safety harness and line,or a basket stretcher, shall be  readily available where hazardous atmosphericconditions exist  or may reasonably be expected to develop during workin an  excavation. This equipment shall be attended when in use.'' This provision is similar to the proposed rule, which was  identical toexisting andSection; 1926.651(v) except the requirement for  the equipmentto be ``attended'' was deleted in the proposal.  The manner in which theword ``attended'' is used in the current  standard implies that personnelmust be with and responsible  for the equipment even when the equipmentis not in use. This  is not the intent of the standard, and this word wasdropped  in the proposal. However, it is the intent of the existing  ruleand the proposal that the equipment be attended while in  use. Therefore,the Final Rule has been modified to make this  intention explicit. OSHA received a great many comments on this provision,  primarily fromcompanies in the natural gas pipeline industry.  These commenters (forexample, Exs. 4-6, 4-20, 4-66, 4-89, 4-113, and 4-117) pointed out thatthis regulation was  inappropriate for situations involving natural gaspipeline  repair or replacement, since these were routine operations  performedby trained personnel and not emergencies as  understood in normal constructionoperations. Several of  these commenters (for example, Exs. 4-58, 4-112,and 4-116)  noted that Office of Pipeline Safety (OPS) regulations already regulated equipment and material needed at the scene of  emergencies inthe gas industry. As noted earlier, although OSHA disagrees with the rationale provided inColumbia Gas, we agree that paragraph (g)(2)(i) might well be preemptedby OPS regulations, under the holding in that case. However, for reasonswhich have also been noted above, the Agency declines to add a specificexemption within the standard itself. OSHA received no other input in this provision and, therefore, promulgatesandSection; 1926.651(g)(2)(i), as proposed. Section 1926.651(g)(2)(ii) of the Final Rule requires that ``Employeesentering bell-bottom pier holes, or other similar deep and confined footingexcavations, shall wear a harness with a life-line securely attached toit. The lifeline shall be separate from any line used to handle materials,and shall be individually attended at all times while the employee wearingthe lifeline is in the excavation.'' This provision is almost identical to the proposed rule, which was basedon existing andSection; 1926.652(f). In the Final Rule, OSHA clarified whatwas intended by ``substantially'' similar footing excavations. The existing requirements in andSection; 1926.652(f) apply only to bell-bottompier holes. These holes are a special type of footing excavation into whichemployees descend to inspect the hole configuration. However, similar inspectionsare also necessary, at times, in similar deep and confined footing excavationsthat are not belled at the bottom. Employees in these excavations mustbe protected against the same hazards that can exist in bell-footings.Therefore the language of the proposal was changed to reflect this need.The purpose of this requirement is to allow rapid rescue of an employeein the limited space of these special types of excavations without exposingother exployees to the associated hazards. Because of the configurationand unusual depths of these types of excavations, an oxygen deficient orother hazardous atmosphere could occur very quickly, requiring rapid removalof any exposed employee. The intent of the requirement that lifelines be ``individually attended''is that while the lifeline is actually in use (attached to the employee),personnel be assigned to oversee the individual to whom the lifeline isattached. The current standard provides that lifelines ``shall be individually mannedand be separate from any line used to remove materials excavated from thebell footing.'' The proposal revised this language to require that lifelines``shall be separate from any line used to handle materials * * *.'' Thisclarification is to indicate that the lifeline must be separate from anyline used to remove or supply or otherwise handle any materials from orto the footing excavation. OSHA received eight comments on this provision. Seven commenters (Exs.4-21, 4-23, 4-30, 4-31, 4-40, 4-42, and 4-86) recommended deleting thisprovision from subpart P because, they asserted, these excavations areconfined spaces and should be addressed in a confined space standard. The Agency disagrees with these commenters concerning deleting this provisionfrom subpart P. OSHA notes that bell-bottom pier holes and similar footingexcavation require cave-in protection and other precautions related specificallyto work in excavations. Consequently, it is appropriate to address theseexcavations in subpart P. However, this does not preclude these same excavationsfrom being ``confined spaces'' which would require compliance with additionalOSHA regulations (for example, andSection; 1926.21(a)(6)). The rescue proceduresrequired by this provision apply because of possible excavation hazardsand because of possible confined space hazards. They do not apply justbecause of possible confined space hazards. OSHA received another comment (Ex. 4-72) that suggested deleting this provisionand promulgating another full section specifically to address bell-bottompier holes. This recommendation is addressed in more detail earlier inthis preamble in the discussion of Issue 13. Based on that discussion,the Agency declines to act on this recommendation. Paragraph (h), ``Protection from hazards associated with water accumulation,''contains four provisions that address the control and removal of waterfrom excavations. Water is present, or very likely to be present, duringthe course of work in many excavations. Water accumulation can result fromrain or melting snow, or from leaking or damaged utilities such as wateror sewer lines. Water creates muddy or slippery surfaces that expose employeesto slips and falls. Rapid accumulation, such as from damaged water supplyline, has even resulted in drownings (Ex. 2-9). The action of water againstthe sides of excavations can cause undermining and cave-ins. Accumulatedwater will saturate the sides of excavations and weaken them to the pointwhere cave-ins are very likely to occur even in very shallow excavations.Further, where protective systems are in place, accumulated water can adverselyaffect the capacity of the systems. The existing requirement in andSection; 1926.651(p) states: ``Water shallnot be allowed to accumulate in a excavation.'' Taken literally, accumulatedwater in any amount, in any part of an excavation, violates the existingstandard. However, OSHA does not intend that to be the case. At times,such as during sudden rain storms, for example, or when snow melts, OSHArealizes that it is impossible to keep some amount of water from accumulating.Additionally, in excavations which employees do not enter, but where thereis accumulated water, there is no exposure to a hazard. Further, thereare certain excavations, such as long trenches, where water accumulatedin isolated sections would not pose a hazard if employees do not enterthose sections.OSHA proposed to revise the existing requirement to recognize that notall water accumulated in excavations poses a hazard. In addition, it isOSHA's opinion that it is not always necessary to remove all water froman excavation in which employees are expected to work. Paragraph (h)(1),as proposed, allowed employees to work in excavations in which there isaccumulated water, or in which water is accumulating, but only under thecircumstances where adequate precautions have been taken to protect employeesagainst the hazards posed by water accumulation. The precautions couldrange from providing dewatering equipment to special cave-in protection.Work can be conducted safely in excavations when there is accumulated water.For example, the record contains information on a pipeline contractor whoinstalled several miles of pipe in a trench where the water table was onlythree to four feet below the surface of the ground (Ex. 2-25). The workrequired the use of divers to place sections of pipe at depths of up to18 feet. Employees were protected from cave-ins of the sides of the trenchby the use of shields. Depending on the amount of water, the precautions necessary to protectemployees adequately will vary. Employers were alerted to this by the notefollowing proposed paragraph (h)(1). The note identified several examplesof the types of protection that might be necessary to provide an adequatelevel of protection. These include the use of special support or shieldsystems, dewatering to control the level of water, or the use of a safetyharness and lifeline. Section 1926.651(h)(1) of the final rule requires that ``Employees shallnot work in excavations in which there is accumulated water, or in excavationsin which water is accumulating, unless adequate precautions have been takento protect employees against the hazards posed by water accumulation. Theprecautions necessary to protect employees adequately vary with each situation,but could include special support or shield systems to protect employeesfrom cave-ins, water removal to control the level of accumulating water,or use of a safety harness and lifeline.'' The final provision is virtually identical to the proposal except the word``and'' used in the proposed explanatory note has been changed to ``or''at the suggestion of several commenters (Exs. 4-21, 4-23, 4-31, 4-40, 4-42,4-54, and 4-86). The Agency agrees with these commenters that the word``and'' could cause confusion regarding the use of options. OSHA has alsoreformatted this provision by including the explanatory note in the textof the provision. The Agency also received input from the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, p. 508), recommendingretitling andSection; 1926.651(h) to read: ``Protection from hazards associatedwith water accumulation.'' Two commenters (Exs. 4-17 and 4-91) also suggestedthis change. Since the change clarifies the regulatory intent of this paragraph,the Agency has made the recommended revision. The ACCSH also recommendedthat OSHA require that ``waterproof outerwear'' be used in these situations.The ACCSH did not explain their rationale for this recommendation, andthere is no other support in the record for this type of requirement. Therefore,OSHA declines to act on this suggestion. Finally, the Agency has dropped the phrase ``these conditions have beenanticipated and * * *'' because it added nothing to the standard. The Agencybelieves employees should be removed from excavations where water is accumulatingunless adequate precautions have been taken, regardless of whether thewater accumulation has been anticipated or not. Based on the above discussion, OSHA promulgates andSection; 1926.651(h)(1)as revised. Section 1926.651(h)(2) of the final rule requires that ``If water is controlledor prevented from accumulating by the use of water removal equipment, thewater removal equipment and operations shall be monitored by a competentperson to ensure proper operation.'' This provision is identical to the proposal, which was intended to addressthe use of water removal equipment as a means to control the accumulationof water. The proposed rules required that such equipment be monitoredby a competent person to ensure proper operation. Water removal or control is generally undertaken to provide a dry workarea. The process can also be used to contribute to improved stabilityof excavation sides, and it is done in emergencies when sudden inflowsof water occur. When the equipment that is used to remove or control theflow of water into excavations malfunctions, hazards that were eliminatedwhen the equipment was working can become significant. The requirements in paragraph (h)(2) are new. The existing standard doesnot directly address water removal operations, however, as discussed above,it requires that water not be allowed to accumulate in excavations. Thetype of water removal equipment needed in any given circumstance will varydepending on the volume of water that must be removed or controlled. Ina very large excavation, for example, failure of water removal equipmentmay affect only a portion of the area within the excavation. Therefore,the precautions to be taken will, of course, also vary in the event failureof the equipment occurs. Such precautions could involve removal of allemployees to a safe area if they are all exposed. Where the problem ismore isolated, only the employees in the area that are exposed to the addeddanger would have to be removed.OSHA received no comment on this provision and, therefore, promulgatesparagraph (h)(2) as proposed. Section 1926.651(h)(3) of the Final Rule requires that ``If excavationwork interrupts the natural drainage of surface water (such as streams),diversion ditches, dikes, or other suitable means shall be used to preventsurface water from entering the excavation and to provide adequate drainageof the area adjacent to the excavation. Excavations subject to runoff fromheavy rains require an inspection by a competent person and compliancewith paragraphs (h)(1) and (h)(2) of this Section.'' The requirement is virtually identical to the proposal, except that theexplanatory note has been added to the text of the provision. The proposalwas based on a minor revision of existing andSection; 1926.651(p). OSHA received no comment on this provision and, therefore, promulgatesparagraph (h)(3) as reformatted. Section 1926.651(i) of the Final Rule, ``Stability of adjacent structures,''contains three paragraphs that address the hazard of unstable structuresadjacent to excavations. The collapse of unstable structures endangersemployees in excavations and in the area around excavations. Structurescan become unstable when excavation takes place close enough to the structuresso as to reduce the ability of the soil to support them. The requirementsof paragraph 1926.651(i) are intended to ensure that necessary employeeprotection, over and above that required by paragraph 1926.652, is providedwhen necessary. Paragraph (i)(1) of the Final Rule requires that ``Where the stabilityof adjoining buildings, walls, or other structures is endangered by excavationoperations, support systems such as shoring, bracing, or underpinning shallbe provided to ensure the stability of such structures for the protectionof employees.'' The three examples of support systems generally used forthis purpose_shoring, bracing and underpinning_are unchanged from the currentstandard. This provision is essentially the same as the proposed rule,which was unchanged from the existing standard in andSection; 1926.651(o).However, the words ``support systems'' are included so that the provisionis consistent with other provisions of the standard. The Agency received no comment on this provision and, therefore, promulgatesandSection; 1926.651(i)(1) as proposed. Section 1926.651(i)(2) of the Final Rule requires that<ITAG tagnum="21">Excavation below the level of the base or footing of any foundationor retaining wall that could be reasonably expected to pose a hazard toemployees shall not be permitted except when: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) A support system, such as underpinning, is provided to ensurethe safety of employees and the stability of the structure; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The excavation is in stable rock; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) A registered professional engineer has approved the determinationthat the structure is sufficiently removed from the excavation so as tobe unaffected by the excavation activity; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) A registered professional engineer has approved the determinationthat such excavation work will not pose a hazard to employees.</ITAG>The first two exceptions are essentially unchanged from the existing requirementsin andSection; 1926.651(n). The third and fourth exceptions are new and wereproposed in similar form because the existing standard has been interpretedby some employers to apply only to excavation at and immediately belowfoundations or retaining walls. However, the loads imposed on the soilfrom an adjacent structure are not limited to the immediate area of thestructure, but also extend some distance from the structure. This distancevaries with the depth of the excavation. Generally, this distance can beestimated as being equal to the depth of the excavation. Thus, a criticalplane is formed sloping up from the bottom of the excavation toward thestructure at an angle of 45 degrees (one horizontal to one vertical or1H:1V). If the footing or foundation remains completely below this plane,then the conventional assumption is that it probably will not be affectedby excavation operations. The possibility remains, however, that the stabilityof the structure could be affected in some way. Calculating the effectthat excavation activity has on the soil supporting a structure is a highlycomplex procedure involving expertise in soil mechanics, structural analysis,judgement, and experience. While the discussion above is in terms of generalities,each circumstance must be evaluated on the specifics of the situation.The fourth exception to the prohibition against excavating adjacent tostructures recognizes that some excavation activity will not present ahazard to employees. Such a situation could occur, for example, if a buildingwere on a continuous concrete footing, and excavation was undertaken ina very limited area below the footing. Where the footing could safely spanthe excavation, no instability in the structure would occur. Again, eachcircumstance must be evaluated on the specifics of the situation. As discussed under Issue 2 above, the Agency has determined that thesetypes of determinations must be approved by a registered professional engineer.OSHA also received two comments (Exs. 4-17 and 4-111) and an ACCSH recommendation(Tr. 8/5/87, p. 509) supporting the use of a registered professional engineer.The Agency received no other comments on this provision. Therefore, based on the above discussion, OSHA promulgates andSection; 1926.651(i)(2)as revised. Section 1926.651(i)(3) of the Final Rule requires that ``sidewalks, pavements,and appurtenant structures shall not be undermined unless a support systemor another method of protection is provided to protect employees from thepossible collapse of such structures.'' This provision is similar to theproposed rule except that ``appurtenant structures'' (that is, structuresattached to sidewalks and pavements) have been added because of the dangerthey pose when undermined.The proposed requirement revised the existing language of andSection; 1926.650(a)that requires shoring sidewalks to carry a minimum live load of 125 poundsper square foot. The existing requirement does not protect employees adequatelybecause it does not cover all pavements, only ``sidewalks.'' Loads on pavementsduring construction operations frequently can exceed the minimum load specified.Therefore, the proposal covered pavements as well as sidewalks. In addition,the live load specification has been changed to a more performance-orientedrequirement to be consistent with the overall approach taken in this revisedstandard. OSHA believes that the performance language provides the employergreater flexibility in determining the most effective means of protectingemployees. The Agency notes that this provision is intended to apply notonly to employees in the excavation, but to employees who may be requiredto use the sidewalk or pavement area. OSHA received two comments (Exs. 4-17 and 4-91) and input from the ACCSH(Tr. 8/15/87, p. 518) on this provision. All commenters recommended adding``appurtenant structures'' to this provision. OSHA recognizes that ``appurtentantstructures'' must also be supported to protect employees, and that is theAgency's intent. In order to clarify this intent, OSHA is revising theprovision to state clearly that any attached structures must also be supported.In addition, one commenter (Ex. 4-17) and the ACCSH suggested moving thewords ``is provided'' to a position after the word ``protection'' in orderto clarify this provision. The Agency agrees and has revised this provisionaccordingly. Therefore, based on the above discussion, OSHA promulgates andSection; 1926.651(i)(3)as revised. Section 1926.651(j)(1) of the proposed rule has been relocated and combinedwith andSection; 1926.652(a) of the Final Rule because they are related provisions.This change will be discussed in more detail later in this preamble. Section 1926.651(j) of this Final Rule is entitled ``Protection of employeesfrom loose rock or soil.'' Paragraph (j)(1) of the Final Rule requiresthat ``Adequate protection shall be provided to protect employees fromloose rock or soil that could pose a hazard by falling or rolling froman excavation face. Such protection shall consist of scaling to removeloose material; installation of protective barricades at intervals as necessaryon the face to stop and contain falling material; or other means that provideequivalent protection.'' This is almost identical to proposed paragraph (j)(2), except that theintroductory language has been deleted because of the relocation of proposedparagraph (j)(1) mentioned above. In addition, the phrase ``protect * ** against'' has been changed to ``protect * * * from'' to be consistentwith language suggested by the ACCSH and other commenters related to thisrequirement and similar requirements in other parts of this standard. This provision addresses a hazard similar to cave-ins, although it is notof the same magnitude. Loose rock or soil can fall or roll from an excavationface and, if in sufficient volume, endanger an employee even when an adequatecave-in protective system is in place. For example, when a shield is usedin conjunction with sloping, the possibility exists for material to loosenand slide down and over the top of the shield, thus endangering employees.The existing standard, andSection; 1926.651(j), addresses this hazard. Itstates: ``Sides, slopes, and faces of all excavations shall meet acceptedengineering requirements by scaling, benching, barricading, rock bolting,wire meshing, or other equally effective means.'' The proposed standarddid not change the requirement other than to revise the language to improveclarity, and to remove the references to rock bolting and benching. Rock-boltingand benching are considered types of primary support systems intended toprevent cave-ins. They are not normally used to prevent material from fallinginto an excavation after the primary cave-in protective system is in place.Section 1926.651(j)(2) of the Final Rule requires that ``Employees shallbe protected from excavated or other materials or equipment that couldpose a hazard by falling or rolling into excavations. Protection shallbe provided by placing and keeping such materials or equipment at leasttwo feet (.61 m) from the edge of excavations, or by the use of retainingdevices that are sufficient to prevent material or equipment from fallingor rolling into excavations, or by a combination of both as necessary.''This provision is identical to proposed paragraph (j)(3), which was basedon existing andSection; 1926.651(i). The proposal was rewritten from theexisting standard in more concise language. Existing andSection; 1926.651(i)(1) states that ``* * * material shall beeffectively stored and retained * * *.'' Similarly, in existing andSection;1926.651(i)(2), it is stated that ``* * * the employer may use effectivebarriers or other effective retaining devices * * *.'' Interested personshave expressed concern as to what these provisions require and have indicatedthat they should be clarified in the proposed revision. Consequently, theproposed language of paragraph (j)(3) was written in performance-orientedlanguage and required ``the use of retaining devices that are sufficientto prevent material or equipment from falling or rolling into excavations.''The duty to provide protection is clearly stated, but the employer is allowedsome discretion in determining the necessary capacity of the retainingdevices by use of the word ``sufficient.'' A device is ``sufficient'' (and``effective'') if it can be shown to be able to resist any forces thatmay reasonably be expected to be applied to it. The intent of this requirement is to protect employees from materials,equipment, and spoil piles which might fall into excavations. Obviously,materials such as excavated soil and stored construction supplies can superimposeloads on the walls of an excavation. Such loads can be the cause of cave-insand must be considered when determining what protection is necessary tosafeguard employees. The application of the existing 2-foot setback requirement to trenchinghas been questioned in the past because the requirement only appears inexisting andSection; 1926.651 ``Specific Excavation Requirements,'' and notin andSection; 1926.652 ``Specific Trenching Requirements.'' However, therequirements in andSection; 1926.651 have always applied to all excavations,including trenches. The format changes in the proposal and in the FinalRule are made to clarify this point. The language of the existing requirement in andSection; 1926.651(i) is differentfrom the language that was originally promulgated in 1971. The 1971 requirementoriginally promulgated under the Construction Safety Act was stated asfollows: ``Excavated or other material shall not be stored nearer than4 feet from the edge of any excavation and shall be stored and retainedas to prevent its falling back into the excavation'' (36 FR 7389, April17, 1971). Upon the recommendation of the ACCSH, it was proposed to changethis provision to require that ``In excavations which employees may enter,which are more than 5 feet in depth, excavated or other materials shallbe stored and retained 4 feet or more from the edge of the excavation.In excavations which are 5 feet or less in depth, all materials shall bestored and retained at least 2 feet from the edge of the excavation'' (36FR 19088, Sept. 28, 1971).This amendment was proposed ``in order to allow more flexibility in storingand retaining excavated materials adjacent to an excavation, while at thesame time ensuring the safety of those employees working in the excavationsite'' (37 FR 3513, Feb. 17, 1972). The comments in response to the 1972proposal indicated that the proposed change was too rigid to allow employersdigging shallow trenches (less than 5 feet in depth) and having narrowrights-of-way to meet the requirement. Alternative methods of storing andretaining such material were suggested which would provide equivalent employeeprotection. The ACCSH considered the comments submitted in response to the proposal,and the suggestions made by the OSHA staff, and, as a result, recommendedthat the language be changed ``to permit all appropriate alternative methodswhich will protect employees working in excavations from the hazards offalling materials'' (37 FR 3515, Feb. 17, 1972). The ACCSH recommendationswere adopted and the language was revised to become what is now the existingrequirement in andSection; 1926.651(i). Prior to publication of the 1987 proposal OSHA received comments concerningthe existing 2 foot (.61 m) set-back requirement. It was suggested thatthis requirement be changed to 1 foot (30.5 cm) for excavations 5 feet(1.52 m) or less in depth. No data to support this suggestion was submittedto OSHA other than the comment that such a requirement would be practicaland adequate. OSHA did not make that suggested change in the proposal. However, OSHAdid request that specific comments regardinq this issue be submitted duringthe comment period. OSHA received 10 comments on this provision. Many commmenters (Exs. 4-4,4-82, 4-88, 4-102, 4-106, 4-109, 4-113, and 4-115) expressed support forreducing the 2 foot clearance to 1 foot for excavations 5 feet or lessin depth. Three commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, and 4-109) noted that thepractice was successful under CAL-OSHA. However, OSHA notes that commentsreceived from CAL-OSHA (Ex. 4-4), while suggesting that the setback forexcavated materials be reduced, provided other input which indicated thatthis practice was causing problems. This input, addressing proposed andSection;1926.651(a), is as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">The Division feels that the subsection on surface encumbrances shouldbe expanded by inserting the word ``spoil,'' which is common to the industryto designate the earth removed from the excavation, <T3>because it has been our experience that where a large boulder or atree on the edge might readily be removed to reduce or eliminate the hazard,the ``spoil'' is frequently left in a condition where it is almost rollingback into the excavation. For this reason too, we believe the requirementto keep the spoil back at least two feet from the edge of the excavationshould be in this section rather than in Subsection (j)(3).</T3> (Emphasisadded.)</ITAG>OSHA concludes from this input that the reduced setback for excavations5 feet or less in depth may be adequate and practical in theory, but notin actual practice. Other commenters (Exs. 4-41, 4-88, and 4-113) noted that in some instances,space is limited, and compliance with a 2 foot setback is difficult. Onecommenter (Ex. 4-41) suggested keeping materials at ``sufficient distances''rather than specifying a fixed setback. The Agency disagrees with this approach because ``sufficient distances''is too subjective, and does not provide appropriate employer guidance asto what the regulation requires. Another commenter (Ex. 4-106) supported changing the setback requirementto one foot for excavations less than five feet deep, stating that thechange is valid as far as the hazard from falling materials is concerned.Another commenter (Ex. 4-46) supported the 2 foot setback for excavatedmaterials, and recommended that equipment and materials be kept at least10 feet from the edge of the excavation. One commenter (Ex. 4-115) supported the reduced setback, but provided norationale, and the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, pp. 535-538) recommended increasingthe spoil pile setback to 3 feet, but also gave no rationale. After careful consideration of the record, OSHA concludes that the spoilpile setback distance should not be changed. The current requirement fora 2 foot setback has provided adequate protection for employees. The recordcontains no convincing evidence that increasing the setback to 3 feet ormore is necessary, nor does it indicate that decreasing the setback to1 foot for excavation 5 feet or less in depth, would maintain employeeprotection at the current level. The Agency also notes that employers whoencounter site conditions that do not permit a 2 foot set-back must useretaining devices to prevent materials or equipment from falling into theexcavation. Therefore, based on the above discussion, OSHA promulgates paragraph (j)(2)as proposed and renumbered. Section 1926.651(k) of the final rule sets out provisions for inspectionsand requires that:<ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Daily inspections of excavations, the adjacent areas, and protectivesystems shall be made by a competent person for evidence of a situationthat could result in possible cave-ins, indications of failure of protectivesystems, hazardous atmospheres, or other hazardous conditions. An inspectionshall be conducted by the competent person prior to the start of work andas needed throughout the shift. Inspections shall also be made after everyrainstorm or other hazard increasing occurrence. These inspections areonly required when employee exposure can be reasonably anticipated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Where the competent person finds evidence of a situation thatcould result in possible cave-ins, indication of failure of protectivesystems, hazardous atmospheres, or other hazardous conditions, exposedemployees shall be removed from the hazardous areas until the necessaryprecautions have been taken to ensure their safety.</ITAG>These provisions are similar to the proposed rule, which consolidated requirementsin existing andSection;andSection; 1926.650(i) and 1926.651 (d) and (o). The existing requirement in andSection; 1926.650(i) states: ``If evidenceof possible cave-ins or slides is apparent, all work in the excavationshall cease until the necessary precautions have been taken to safeguardemployees.'' This is the only requirement that specifically identifieswhat is necessary if a hazardous condition is identified, and it only appliesto evidence of cave-ins or slides. It is OSHA's opinion that during thecourse of work in excavations, other hazardous conditions can develop,and that the object of daily inspections must be to identify these conditionsas well as to take precautions to protect employees. Therefore, the proposedrequirement was written with this intent.The existing provision also requires that ``all work in the excavationshall cease * * *.'' OSHA recognizes that in many instances a hazardouscondition may be limited to only a small area of the excavation. For example,inspection might reveal a weakness in the support system which increasesthe possibility of a cave-in in a small area of a very large excavation.In such a situation, OSHA does not believe it is necessary to require that``all work'' throughout the entire excavation cease until this isolatedproblem is repaired. Therefore, OSHA proposed to change the requirementto require that ``exposed employees shall be removed from the hazardousareas until the necessary precautions have been taken to ensure their safety.''OSHA received three comments and ACCSH input on this provision. These commenters(Exs. 4-53, 4-88, and 4-91) agreed with the proposed requirement, but twocommenters (Exs. 4-53 and 4-88) objected to any additional requirementfor a written inspection log as suggested in Issue 8 in the preamble ofthe proposal (52 FR 12295). The ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, p. 519) supported creatingan inspection certification to verify that the inspection was done. However,based on the discussion of Issue 8 above, the Agency will not require thekeeping of a written inspection log. OSHA, however, agrees with the ACCSH recommendation that the excavationshould be inspected prior to the start of the work shift. This suggestionexpresses the Agency's original regulatory intent more clearly, and therefore,OSHA has revised the standard to reflect this input. Therefore, OSHA promulgates andSection; 1926.651(k) as revised. Section 1926.651 (l) and (l)(2) provide interim fall protection requirementsfor excavations. These provisions are unchanged from andSection; 1926.651(w),and andSection; 1926.651(t), respectively, in the existing standard. In theproposal, OSHA intended to redesignate these provisions into the fall protectionrequirements in revised subpart M. However, the revisions to subpart Mare not yet completed. Therefore, for the time being, these provisionswill be retained in subpart P. When the revised subpart M is issued, andSection;1926.651(l)(2) of this Final Rule will be revoked. The fall protectionrequirements contained therein will be covered in subpart M, and andSection;1926.652(e)(1)(vi) of this Final Rule addresses the requirement for backfillingexcavations. Additionally, at the same time, andSection; 1926.651(l)(1) ofthis Final Rule will be revised by the new subpart M to remove the fallprotection requirements (51 FR 42735). Section 1926.652 of this Final Rule details the requirements for protectivesystems. Paragraph (a)(1) of this Final Rule requires that ``Each employeein an excavation shall be protected from cave-ins by an adequate protectivesystem designed in accordance with paragraph (b) or (c) of this sectionexcept when: ``(i) Excavations are made entirely in stable rock; or ``(ii) Excavations are less than 5 feet (1.52 m) in depth and examinationof the ground by a competent person provides no indication of a potentialcave-in.'' This provision is essentially identical to proposed andSection; 1926.651(j)(1)except for editorial changes. This provision was moved from its locationin proposed andSection; 1926.651(a)(1) based on comments (Exs. 4-82, 4-102,4-106 and 4-109) that it was more appropriate in andSection; 1926.652, whichspecifically addresses employee protection in excavations. Proposed paragraph (j)(1) required that employees in excavations be protectedfrom cave-ins by the installation or use of an adequate protective systemwhich meets the requirements of proposed andSection; 1926.652, ``Requirementsof protective systems.'' This requirement was written in performance-orientedlanguage, consistent with the approach of the overall proposed standard.This proposed paragraph consolidated and replaced several existing requirementsand paragraphs. The existing paragraphs affected include andSection;andSection;1926.651 (c), (m), and (q), and 1926.652 (a), (b), (c), (e), (f), and (k).The existing standard is arranged in a format consisting of andSection; 1926.651,``Specific Excavation Requirements,'' and andSection; 1926.652, ``SpecificTrenching Requirements.'' Each of these sections contains provisions designedto protect employees against cave-ins. The substantive requirements for``excavations'' often overlap those for ``trenches.'' Thus, an excavationemployer may not always be sure which of the existing standards apply toa particular situation. Some of the current requirements indicate when cave-in protection is requiredbut provide little direct guidance as to how it is to be provided. Forexample, existing andSection; 1926.651(c) states: ``The walls and faces ofall excavations in which employees are exposed to danger from moving groundshall be guarded by a shoring system, sloping of the ground, or some otherequivalent means.'' On the other hand, some provisions set forth specific means of compliance.For example, existing andSection; 1926.652(f) states: ``Employees enteringbell-bottom pier holes shall be protected by the installation of removable-typecasing of sufficient strength to resist shifting of the surrounding earth.''Some of the current requirements specify the earth conditions in whichcave-in protection is required. For example, existing andSection; 1926.652(b)states: ``Sides of trenches in unstable or soft material, 5 feet or morein depth, shall be shored, sheeted, braced, sloped, or otherwise supportedby means of sufficient strength to protect the employees working withinthem. (See Tables P-1, P-2 * * *:)'' In Table P-1, terms such as ``compacted angular gravels,'' ``compactedsharp sand,'' and ``average soils'' are used to describe the earth conditions.In Table P-2, terms such as ``hard, compact,'' ``likely to crack,'' and``soft, sandy, or filled'' are used to describe the earth conditions. Other existing requirements specify when special or additional precautionsare necessary. For example, existing andSection; 1926.651(m) states: ``Specialprecautions shall be taken in sloping or shoring the sides of excavationsadjacent to a previously backfilled excavation or a fill, particularlywhen the separation is less than the depth of the excavation. Particularattention also shall be paid to joints and seams of material comprisinga face and the slope of such seams and joints.'' The existing requirements do not appear in any specific order. In addition,it is not always clear when provisions apply to a given situation. However,the one common feature of all the existing requirements is that cave-inprotection is required. Therefore, based on this central requirement, OSHAproposed to revise its existing standards to allow any of several typesof protective systems to be used, provided that the system will provideprotection against cave-ins. OSHA intended this revision to be more performance-orientedthan the current standard, while providing greater clarity and guidanceas to what steps the employer must take to protect employees from cave-ins.OSHA believes that there is a potential for a cave-in in virtually allexcavations. However, experience has shown that the probability of a cave-independs upon the combined effects of many factors (Ex. 2-5). These factorsinclude the depth of the excavation, the type of soil involved, the abilityof the soil to resist stress imposed on the soil from the weight of thesoil itself and from static and dynamic surcharge loads, and from changesin the ability of the soil to resist stress due to exposure to environmentalconditions over a period of time. In recognition of the low probabilityof a cave-in occurring in certain circumstances, the proposal, as doesthe current standard, sets forth two exceptions to the requirement to providecave-in protection. Proposed paragraph (j)(1)(i) stated that excavations in stable rock areexempt from cave-in protection requirements. This proposed exception wasconsistent with the existing standard which states in Note (1) to TableP-2 that ``shoring is not required in solid rock, hard shale, or hard slag.''The term ``stable rock'' was used in the proposed standard instead of theabove terms and was defined in andSection; 1926.650(b)(20) of the proposal.The second exception, which was stated in proposed paragraph (j)(1)(ii),allowed the suspension of the requirement to provide cave-in protectionin excavations less than 5 feet (1.5 m) in depth, but only if a competentperson first examined the ground and found no indication that a cave-inshould be expected. The exception in proposed paragraph (j)(1)(ii) continued the existing exceptionwhich applied to excavations less than 5 feet in depth. In addition, itclarified that cave-in protection would not be required for such excavationsonly after a competent person first examined the ground and found no evidenceof a potential cave-in. The existing standard in andSection; 1926.652(a) states: ``Trenches lessthan five feet in depth <T3>shall also be effectively protected when examination of the ground</T3>indicates hazardous ground movement is expected'' (emphasis added).On its face this requirement does not seem to require that an examinationfirst be conducted, or who must conduct it. However, existing andSection;1926.650(i) states: ``Daily inspections of excavations shall be made bya competent person * * *.'' The proposal clarified that inspections mustfirst be conducted before an employer could use the exception of not providingcave-in protection in excavations less than 5 feet in depth. There wouldbe a presumption that excavations less than 5 feet deep need to be protectedunless there is a determination by a competent person that such protectionis not needed.OSHA received four other comments on proposed andSection; 1926.651(j)(1).One commenter (Ex. 4-28) recommended deleting the reference to the morespecific andSection; 1926.652 because it was inappropriate. Moving this provisionto andSection; 1926.652(a) of the Final Rule, as discussed above, adequatelyresponds to the concern. Another commenter (Ex. 4-46) suggested revising paragraph (j)(1)(ii) tospecify that if there is evidence of moving ground in excavations 5 feetor less in depth, the excavation should be shored or sloped. The Agencybelieves this is not needed because andSection; 1926.652(a) of this finalrule requires a protective system unless the conditions of the exceptionare met. An additional commenter (Ex. 4-30) recommended that OSHA allow a vertical5 foot section at the bottom of all trenches since trenches with depthsof 5 feet or less do not normally require shoring or sloping. This issueis discussed in detail later in the preamble under the discussion of AppendixB. One other commenter (Ex. 4-4) recommended requiring cave-in protectionfor excavations 5 feet or more deep, regardless of soil type (even stablerock), however, no supporting information was provided. Consequently, OSHAis not convinced that this recommendation is appropriate. As discussedabove, experience has shown that there is such a very low probability ofcave-in in stable rock that OSHA does not believe it warrants the use ofcave-in protection. Therefore based on the above discussion, OSHA promulgates andSection; 1926.652(a)(1)as revised editorially and renumbered. Section 1926.652(a)(2) of the Final Rule requires that ``Protective systemsshall have the capacity to resist without failure all loads that are intendedor could reasonably be expected to be applied or transmitted to the system.''This provision is virtually identical to proposed andSection; 1926.652(a),but has been revised editorially and has been renumbered to accommodateformat revisions as discussed above. The existing standard does not contain a requirement directly addressingthe capacity of protective systems. Such a requirement is necessary inorder to clarify the design goal. However, consistent with the approachtaken in the proposal, this requirement is written in performance-orientedlanguage. As discussed earlier, proposed andSection; 1926.651(j)(1) (andSection;1926.652(a)(1) of this Final Rule) sets forth those situations requiringcave-in protection, and identifies the hazards from which employees areto be protected. Therefore, the employer must first select a protectivesystem for these conditions and hazards. Once a protective system has beenselected, this paragraph sets forth performance criteria that must be metby that system. The paragraphs immediately following this paragraph addressdifferent methods and approaches that can be used to provide the requiredlevel of protection. OSHA received no comment on this provision and therefore promulgates paragraph(a)(2) as proposed and renumbered. The introductory text of andSection; 1926.652(b) of this Final Rule requiresthat ``The slopes and configurations of sloping and benching systems shallbe selected and constructed by the employer or his designee and shall bein accordance with the requirements of paragraph (b)(1); or, in the alternative,paragraph (b)(2); or, in the alternative, paragraph (b)(3); or, in thealternative, paragraph (b)(4), as follows''. The provision is virtuallyidentical to the proposed rule except that an option for sloping in accordancewith tabulated data is provided as is discussed under Issue 10 above. Paragraph (b) provides four alternative methods of protecting employeesfrom cave-in, arranged in order of increasing degree of performance required,based upon the degree to which the employer performs soil classificationanalysis needed to do the alternative. Design of other types of cave-inprotection is addressed in andSection; 1926.652(c). OSHA received no comments specifically directed to this provision. However,many commenters provided general input concerning all provisions underthis paragraph (b), or input supporting incorporation of a fourth optionfor sloping as addressed by Issue 10. For example, several commenters (Exs.4-21, 4-23, 4-31, 4-40, 4-42, 4-54, and 4-86) suggested that OSHA use theterms ``steeper than or flatter than'' rather than ``greater than or lesserthan,'' with reference to slope angles in order to avoid confusion. OSHAagrees that the suggested wording would express the Agency's regulatoryintent more clearly and has amended the language accordingly. Other commenters (Exs. 4-21, 4-23, 4-31, 4-40, 4-42, 4-78, and 4-86) supportedthe addition of a fourth option for sloping (See the discussion of Issue10 above). Based on the above discussion, OSHA promulgates the introductory text toparagraph (b) as revised. Section 1926.652(b)(1) (i) and (ii) of this Final Rule provide requirementsfor sloping Option (1). These requirements state:<ITAG tagnum="21">(1) <T3>Option (1)_Allowable configurations and slopes.</T3> (i) Excavationsshall be sloped at an angle not steeper than one and one-half horizontalto one vertical (34 degrees measured from the horizontal), unless the employeruses one of the other options listed below. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The slopes specified in paragraph (b)(1) (i) of this sectionshall be excavated to form configurations that are in accordance with theslopes shown for Type C soil in Appendix B to this Subpart.</ITAG>This requirement is very different than the proposal. In addition to removingthe element of short term/long term excavations, as discussed in Issue4 above, ``greater'' has been replaced by ``steeper'' for clarity, as discussedabove; and the reference to Figures B-1 through B-1.5 has been deletedbecause of another revision discussed below. In this first option, employers who do not make any effort to classifythe soil are required to cut excavation sides to an angle that is not steeperthan one and one-half horizontal to one vertical (34 degrees measured fromthe horizontal), as specified in paragraph (b)(1)(i). In OSHA's opinion, the slope required by this paragraph is safe for virtuallyall soils. Since, under this option, the employer is not required to makeany attempt to differentiate between more stable and less stable soil types,the slope required is conservative to ensure that employees will be protectedadequately in those instances where poor soil conditions are encountered.The required slope angle specified is identical to the slope angle thatis required for the worst soil condition determined under Option (2) below.As will be explained below, the employer is required, under the secondoption, to differentiate between more stable and less stable soil types.Steeper slopes are allowed in soils determined to be more stable. By requiringa slope in Option (1) that is the same as the worst case under Option (2),a necessary level of consistency in the requirements is maintained. Ifa steeper slope were allowed under Option (1), the situation could arisewhere an employee might be required to slope an excavation to a greaterdegree after making an effort to determine the soil type than would berequired if no soil classification had been made at all. Sloping is setat a worst case angle in Option (1) to assure that protection is providedeven where the employer makes no determination of soil type or stability.In paragraph (b)(1)(ii), the requirements state that the configurationsof slopes excavated under Option (1) must conform to the configurationillustrated for Type C soils shown in appendix B to subpart P. This isto assure that slopes permitted under Option (1) are at least as protectiveas those set forth under the second design option in andSection; 1926.652(b)(2).OSHA received seven comments on the proposed provision and input from theACCSH. One commenter (Ex. 4-17) suggested decreasing the short term/longterm time from 72 hours to 24 hours, while another (Ex. 4-91) stronglysupported the proposed 72 hours. Another commenter (Ex. 4-37) endorsedthis provision as ``fail safe'' and further noted that it can be employedby anyone with a minimum of experience. Other commenters (Exs. 4-4, 4-28,and 4-53) objected for various reasons, including opposition to the shortterm/long term concept (Ex. 4-28); opposition to the title of this section,which the commenter implied required all trenches to be sloped (Ex. 4-53);and objection to the standard permitting compound slopes in referencedfigure B-1.5 (Ex. 4-4). One commenter (Ex. 4-53) also recommended addingweather conditions to the criteria in determining configuration and slope.Based on a review of the entire record on this subject (including specificallyIssue 4), the Agency promulgates andSection; 1926.652(b)(1) as revised. Section 1926.652(b)(2) of this Final Rule provides the requirement forsloping Option (2), determination of slopes and configurations using AppendicesA and B, which requires that ``Maximum allowable slopes, and allowableconfigurations for sloping and benching systems, shall be determined inaccordance with the conditions and requirements set forth in AppendicesA and B to this Subpart.'' This provision is identical to the proposedrule. In this second option, designs must be in accordance with the conditionsand requirements set forth in appendices A and B to subpart P. In brief,Appendix A is a method of classifying soil and rock conditions, takinginto account soil, environmental, and load conditions. Appendix A dividesall soils into four classifications: Stable Rock, Type A, Type B and TypeC. (See discussion for appendix A below.) Appendix B contains requirementsspecifying the maximum allowable slopes for each of the four classifications.In stable rock, vertical sides are allowed. For Types A, B, and C the maximumallowable slopes vary, with steeper slopes allowed for Type A. AppendixB also contains illustrations of sloping and benching configurations thatare acceptable. (See discussion for appendix B below.) OSHA received three comments on this provision. Two commenters (Exs. 4-28and 4-64) opposed allowing the employer or the competent person to classifysoil and choose a protective system. The other commenter (Ex. 4-37) supportedthis provision and considered this option to be the ``rule of thumb,''which is based on site conditions as determined by the competent person.The Agency disagrees with the two commenters who oppose letting the competentperson or the employer use Appendices A and B, noting that these appendicesare actually intended for use by non-engineers. OSHA further notes thatthese appendices provide much more guidance than the current standard,which permits the competent person to determine the degree of protectionnecessary. Therefore, based on the above discussion, OSHA promulgates andSection; 1926.652(b)(2)as proposed. New andSection; 1926.652(b)(3) of the Final Rule adds another option forsloping, <T3>Option (3)_Designs using other tabulated data </T3>which requires that:<ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Designs of sloping or benching systems shall be selected fromand be in accordance with tabulated data, such as tables and charts. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The tabulated data shall be in written form and include all ofthe following: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Identification of the parameters that affect the selection ofa sloping or benching system drawn from such data; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Identification of the limits of use of the data to include themagnitude and configuration of slopes determined to be safe; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) Explanatory information as may be necessary to aid the user inmaking a correct selection of a protective system from the data. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) At least one copy of the tabulated data, which identifies theregistered professional engineer who approved the data, shall be maintainedat the jobsite during construction of the protective system. After thattime the data may be stored off the jobsite, but a copy of the data shallbe made available to the Secretary upon request.</ITAG>This paragraph is new, and is based on input received on Issues 10 and14 of the proposal. These issues are discussed in detail earlier in thispreamble. Section 1926.652(b)(4) of this Final Rule, <T3>Option (4)_Design by a registered professional engineer, </T3>requiresthat:<ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Sloping and benching systems not utilizing Option (1), Option(2), or Option (3) under paragraph (b) of this section shall be approvedby a registered professional engineer.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Designs shall be in written form and shall include at least thefollowing: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) The magnitude of the slopes that were determined to be safe forthe particular project; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) The configurations that were determined to be safe for the particularproject; and, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) The identity of the registered professional engineer approvingthe design. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) At least one copy of the design shall be maintained at the jobsitewhile the slope is being constructed. After that time the design need notbe at the jobsite, but a copy shall be made available to the Secretaryupon request.</ITAG>These provisions are essentially the same as those in proposed paragraph(b)(3), except that ``qualified person'' has been deleted, and ``qualifiedengineer'' has been changed to ``registered professional engineer'' asdiscussed under Issue 2 above. In addition, the requirement that the designbe made available to the Secretary has been revised slightly, as discussedbelow, and the explanatory note has been dropped from the language of paragraph(b)(4)(iii) of this Final Rule. In this option, paragraph (b)(4) sets forth three requirements. The first,paragraph (b)(4)(i), requires that sloping and benching systems be approvedby a registered professional engineer. However, a person under the directionof a registered professional engineer is also allowed to design slopingand benching systems under this option, because in this relationship, theregistered professional engineer would still be responsible for and approvethe design. This approval need be no more than a stamp indicating the identityof the registered professional engineer approving the design. A second requirement under this option, paragraph (b)(4)(ii), is that designsbe in written form and include, as a minimum, the following information:(a) The magnitude of the slopes that were determined to be safe for theparticular project; (b) The configurations that were determined to be safefor the particular project; and, (c) The identity of the individual approvingthe design. The third requirement, set forth in paragraph (b)(4)(iii), is that at leastone copy of the design be maintained at the jobsite while the slope isbeing constructed. After that, the design need not be kept on the jobsite,but a copy must be made available to the Secretary upon request. In OSHA'sopinion, these requirements are necessary to insure that adequate designswill be prepared. Under this option, the employer is allowed a wide rangeof discretion to determine the degree of the hazard and to determine thenecessary level of protection against the hazard. It provides no specificrestrictions as to maximum allowed slopes or configurations that a registeredprofessional engineer might design or approve. Therefore, under the option,slopes steeper than those allowed under the other options could be used.Configurations different from those allowed under the other options couldalso be used. This fourth option is the most performance-oriented of theoptions provided; and relies heavily on the prudence, competence and expertiseof the person selected by the employer to design the system. The proposed requirements that original engineering design, and tabulateddata (including manufacturer's data) be made available to the Secretaryhave been modified slightly. After a protective system is constructed,such data or designs need not be kept at the jobsite, but need only bemade available to the Secretary on request. The proposal indicated thatsuch data or designs must be made available only so long as an excavationis open or only during an inspection. In the Final Rule the requirementis more simply stated that such documentation must be provided upon requestto the Secretary. This will insure that such data is also available whenan excavation is no longer open, and after a physical inspection is concluded.If there is any issue as to what designs or data were utilized after thephysical inspection of the worksite is concluded or after a cave-in, theSecretary must be able to obtain such information. OSHA solicited opinion on whether or not additional information shouldbe required on any design. The input received concerning this matter isaddressed below at the end of the discussion of paragraph (b)(4) of thisFinal Rule. Because of the wide discretion allowed, OSHA believes that stricter requirementsare needed to verify that design requirements have been met. Therefore,OSHA is requiring that designs be in written form, and that they be madereadily available to the Secretary upon request. In OSHA's opinion, requiring that designs be in written form will not imposea significant burden upon employers. When an employer utilizes an individualto design a sloping and benching system, the results of the design effortmust be communicated to the employer, and to those responsible for implementingthe design, in some manner. Under current industry practice, this is notdone orally, but by the preparation of a written plan. OSHA is revising the portions of Subpart P relating to sloping for severalreasons. The existing standard allows only one approach to be used to determinethe degree of slope required to protect employees against cave-ins. Thisapproach requires that excavations be sloped to the ``angle of repose.''As noted earlier, this term, as currently defined, does not conform toits use in civil engineering and has resulted in considerable confusionin the field. In addition, the existing approach is not consistent withOSHA's desire to place greater emphasis on the use of performance-orientedstandards. More flexibility is possible by allowing the employer the choiceto use any of several acceptable approaches to provide the required levelof safety for employees. OSHA is also revising the standard so as to provide greater clarity asto what is required of the employer. Interviews with contractors have indicatedthat some provisions in the existing standard relating to sloping are difficultto understand (Ex. 2-3). This difficulty is due apparently to the present format in which specificrequirements relating to sloping appear in various places in the standardbut in no apparent order. It also results from the fact that the soil typescurrently specified in Table P-1 (compacted sharp sand, average soil, etc.)are not defined. The use and application of the terms ``hard, compact soil''and ``unstable or soft material'' in the current standard have been thesource of considerable confusion and have resulted in considerable litigation.In addition, there are other related format problems that have been discussedpreviously in this preamble. It was stated earlier that the existing Subpart P is divided into two sectionscontaining specific requirements. Section 1926.651 is titled ``SpecificExcavation Requirements;'' and andSection; 1926.652 is titled ``SpecificTrenching Requirements.'' In andSection; 1926.651 there are several referencesto sloping. These references appear in existing andSection; 1926.651 (c),(d), (g), (h), (j), and (m), and specify that sloping can be used as amethod of protection against cave-ins. They require that when sloping isused ``all slopes be excavated to at least the angle of repose * * *.''In addition, it is required that adjustments be made to the angle of repose,i.e., flattening, when certain conditions are present. These requirementsare not presented in a concise, logical order and there is no guidancegiven to the employer in existing andSection; 1926.651 indicating eitherwhat the ``angle of repose'' is or to what degree it must be adjusted forthe specific conditions mentioned. Although Table P-1 does give an indicationof certain ``angles of repose,'' this Table is located in existing andSection;1926.652; and no direct reference to the Table is made in andSection; 1926.651.Further, as discussed earlier, there are technical problems with the useof the term ``angle of repose.'' (See discussion above for andSection; 1926.650_``Scope,Application, and Definitions Applicable to this Subpart.'') In the current andSection; 1926.652, reference to sloping appears in existingandSection; 1926.652 (b), (c), and (k). These requirements, in general, areintended to give more specific guidance to employers as to the degree ofsloping required. Table P-1 is referenced in both existing andSection; 1926.652(a) and (b), but the language of the existing standard regarding the useof Table P-1 apparently has not been clear to some employers. For example,existing andSection; 1926.652(a) states: ``Refer to Table P-1 as a <T3>guide </T3>in sloping of banks.'' (Emphasis added.) Some employershave contended that the table is, therefore, not mandatory. However, existingandSection; 1926.652(b) is phrased in a manner more consistent with its intendedmandatory nature. Other difficulties are noted that relate to specific terms used in thecurrent standard. For example, 45 degrees is indicated in Table P-1 asthe appropriate angle for sloping ``average soils.'' ``Average soil'' isnot defined in the existing standard, nor are the other terms used in TableP-1. Further, only two terms used in the standard itself to describe soilsare presently defined. These terms are ``hard compact soil'' and ``unstablesoil.'' Neither term appears inTable P-1, and existing andSection; 1926.652(b) and (c) use the terms ``unstable <T3>or </T3>soft'' and ``hard <T3>or </T3>compact.'' (Emphasis added.) OSHA has concluded that these difficulties can be eliminated, and at thesame time a more effective standard for sloping can be created, by revisingthe language and format of the current standard. OSHA proposed a format allowing employers to choose from several designalternatives discussed above. These alternatives allow the employer flexibilityto determine the degree to which excavation sides must be sloped to protectemployees against cave-ins.The calculation of the degree to which excavation sides must be slopedto protect employees against cave-ins can be a difficult task. This isbecause of the many factors that must be taken into account which can affectthe stability of sloped excavation sides. These factors include: The soiltype and its ability to resist stress; changes in the ability of the soilto resist stress due to the effects of exposure to environmental conditionssuch as freezing, thawing, or rain; loads imposed due to the particularconfiguration of the excavation; and loads imposed due to the presenceof water, and the variation of the water content in the soil. Other factorsinclude: Loads imposed by the presence of structures, equipment, overlyingmaterial or stored equipment; and loads imposed due to dynamic forces suchas vibration from equipment, blasting, traffic, or other sources. Soil is a difficult material to work with because there is no control overits structural quality. In addition, its properties vary from place toplace, and they change with the passage of time due to environmental exposure.There is an infinite number of combinations of conditions and factors thatcan affect soil stability. Because of these variables, a great degree ofcaution must be exercised when relying on its strength in order to designand provide a sloping system with a desired level of protection. There are practices that are accepted by the engineering community thatcan be followed to determine safe slopes for most situations. These practicesinclude analyzing soil samples to determine properties of the soil; evaluatingintended or expected load conditions and sequences; and considering thepossible effects of environmental exposure. Soil analysis can be accomplishedin the field, using simple field testing techniques. More extensive andaccurate soil analysis can also be done in the laboratory. In addition,slope stability analysis is often used to predict the behavior of a slope.Full scale models have also been used to predict expected behavior. In OSHA's opinion, however, it is not feasible or necessary to requirea rigid soil exploration and analysis program, or a slope stability analysis,for every trench or other excavation that is made. To avoid such specificationsin the standard, OSHA is allowing two options in which the required slopeangles are specified. In the opinion of the Agency, these two approacheswill serve the needs of the industry and provide safe working conditionsfor employees. OSHA also recognizes that the first two options could beunnecessarily restrictive in some situations. Thus, OSHA is permittingother design alternatives as discussed below, to allow the employer todetermine the degree of protection required for any particular circumstance.OSHA received 10 comments on proposed paragraph (b)(3) and input from theACCSH. Several commenters (Exs. 4-4, 4-17, 4-28, and 4-37) and the ACCSHsupported limiting this responsibility to at least ``qualified engineers,''or registered civil engineers. This is in line with the determination madeon Issue 2 discussed above. Other commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, 4-106, 4-109, and 4-113) objected tothe requirement that a copy of the design be maintained on site and madeavailable to OSHA during the inspection. The Agency disagrees with theposition of these commenters because the design contains the informationnecessary for the construction and safe use of these protective systemand should therefore, be available at all times. The ACCSH recommendedmaintaining at least one copy of the design at the excavation locationand making it available to employees, employee representatives, or theSecretary upon request. OSHA believes the revised provision provides adequateassurance that the design will be available when necessary. OSHA notesthat andSection; 1926.21 requires that employees be trained in hazard recognitionand avoidance, which means that they are to be informed as to how theyare being protected against cave-ins. Another commenter (Ex. 4-11) suggested the design should include othercriteria such as limitations due to rain or groundwater or surcharge loads,and should indicate the means of access and egress. The Agency recognizesthe significance of these concerns and notes that other specific provisionsof the standard will adequately address these concerns. The ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, pp. 520-521) recommended limiting design to a registeredprofessional engineer, which the Agency has done, based on the input receivedon Issue 2. Additionally, the ACCSH recommended deleting ``an indicationof'' from proposed andSection; 1926.652(b)(3)(ii) (A) and (B) because thephrase is superfluous. The Agency agrees and has revised these provisionsaccordingly. Section 1926.652(c) of the Final rule, ``Design of support systems, shieldsystems, and other protective systems,'' states that ``Designs of supportsystems, shield systems, and other protective systems shall be selectedand constructed by the employer or his designee and shall be in accordancewith the requirements of paragraph (c)(1); or, in  the alternative, paragraph(c)(2); or, in the alternative, paragraph (c)(3); or, in the alternative,paragraph (c)(4) as follows.'' This introductory provision is identicalto the proposed rule. OSHA received no public input on this provision. However, the ACCSH (Tr.8/5/87, p. 522) recommended that OSHA delete the reference to the ``designee''because it is standard practice to consider the management representativeto be the employer. The Agency believes the proposed language makes thispoint clear to those who may not follow the standard practice, and declinesto act on this recommendation.Section 1926.652(c) (1) through (4) list the options allowed for designof support systems, shield systems, and other protective systems. Section 1926.652(c)(1) of the Final Rule sets out Option (1)_Designs usingAppendices A, C and D, and requires that ``Designs for timber shoring intrenches shall be determined in accordance with the conditions and requirementsset forth in appendices A and C to this subpart. Design for aluminum hydraulicshoring shall be in accordance with andSection; 1926.652(c)(2) below, butif manufacturer's tabulated data cannot be utilized, designs shall be inaccordance with appendix D.'' This provision is identical to the proposalexcept for the inclusion of the requirements for the use of the new appendixD, which is dicussed in detail below. The Agency received only one comment on this provision. That commenter(Ex. 4-28) pointed out that it appears that this provision in the proposalapplied only to trenches. This is OSHA's regulatory intent, and, therefore,the Agency has not revised this provision. Paragraph (c)(2) (i) through (iii) or andSection; 1926.652 of the Final Ruleset out Option (2)_<T3>Designs using manufacturer's tabulated data, </T3>and require that:<ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Designs of support systems, shield systems, or other protectivesystems that are drawn from manufacturer's tabulated data shall be in accordancewith all specifications, recommendations, and limitations issued or madeby the manufacturer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Deviation from the specifications, recommendations, and limitationsissued or made by the manufacturer shall only be allowed after the manufacturerissues specific written approval. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Manufacturer's specifications, recommendations, and limitations,and manufacturer's approval to deviate from the specifications, recommendations,and limitations, shall be in written form at the jobsite, during constructionof the protective system. After that time this data may be stored off thejobsite, but a copy shall be made available to the Secretary upon request.</ITAG>These provisions are virtually identical to the proposed rule, except forthe minor revision of the requirement to provide the data to the Secretary.The rationale for this change is discussed above under andSection; 1926.652(b)(4).This second option allows the use of designs based on or drawn from a manufacturer'stabulated data. The manufactured systems generally addressed by the paragraphinclude metal hydraulic shoring and shields. In the past, manufacturershave developed tabulated data that indicated the conditions for which theirvarious products could be used. A trend in the construction industry has been to rely more and more onprotection systems that are manufactured products. The design of a particularproduct, such as a trench shield, can be highly complex and the final designcan often be adapted to a variety of situations, but not to all situations.It is, therefore, incumbent on the employer to ascertain all criteria andlimitations that the manufacturer specifies or recommends regarding theuse of a particular product, and then to use the product accordingly. An employer, then, is allowed a degree of discretion as far as choosinga particular product for use. OSHA believes the likelihood that manufacturedproducts will be used in the manner intended will be enhanced if the specificationsand recommendations that the employer uses to select such products, includingthe limitations set by the manufacturer on their use, are required to beat the jobsite while the system is being constructed, and made availableto the Agency upon  request. OSHA received one comment on these provisions and input from the ACCSH.The commenter (Ex. 4-106) objected to the requirement for retention ofthe manufacturer's specifications at the jobsite. The Agency disagreeswith this commenter for several reasons. First, OSHA is not convinced thatthese manufactured systems can be installed safely from memory. Second,OSHA believes this data must be available in a reasonable amount of timeto the competent person if site conditions change. Finally, OSHA compliancestaff cannot be familiar with every manufactured system that is on themarket, and must have some readily available means to verify that the systemis being used properly if such a question arises during an inspection.The ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, pp. 522-523) recommended that these manufacturer'sspecifications be on site at all times while the excavation is open andbe made available to employees, and employee representatives in additionto the Secretary. The Agency is not convinced that it is necessary forthese specifications to be kept on-site at all times. OSHA believes thatas long as a protective system is constructed in accordance with the specifications,and site conditions do not change, the specifications can be stored orused at another nearby site without decreasing employee safety. Paragraphs (c)(3) (i) through (iii) of andSection; 1926.652 of the finalrule set out option (3)_<T3>Designs using other tabulated data </T3>and require that:<ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Designs of support systems, shield systems, or other protectivesystems shall be selected from and be in accordance with tabulated data,such as tables and charts. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The tabulated data shall be in written form and include all ofthe following:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Identification of the parameters that affect the selection ofa protective system drawn from such data; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Identification of the limits of use of the data; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) Explanatory information as may be necessary to aid the user inmaking a correct selection of a protective system from the data. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) At least one copy of the tabulated data, which identifies theregistered professional engineer who approved the data, shall be maintainedat the jobsite during construction of the protective system. After thattime the data may be stored off the jobsite, but a copy of the data shallbe made available to the Secretary upon request.</ITAG>These provisions are essentially the same as those in the proposal exceptthat ``qualified person'' has been deleted, ``qualified engineer'' hasbeen replaced with ``registered professional engineer,'' and the requirementto make the data available to the Secretary has been modified. The reasonsfor these changes are discussed under Issue 2 above or under andSection;1926.652(b)(4). In this option, it is specified that designs can be selected from othertabulated data, such as tables and charts, that have been approved by aregistered professional engineer. This paragraph is intended to allow employersto develop and use general designs that can be used repetitively and thatmeet the needs of their particular circumstances. OSHA recognizes thatthe design of protective systems can be a highly complex engineering procedurethat involves elements of soil mechanics and structural engineering. Eachexcavation is unique. Therefore, repetitive use of a general design mustbe done with caution. Designs for general applications have limits thatmust not be exceeded, or else employees will be endangered. Tabulated data,therefore, can only be used safely when the necessary information is providedthat explains the limitations of the data and demonstrates that the systemis safe under prevailing soil, load, and environmental conditions. OSHA has determined that the requirements for documentation are necessaryto balance the wide discretion that is allowed employers when they providea system of protection, and to assure that employees are adequately protected.OSHA received nine comments and input from the ACCSH on these provisions.The ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, p. 523) and two commenters (Exs. 4-4 and 4-17) supportedthe use of a ``registered professional engineer'' as discussed under Issue2 above. Four commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, 4-106 and 4-109) objected to the requirementthat the tabulated data be retained on-site during the construction ofthe system and that it be provided during an inspection. OSHA again disagreeswith these four commenters for the same reasons discussed above. Paragraphs (c)(4) (i) through (iv) of andSection; 1926.652 of the final rulerequire that:<ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Support systems, shield systems, and other protective systemsnot utilizing Option (1), Option (2), or Option (3), above, shall be approvedby a registered professional engineer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Designs shall be in written form and shall include the following:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) A plan indicating the sizes, types, and configurations of thematerials to be used in the protective system; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) The identity of the registered professional engineer approvingthe design. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) At least one copy of the design shall be maintained at the jobsiteduring construction of the protective system. After that time, the designmay be stored off the jobsite, but a copy of the design shall be made availableto the Secretary upon request.</ITAG>These requirements are essentially the same as those of the proposal exceptthat ``qualified person'' has been deleted, ``qualified engineer'' hasbeen replaced with ``registered professional engineer'' (as discussed underIssue 2, above), and the explanatory note, defining OSHA's intended meaningfor readily available, has been incorporated into the text of paragraph(c)(4)(iii) as a result of format changes. This paragraph (c)(4) gives employers the flexibility to design protectivesystems for unique applications. There are no specific restrictions orlimitations regarding the application of designs allowed under this option.The employer, through the registered professional engineer, is thus givenwide latitude to judge the degree of the hazard present and to determinethe degree of protection required. OSHA recognizes, because such a wide latitude exists under this provision,that there is a possibility the intended goal will be missed. OSHA is,therefore, promulgating two requirements that are intended to increasethe likelihood that the protective systems designed under this option willbe adequate to protect employees. The first of these requirements, statedin paragraph (c)(4)(ii), requires that ``Designs shall be in written form,''and must, at a minimum, include ``a plan indicating the sizes, types, andconfigurations of the materials to be used in the protective system,''and ``the identity of the registered professional engineer approving thedesign.'' The second requirement, stated in paragraph (c)(4)(iii), requiresthat ``At least one copy of the design shall be maintained at the jobsiteduring the construction of the system, and the design shall be made availableto the Secretary upon request.'' These requirements are similar to those in andSection; 1926.652(b)(4) forsloping and benching. The discussion of those requirements is equally applicablefor the requirements proposed under this paragraph. There are many paragraphs distributed throughout the existing standardthat set forth requirements pertaining to the use of shoring and otherprotective systems. Existing paragraphs (c), (m), (o), and (q) of andSection;1926.651, and paragraphs (b), (c), (e), and (f) of andSection; 1926.652 statewhen use of a protective system is required. Other existing paragraphscontain requirements pertaining to the design of such systems. These includeparagraphs (e), (f), and (k) of andSection; 1926.651; and paragraphs (d),(g), and (k) of andSection; 1926.652. These existing requirements have beenrevised and reorganized to make the standard easier to follow and understand.Some of the shoring requirements in the current standards have been criticizedas being either too inflexible or too difficult to understand. For example,existing table P-2, ``Trench Shoring_Minimum Requirements,'' has been criticizedby contractors as too inflexible (Ex. 2-3). Table P-2 specifies timbersizes of shoring members, but generally only specifies one configurationof members for any particular case. Each case is defined by three parameters:Soil condition, trench depth, and width of trench. OSHA notes that interpretingthe table as not allowing any deviation from the specified configurationsis an inaccurate and overly restrictive reading of table P-2. The tableonly indicates certain configurations that will provide the required minimumprotection. Other configurations that provide equivalent or greater protectionare acceptable. Another problem with existing table P-2 is that selection of a configurationis based on soil classifications and soil conditions that are not definedin the existing standard. The terms are not used in a manner that is consistentwith the way other similar terms relating to soil conditions are used inthe standard. The current standard has also been criticized with regard to its coverageof protective systems other than timber shoring. Several such protectivesystems are in fact mentioned in the existing standard. These include shoring,sloping, use of shields, support systems, bracing, and sheet piling. Ina footnote to table P-2, trench jacks and steel sheet piling are specificallyindicated as being acceptable substitutes for wood members. However, thefailure to mention other systems, particularly metal hydraulic shoring,has led to the mistaken impression among some interested persons that suchsystems are not allowed by the standard. OSHA emphasizes that this is notthe case, either with the current standard or in this revision.OSHA received eight comments and input from the ACCSH on these provisions.Four commenters (Exs. 4-4, 4-17, 4-28, and 4-30) and the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87,pp. 523-524) supported a ``qualified engineer'' or ``registered professionalengineer'' to perform this original design work. These commenters alsovoiced their support in response to Issue 2. Four other commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, 4-106, and 4-109) objected tothe requirement that the design be maintained on the site during constructionof the protective system and that it be provided during an inspection.OSHA disagrees with these commmenters for the same reasons set forth indiscussions above. The ACCSH again recommended that this information be maintained on-siteat all times and be available to employees and employee representativesas well as to the Secretary. OSHA believes it sufficient if designs areon site during construction and available upon request afterwards. Therefore, based on the record, OSHA promulgates andSection; 1926.652(c)(4)(i) through (iv) as revised. Paragraphs (d) (1) through (3) of andSection; 1926.652 of the Final Ruleaddress materials and equipment and require that:<ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Materials and equipment used for protective systems shall be freefrom damage or defects that might impair their proper function. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Manufactured materials and equipment used for protective systemsshall be used and maintained in a manner that is consistent with the recommendationsof the manufacturer, and in a manner that will prevent employee exposureto hazards. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) When material or equipment that is used for protective systemsis damaged, a competent person shall examine the material or equipmentand evaluate its suitability for continued use. If the competent personcannot assure that the material or equipment is able to support the intendedloads or is otherwise suitable for safe use, then such material or equipmentshall be removed from service, and shall be evaluated and approved by aregistered professional engineer before being returned to service.</ITAG>These provisions are essentially the same as those in the proposal, exceptthat paragraph (d)(3) has been revised to address a concern raised by theACCSH which is discussed below. The provisions in paragraph (d) address the hazard to employees resultingfrom the use of damaged or defective components of protective systems.The materials and equipment used for employee protection must be structurallysound. The loss of structural capability due to defects or damage can resultin the failure of a protective system. The existing requirements in andSection;andSection; 1926.651(l) and 1926.652(d)address the condition of materials used for support structures and systems.These requirements have been consolidated into paragraph (d)(1), whichcovers all elements of protective systems and extends to other types ofprotective systems, such as shields. The existing standard does not refer specifically to manufactured items.However, manufactured equipment such as shields and metal hydraulic shoringis used extensively in the industry today. However, to assure their safeuse, these items must be used in strict accordance with the manufacturer'srecommendations and instructions. In addition, the existing standard doesnot clearly address the problem of such items becoming damaged while inuse. Often material and equipment used in temporary protective systemsare designed with only a small factor of safety. If the equipment is damaged,there may be no margin of safety and employees could be in immediate danger.Paragraphs (d) (2) and (3) of the Final Rule address the need for employeesto be protected in these circumstances. OSHA received no public comment on these provisions. However, the ACCSH(Tr. 8/5/87, pp. 524-528) recommended that OSHA require a registered professionalengineer to make the determinations required by paragraph (d)(3). The ACCSHargued that the competent person does not have the expertise to make thesedeterminations. The Agency agrees, in part, with the ACCSH. However, OSHA believes thecompetent person can be relied upon to make some determinations, especiallywhen wooden shoring is used or when there is only superficial damage tomanufactured systems. In situations where damage to manufactured systemsis extensive, or where the competent person cannot assure the safe useof the system in the field, OSHA believes the prudent course of actionis to require the equipment to be evaluated and approved by a registeredprofessional engineer before the equipment is returned to service. Section 1926.652(e)(1) of the Final Rule sets out the general provisionsfor the installation and removal of support system, and reads as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Members of support systems shall be securely connected togetherto prevent sliding, falling, kickouts, or other predictable failure. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Support systems shall be installed and removed in a manner thatprotects employees from cave-ins, structural collapses, or from being struckby members of the support system. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Individual members of support systems shall not be subjectedto loads exceeding those which those members were designed to withstand.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Before temporary removal of individual members begins, additionalprecautions shall be taken to ensure the safety of employees, such as installingother structural members to carry the loads imposed on the support system.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Removal shall begin at, and progress from, the bottom of the excavation.Members shall be released slowly so as to note any indication of possiblefailure of the remaining members of the structure or possible cave-in ofthe sides of the excavation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vi) Backfilling shall progress together with the removal of supportsystems from excavations.</ITAG>This provision is virtually identical to the proposal except for some editorialchanges to clarify the Agency's intent. Installation and removal of support systems, which can involve significantmaterial-handling activity, are particularly hazardous periods in excavationwork. Additionally, partially completed support systems will not reactto loads in the same manner as completed structures. Individual memberscan become overloaded and fail, leading to a general failure of other portionsof the support system. Therefore, employees can be exposed to cave-ins,the collapse of adjacent structures, or collapse of the support systemif the employees are not properly protected during installation and removal.Paragraph (e)(1) contains six requirements that address these hazards.Four of these requirements (Final (e)(1) (i), (iv), (v) and (vi)) are basedon existing requirements found in three existing andSection;andSection; 1926.651(f),and 1926.652 (j) and (l). In the proposal and in the Final Rule, the existingprovisions have been grouped into a more logical, easier-to-follow formatunder one paragraph heading. The requirements in existing andSection; 1926.652that currently apply only to specific trenching situations will be extendedto cover all excavations because the hazard addressed by those requirementsexist whenever and wherever support systems are being installed or removed.The other two proposed requirements, (e)(1)(ii) and (e)(1)(iii) were new.These specifically require protection for employees from cave-ins, thecollapse of structures, or from being struck by members of the supportsystem. The proposal required, in addition, that individual members ofsupport systems not be subjected to loads exceeding the design loads ofthose members.  OSHA received ten comments and input from the ACCSH on these provisions.Many commenters (Exs. 4-21, 4-23, 4-31, 4-40, 4-42, 4-54, and 4-86) recommendedadding the word ``predictable'' between ``other'' and ``failures'' to indicatethat the design and installation of support systems take into account factorsthat can be reasonably anticipated. The Agency agrees that the word ``predictable''should be inserted as recommended, and has revised the standard reformattingthese provisions. However, the Agency sees no merit in the suggested reformatting,and declines to act on that recommendation.  The ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, pp. 528-529) recommended that OSHA revise the headingof paragraph (e) to read ``Installation, modification, and temporary orpermanent removal of support system.'' Additionally, the ACCSH recommendedrequiring that       all installation, modification, changes, or removalbe done in  accordance with a plan supplied by a registered professional engineer or be done under the direct supervision of a  registered professionalengineer. The Agency has determined  that the language requested in thefirst ACCSH suggestion is  not necessary, and notes that these provisionsare not  intended to address modifications of the support system (see andSection; 1926.652(c)).  OSHA also notes that there is no other evidence in the  record to supportthe suggested requirement to have a  registered professional engineer eitherplan or supervise the  installation or removal of support systems. OSHAbelieves  that it would be both impractical and unnecessary to have an engineer involved in installation and removal of support  systems forevery excavation.  The ACCSH also suggested language to clarify the intent  of paragraphs(e)(1), (iv), and (v). The Agency has  incorporated these suggestions. OSHA received three other comments (Exs. 4-17, 4-91, and  4-111) basicallyagreeing with these provisions or suggesting  clarifications that werealready addressed by OSHA's  incorporation of the ACCSH's suggested revisions. Paragraph andSection; 1926.652(e)(2) of the Final Rule, <T3>Additional      requirements for support systems for trench excavations,</T3>requires that:<ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Excavation of material to a level not  greater than 2 feet (.61m)below the  bottom of the members of a support  system shall be permitted,but only if  the system is designed to resist the  forces calculated forthe full depth  of the trench, and there are no  indications while thetrench is open  of a possible loss of soil from behind  or below the bottomof the support  system.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Installation of a support system shall  be closely coordinatedwith the  excavation of trenches.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">These requirements are virtually identical to the proposal,  exceptparagraph (e)(2)(i) contains language that allows  excavation to a levelnot greater than 2 feet (.61 m) below  the bottom of the members of a supportsystem of a trench. It  applies only to trenches. This provision, basedupon  recommendations made to OSHA by NBS (Ex. 2-6), helps to  clarifywhat was meant by the phrase ``installed so as to be  effective to thebottom of the excavation'' found in existing  andSection; 1926.652(d) ofthe current trenching standards. The revised  provision recognizes thattrench support systems in some  instances need not always be installedto the bottom of the  excavation. If designed to resist the forces calculatedfor the full depth of the excavation, the system can be fully effective,even if it does not extend to the bottom. Paragraph (e)(2)(ii) requires that installation of     support systemsbe closely coordinated with the excavation of trenches. This is a revisionof existing andSection; 1926.652(i). The ACCSH suggested that the existingand proposed requirements be dropped (Ex. 2-8, p. 400) because they seemedto apply to all trenches, even where there would be no employee exposureto cave-in hazards (i.e., where no employees enter the trenches). However,this paragraph is intended to apply only where employees are exposed tocave-in hazards. As with all OSHA standards, these provisions apply onlywhere there is exposure of employees to hazards or potential hazards. Coordination of installation of the support system with the excavationof the trench will reduce the possibility that a cave-in will occur. Thelonger a trench is open, the more likely it is to cave-in. Essentially,where employees will be expected to enter a trench, it is a safe work practiceto install the support system as soon as possible after excavation. OSHAbelieves that this proposed requirement is necessary to assure employeesafety in trenches.  OSHA received 10 comments and additional input from the ACCSH on theseprovisions. Several commenters (Exs. 4-21, 4-23, 4-31, 4-40, 4-42, 4-78,4-86, and 4-91) suggested that excavation more than 2 feet below the supportsystem should be permitted if approved by a qualified person. The Agencynotes that this 2-foot depth has support from NBS, as discussed above.However, the commenters who want to be able to dig       deeper than 2feet below the support system have not presented  evidence to support theirposition for an ``across the board''  relaxation of this requirement.  Employers wishing to excavate deeper than 2 feet below  the support systemmust comply with andSection; 1926.652(c)(4), which  requires design by aregistered professional engineer. OSHA  believes that while deviationsfrom the two foot rule could be  safe in some situations, in order to ensureemployee safety,  employers who dig deeper than 2 feet below a supportsystem  must have a protective system designed by a registered  professionalengineer.   Another commenter (Ex. 4-17) pointed out that the  definition of ``cave-in''is not quite appropriate, as used in  this provision. OSHA agrees and hasrevised this requirement  accordingly. An additional commenter (Ex. 4-111)merely noted  that when sloping, a four-foot bench is allowed.  The ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87, pp. 529-530) recommended  eliminating the 2-footdepth, noting that OSHA should not  allow excavation below the supportsystem unless the system is  so designed. Also, the ACCSH recommended eliminating``of  trenches'' in paragraph (e)(2)(ii) because trenches are  excavations.  The Agency believes that the 2-foot limit, as proposed,  provides adequateemployee protection, and is supported by  NBS. However, as discussed above,excavation deeper than 2        feet below a support system must be designedby a registered  professional engineer. In addition, OSHA notes that paragraph (e)(2)(ii) is directed at trenches because prompt installation  of thesupport system is more critical in trenches than in  excavations in general.  Therefore, based on the record, OSHA promulgates  andSection; 1926.652(e)(2)as revised.   Section 1926.652(f) of the Final Rule requires that ``Employees shallnot be permitted to work on the faces of  sloped or benched excavationsat levels above other employees  except when the employees at the lowerlevels are adequately  protected from the hazard of falling, rolling, orsliding  material or equipment.'' This provision is identical to the  proposal.OSHA received no comment on this requirement.   Paragraphs (g)(1), (i) through (iv) of andSection; 1926.652 of the  FinalRule set out the general provisions for shield systems  and require that:<ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Shield systems shall not be subjected  to loads exceeding thosewhich the  system was designed to withstand.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Shields shall be installed in a manner  to restrict lateral orother hazardous  movement of the shield in the event of  the applicationof sudden lateral  loads.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Employees shall be protected from the  hazard of cave-ins whenentering or exiting the areas protected by  shields.     </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Employees shall not be allowed in shields when shields are beinginstalled, removed, or moved vertically.</ITAG>These provisions are virtually identical to the proposal except that paragraph(g)(1)(iv) has been revised to permit employees to remain inside shieldsbeing moved horizontally. This revision is based on input received on Issue11, discussed above. OSHA received 16 comments and ACCSH input on proposedparagraph (g)(1)(iv), all of which supported this decision. Section 1926.652(g)(2) of the Final Rule requires that ``Excavations ofearth material to a level not greater than 2 feet (.61 m) below the bottomof a shield shall be permitted, but only if the shield is designed to resistthe forces calculated for the full depth of the trench, and there are noindications while the trench is open of a possible loss of soil from behindor below the bottom of the shield.'' This provision is virtually identical to the proposal except for editorialchanges suggested by commenters to clarify the intent. This provision allows excavation of earth material in certain circumstancesto a level not greater than 2 feet (.61 m) below the bottom of shields.The reasoning behind this is identical to that discussed in paragraph (e)(2)(i)above. OSHA received two comments (Exs. 4-17 and 4-111) and  input from the ACCSH[Tr. 8/5/87, p. 530] on this provision. All input was of an editorial natureand was substantially the same as the input received on paragraph (e)(2)(i),discussed above. Relocated and Deleted Paragraphs The fall protection requirements in existing andSection; 1926.651 (t) and(w) are retained in the revision of subpart P until the revised subpartM is issued. These provisions, which require fall protection at remotelylocated excavations and on walkways or bridges crossing over excavations,respectively, will be incorporated into subpart M_Fall Protection. Thisaction is consistent with OSHA's intention to locate most of the provisionsrelating to fall protection in construction together under one subpart.OSHA published a proposed revision of its fall protection standards insubpart M. (See 51 FR 42718, Nov. 25, 1986.) When this proposal is publishedas a Final Rule, the excavation fall protection provisions will be incorporatedinto new subpart M. OSHA is deleting the following existing paragraphs: andSection; 1926.650(e),which requires personal protective equipment as set forth in subpart E;andSection; 1926.651(r), which requires that blasting be performed in accordancewith subpart U; and andSection; 1926.651(y), which requires that laddersbe in accordance with the requirements of subpart L. These references areredundant in that they require nothing different or in addition to therequirements set forth in the respective subparts. In addition, they mightmislead an employer into assuming that other subparts not referenced donot apply to excavations. The requirements of subparts E, U, and L remainapplicable to employees working in and around excavations, as do the othersubparts of part 1926. OSHA is also deleting existing andSection; 1926.652(g). This paragraph presentlystates: ``Minimum requirements for trench timbering shall be in accordancewith Table P-2.'' It also requires that compressive stresses in timberbraces and diagonal shores not be in excess of certain allowable valuesas computed using the given formula. The requirements of this paragraphare not consistent with the approach taken in the Final Rule, which doesallow the employer to select trench timbering from tables, but does notmake the tables minimum requirements for all trench shoring. In addition, OSHA believes that the equation set out in existing andSection;1926.652(g)(2), which is intended to be used for determining the maximumallowable compressive stress in braces and diagonal shores in a wood shoringsystem, is not appropriate for continuation in the standard. OSHA has determinedthat the equation is outdated and should not be carried forward. The useof the specified equation, in a slightly different form, was originallycontained in the USA Standard A10.2_1944, ``Safety Code for Building Construction.''Since that time, new equations for determining allowable compressive loadshave been developed. These newer equations are described in the ``TimberConstruction Manual'' published by the American Institute of Timber Construction(Second edition, 1974.) The more modern equations take into account theshape of the member (i.e., square or round), and the kind of wood usedto produce the member. Allowable stresses (i.e., the maximum stresses towhich a member should be subjected) vary depending upon the species ofwood being considered. The equation given in existing andSection; 1926.652(g)(2)does not account for either of these factors. However, OSHA does not believe that the newer improved equations shouldbe specified in the revised standard. First, in OSHA's opinion, these equationsdo not need to be specified  in the standard itself. As pointed out above,a particular equation is used only to determine the maximum allowable stressto which a certain structural member should be subjected. Today, such informationgenerally is available in tabulated form for most species and grades ofwood. Therefore, it is not necessary to use an equation in the standardto calculate maximum allowable stresses. Furthermore, knowing the maximumallowable stress alone is of little value. The actual stress to which amember is subjected or expected to be subjected must also be known anda comparison made between the actual and allowed stresses. If the actualstress were to exceed the maximum allowable, then the particular membercould not be used. Another reason why equations are not required to be used in the Final Ruleis that they address only one type of load situation. For example, thecurrent equation is only intended to be used to calculate the maximum allowablecompressive stress for wood members acting as columns under axial compressiveloads. However, members are often subject to eccentric loads or lateralloads that create bending stresses in them. These other stresses, aloneor in combination with axial compressive forces, can be critical. Therefore,the maximum allowable and actual stresses for various load conditions needto be considered in addition to the one load condition currently specifiedin the standard. A final reason why use of the existing equation is no longer required isthat it applies only to wood members. Much less wood is used today thanin 1944 when use of the equation was recommended. Other materials, primarilysteel and aluminum, are used more frequently today, and different equationsare used to calculate allowable stresses in members made of these materials.In OSHA's opinion, the alternatives set forth in the appendices of theFinal Rule for design of protective systems will provide added flexibilityfor the employer while increasing the degree of safety afforded the employees,thus eliminating the need for the existing equation. OSHA is also deleting other existing regulations currently in subpart P.Two tables which are part of the present standard have been deleted andwill be replaced by material contained in the Appendices to the standard.The contents of these Appendices are discussed in detail below. ExistingTable P-1, ``Approximate Angle of Repose for Sloping of Sides of Excavations,''would, in effect, be replaced by appendices A and B, which provide a detailedsoil classification scheme and sloping requirements for the employer whoselects the second option for designing sloping system protection. Similarly, existing Table P-2, ``Trench Shoring-Minimum Requirements,''will be replaced by material in appendices A and C.Appendix A_Soil Classification Appendix A details a method of classifying earth deposits, taking intoaccount various environmental conditions, site-specific conditions, andsoil-specific conditions. The results of the categorization of soils inaccordance with this method would then be subsequently used to determinethe level of protection from cave-ins that is required to protect employees.It is not required in every instance that employers use this Appendix asthe basis of classifying earth conditions. The standard provides two optionsfor designing protective systems which involve the use of appendix A. First,andSection; 1926.652(b)(2) provides for the use of appendix A to determinethe requirements for sloping and benching. The second option, in andSection;1926.652(c)(2), uses appendix A to determine the requirements for timbershoring. This Appendix may also be necessary to determine the requirementsfor aluminum hydraulic shoring in accordance with appendix D. OSHA, however,prefers employer to use manufacturer's data (in accordance with andSection;1926.652(c)(2)) where possible, when using aluminum hydraulic shoring.Appendix D is intended for use in the absence of manufacturers data. Itshould be noted again that the employer is required to select one of theoptions set forth in paragraph andSection; 1926.652(b) if using a slopingsystem, or in andSection; 1926.652(c) if using shoring, shields, or anothersystem. When an employer chooses an option where this appendix is to beused, the employer must then adhere faithfully to the requirements andprovisions of the appendix. The appendix then becomes mandatory. Appendix A may also be used in conjunction with appendix D to determinerequirements for the use of aluminum hydraulic shoring in the absence ofmanufacturer's tabulated data permitted in andSection; 1926.652(c)(2). Appendix A is arranged into four major paragraphs. These are: (a) Scopeand Application; (b) Definitions; (c) Requirements; and (d) AcceptableVisual and Manual Tests. The first paragraph states the scope of the appendix and when it is applicable.Terms used throughout the appendix are defined in the second paragraph.The requirements for making soil classifications are set forth in the thirdparagraph and basically state that the classifications, as defined in theprevious paragraph, shall be determined based on the results of visualand manual analyses. Acceptable visual and manual analyses are describedin the fourth paragraph. OSHA recognizes that all or none of the particular analyses described inthe fourth paragraph may apply at any one time, and that other tests couldbe developed or used which would meet the intent of the standard. Therefore,these analyses are recommended, but not mandatory. This soil classification system, as with all soil classification systems,is not intended for universal application. OSHA does not intend that thesystem be used to replace analysis and testing for engineering design.OSHA does not require sampling and testing for engineering design in thecurrent standard, and for reasons discussed below is not requiring specificsoil testing procedures in this Final Rule. The decision to conduct a moresophisticated soil sampling and testing program, as under the current standard,would be left to the employer's discretion. When an engineering analysisis desired, OSHA recommends that other presently accepted methods of soilsampling and testing be used. Methods, such as those adopted by the AmericanSociety for Testing and Materials (ASTM), are accepted methods. This soil classification system is intended to address a deficiency inthe existing standard. The existing standard does not rely on a consistentmethod of classifying soils, but relies on terms that cannot be easilyquantified, such as ``hard and compact'' and ``soft and unstable.'' Further,there is an inconsistency in the terminology currently found in subpartP. For example, one set of terms is used in Table P-1 which indicates recommendedslopes in certain primarily granular materials. A different set of termsto describe soils is used as the basis of the divisions of Table P-2, whichspecifies minimum requirements for timber shoring in trenches. This soil classification system is intended to eliminate this deficiency.It is intended to provide construction personnel and OSHA Compliance Officerswith a common language that can be used to assess the requirements andadequacy of sloping and shoring systems used to prevent cave-ins. The soil classification system that was proposed was developed by the NationalBureau of Standards (NBS). The background of the system is explained inmore detail in Exhibit 2-5. OSHA incorporated this classification systemin the proposal based on the recommendations of NBS, after consultationwith the ACCSH, and after a review by interested parties at the five industry-sponsoredworkshops. In addition, OSHA used several American Society for Testingand Materials (ASTM) Standards, as well as other sources, to obtain informationthat, in OSHA's opinion, was needed to supplement and clarify the NBS recommendations.The ASTM Standards included: (1) Designation: D653-67 (Reapproved 1973)_``Standard Definitions of Termsand Symbols Relating to Soil and Rock Mechanics,'' (Ex. 2-27); (2) Designation: D2487-69_``Standard Method for Classification of Soilsfor Engineering Purposes,'' (Ex. 2-28); and, (3) Designation: D2488-69_Standard Recommended Practice for Descriptionof Soils (Visual_Manual Procedure),'' (Ex. 2-29). OSHA used these sources to clarify and provide additional information inparagraph (b) of the appendix, ``Definitions,'' and in paragraph (d), ``RecommendedVisual and Manual Tests.'' One example of the use of supplemental information involved the developmentof the definition of ``cemented soil.'' NBS made reference to cementedsoil in its recommended definition of Type A soil, but provided no discussionas to what constitutes cemented soil other than to suggest that soils referredto as ``hardpan'' or ``till'' are examples of cemented soil.Cemented soils are most commonly composed of granular, or coarse-grainedparticles. Carbonate salts_calcium carbonate being the most common_arethe primary chemical agents that provide the cementation of the particlesof soil. The action of the cementing agents adds to the strength of thesoil by binding the particles together so that the soil can resist a greaterdegree of stress. The quantity of the cementing agent in a soil sample can be estimated bysubjecting a soil sample to a solution of dilute hydrochloric acid andvisually noting the intensity of the reaction. Unfortunately, this testdoes not give a good indication of the strength of the cemented soil. However,a satisfactory estimate of the relative strength of a cemented soil canbe made by conducting a dry strength test. This is a test that is conductedby crushing dry soil samples between the fingers. The dry strength testis used primarily for estimating the strength of fine-grained soils, i.e.,clays which have cohesive qualities. Conducting this test on cemented coarse-grainedsoils, however, can give good estimates of relative strength that  areequivalent to the strength estimates of fine-grained soils. ASTM D2488 (Ex. 2-29) states, in a description of the dry strength test,that: ``The presence of high-strength water soluble cementing materials,such as calcium carbonate, may cause exceptionally high dry strength ** *.'' In the dry strength test, ``high'' strengths are indicated if ``thesample cannot be crushed to powder by finger pressure, even though thesample may be broken.'' ``Very high'' strength is indicated ``if the samplecannot be broken between the thumb and a hard surface.'' In another reference(``Handbook of Soil Mechanics'', Volume I, p. 98, by Arpad Kezdi) undera discussion of the dry strength test, it is stated: ``If the sample resistscrushing by finger pressure altogether, the soil is an inorganic clay ofhigh plasticity, or a coarse-grained soil aggregate cemented by some high-strengthbinder (e.g., calcium carbonate or iron oxide).'' Based on the discussions of cemented soils in this literature, OSHA supplementedthe NBS recommendations by developing a proposed definition of ``cementedsoil'' with the intent of clarifying the NBS recommendations. The definitionof ``cemented soil'' is intended to include those soils that exhibit strengthsat least equivalent to the strengths required for Type A cohesive soil.The result of this was that some soils containing a slight amount of acementing agent would not be considered as cemented soil, as such soilwill not exhibit sufficient strength. The soil classification system proposed had not been widely used in practice.However, in OSHA's opinion, use of this system will be a major improvementover the terminology and practices used in the existing standard. The Agency received a great amount of comment on the proposed soil classificationsystem and has revised this Appendix substantially, as discussed below.Paragraph (a)(1), <T3>Scope, </T3>of appendix A of the Final Rule states ``This Appendixdescribes a method of classifying soil and rock deposits based on siteand environmental conditions, and on the structure and composition of theearth deposits. The Appendix contains definitions, sets forth requirements,and describes acceptable visual and manual tests for use in classifyingsoils.'' The paragraph is nearly identical to the proposal except that ``recommended''has been changed to ``acceptable'' for reasons discussed below. The Agency received comment and testimony from the Associated General Contractors(AGC) of California (Ex. 8-18 and Tr. 4/19/88 p. 114) suggesting that ``recommended''be changed to ``acceptable'' because they felt that ``recommended'' impliedthese tests were mandatory. OSHA is revising the Final Rule accordingly,noting that it was never the Agency intent that any of these tests be mandatory.(See 52 FR 12315.) The Agency is requiring only that one acceptable visualtest and one acceptable manual test be performed in classifying soil inaccordance with appendix A. These tests may include those listed in theAppendix or may include other generally recognized visual or manual tests.Paragraph (a)(2), <T3>Application, </T3>of appendix A of the Final Rule states:<ITAG tagnum="21">This appendix applies when a sloping or benching system is designedin accordance with the requirements set forth in andSection; 1926.652(b)(2)as a method of protection for employees from cave-ins. This appendix alsoapplies when timber shoring for excavations is designed as a method ofprotection from cave-ins in accordance with appendix C to subpart P ofpart 1926 and when aluminum hydraulic shoring is designed in accordancewith appendix D. This Appendix also applies if other protective systemsare designed and selected for use from data prepared in accordance withthe requirements set forth in andSection; 1926.652(c), and the use of thedata is predicated on the use of the soil classification system set forthin this Appendix.</ITAG>The ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87 p. 530-531) recommended changing ``against cave-ins''to ``from cave-ins'' and changing ``trenches'' to ``excavations.'' TheAgency recognizes that for consistency and accuracy, the first change wasappropriate, and has incorporated it into the Final Rule. However, as discussedabove, the Agency declines to blur the distinction between trenches andexcavations. OSHA has also clarified the reference to andSection; 1926.652(b)by citing andSection; 1926.652(b)(2) to be more specific, as recommendedby NIOSH (Ex. 4-30). The  Final Rule reflects these changes. OSHA receivedno other comments on this paragraph. Paragraph (b) of appendix A of the Final Rule defines terms used in thisappendix for soil classification. The Agency has added an introductorystatement to this paragraph to identify and reference source documentsso users of this appendix will know where to look if further clarificationis needed. This revision is in line with suggestions made by the ACCSH(Tr. 8/5/87 p. 531), the Building and Construction Trades Department (BCTD)of the AFL-CIO (Ex. 4-17), and the National Utility Contractors Association(NUCA) (Ex. 4-91). In addition, the commenters demonstrated a clearer understandingof the proposed definitions which included examples of soils given in readilyrecognizable terms. Therefore, OSHA has modified several definitions byproviding such examples. Paragraph (b) defines ``cemented soil'' as ``a soil in which the particlesare held together by a chemical agent, such as calcium carbonate, suchthat a hand-size sample cannot be crushed into powder or individual soilparticles by finger pressures.'' This definition is identical to the proposal. OSHA received no commenton this provision and therefore promulgates this definition, as proposed.Paragraph (b) of appendix A defines ``cohesive soil'' as ``clay (fine grainedsoil), or soil with a high clay content which has cohesive strength. Cohesivesoil does not crumble, can be excavated with vertical sideslopes, and isplastic when moist. Cohesive soil is hard to break when dry and exhibitssignificant cohesion when submerged. Cohesive soils include clayey silt,sandy clay, silty clay, clay and organic clay.'' This definition is identical to the proposal. OSHA received one specificcomment on this definition from the BCTD (Ex. 4-17), which suggested thatthe ASTM definition might be of more value. OSHA notes that the proposeddefinition incorporated the ASTM definition and provided further guidanceas to examples of cohesive soils. Therefore, the Agency has decided tokeep the definition as proposed. Paragraph (b) of appendix A defines ``Dry soil'' as ``soil that does notexhibit visible signs of moisture content.'' This definition is identical to the proposal. OSHA received no commenton this provision, and, therefore, carries the definition to the FinalRule unchanged. Paragraph (b) of appendix A defines ``Fissured'' as ``a soil material thathas a tendency to break along definite planes of fracture with little resistance,or a material    that exhibits open cracks, such as tension cracks, inan exposed surface.'' This definition is identical to the proposal. OSHA received no commenton this definition, and, therefore promulgates it unchanged. Paragraph (b) of appendix A defines ``granular soil'' as ``gravel, sand,or silt, (coarse grained soil) with little or no clay content. Granularsoil has no cohesive strength. Some moist granular soils exhibit apparentcohesion. Granular soil cannot be molded when moist and crumbles easilywhen dry.'' This definition is similar to the proposal except that the phrase ``andtemporarily stand on a vertical slope but normally cannot be excavatedwith vertical sideslopes'' has been deleted as suggested by the ACCSH (Tr.8/5/87 p. 531) and the BCTD (Ex. 4-17). Both commenters believed that thephrase is misleading and confusing. OSHA recognizes that the phrase issubject to misinterpretation, and has deleted the phrase from the FinalRule. Paragraph (b) of appendix A defines ``layered system'' as ``two or moredistinctly different soil or rock types arranged in layers. Micaceous seamsor weakened planes in rock or shale are considered layered.'' This definition is similar to the proposal, except the    Agency has clarifiedthat the definition does, indeed, include shale, and weakened planes inboth shale and rock. This revision is in response to a question raisedby the sole commenter on this provision (Ex. 4-111). The Agency feels thatthis revision is necessary in order to clarify its regulatory intent. Paragraph (b) of appendix A defines ``Moist soil'' as ``a condition inwhich a soil looks and feels damp. Moist cohesive soil can easily be shapedinto a ball and rolled into small diameter threads before crumbling. Moistgranular soil that contains some cohesive material will exhibit signs ofcohesion between particles.'' This provision is identical to the proposal.OSHA received no comment on this definition, and therefore carries it forwardin the Final Rule. Paragraph (b) of appendix A defines ``Plastic'' as ``a property of a soilwhich allows the soil to be deformed or molded without cracking, or appreciablevolume change.'' This definition is almost identical to the proposal, except that the word``crumbling'' has been deleted. This deletion was suggested by the BCTD(Ex. 4-17) because the proposed definition was the ASTM definition withthe word crumbling added. This commenter and others (Ex. 4-91, and theACCSH) all recommended OSHA be consistent with existing    soil classificationsystems. Therefore, OSHA is revising this definition because the word ``crumbling''added nothing to the definition, and to be consistent with ASTM. OSHA receivedno other comment on this definition. Paragraph (b) of appendix A defines ``saturated soil'' as ``a soil in whichthe voids are filled with water.'' Saturation does not require flow. Saturation,or near saturation, is necessary for the proper use of instruments suchas a pocket penetrometer or sheer vane.'' This definition is substantially different from the proposal which defined``saturated soil'' as:<ITAG tagnum="21">Submerged soil that is below the ground water table, and very wetsoil such as soil that forms the sides of an excavation from which watercan be seen seeping; soil that forms the sides of an excavation that hasbeen flooded to more than one-half its depth and has not been drained fora least one day; and soil in which water is retained by a shoring system.</ITAG>This change is based on the comments of the BCTD (Ex. 4-17) and is in linewith current ASTM usage. The Agency notes that, while ASTM D-653-85 (Ex.4-17 attachment) defines neither ``saturated soil'' nor ``submerged soil''it does, in fact, differentiate between these two conditions under thedefinition of ``unit weight.'' OSHA has determined that the proposed definition could lead to confusionin that soil conditions at or near saturation, as defined in the FinalRule, are necessary for    proper use of mechanical instruments sometimesused to measure soil strength. On the other hand, soils that are submerged,namely, actually underwater or seeping, present a different set of soilconditions and must be treated differently from ``saturated soils.'' Forexample, beach sand that is saturated or nearly saturated, can be shapedto form sand castles, or other shapes and will hold those shapes untilthe sand dries out or is submerged by the incoming tide. At that time,the sand will return to its natural angle of repose (as used in currentengineering practice) for the site conditions. Therefore, OSHA has determined that it is appropriate to differentiatebetween these two conditions and has revised the definition of ``saturatedsoil'' as discussed above. Additionally, the Agency is defining ``submergedsoil'' as ``soil which is underwater or free seeping,'' and has added thisnew definition to appendix A of the Final Rule. Paragraph (b) of appendix A defines ``soil classification system'' as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">For the purpose of this Subpart, a method of categorizing soil androck deposits in a hierarchy of Stable Rock, Type A, Type B, and Type C,in decreasing order of stability. The categories are determined based onan analysis of the properties and performance characteristics of the depositsand the environmental conditions of exposure.</ITAG>The definition is virtually identical to the proposal except that the Agencynotes that this definition is for the purpose of this subpart only. Thisrevision was suggested by the BCTD (Ex. 4-17) to clarify that not all soilclassification systems use the soil types used in this appendix. The Agencyrecognizes this distinction and has revised the Final Rule to incorporatethis input. Paragraph (b) of appendix A defines ``stable rock'' as ``natural solidmineral matter that can be excavated with vertical sides and remain intactwhile exposed.'' This definition is very similar to the proposed definition except thatthe ASTM definition for ``rock'' has been substituted in the proposed definitionreplacing the word ``rock.'' This change was made to address the concerns of Granite Construction Company(Ex. 4-28), which pointed out that the proposed definition could be misinterpretedby the competent person to include some other types of soils. OSHA received other comments and hearing testimony arguing that hardpanand caliche soil should be included in the stable rock category. Four commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, 4-106 and 4-109) objected to the exclusionof hardpan and caliche from the stable rock classification. These commentersprovided the same qualified recommendations, for allowing these soils tobe excavated with vertical sides, as they presented under Issue 12, discussedabove. In addition, these commenters were represented by the AssociatedGeneral Contractors (AGC) of California at the informal public hearing(Tr. 4/19/88 pp. 108-165) and provided similar arguments at that forum.Mr. Richard Frankian, a consultant for the AGC of California, testifiedat the hearing (Tr. 4/19/88 p. 118) that hardpan and caliche could be includedin the stable rock group provided they have an unconfined compressive strengthof at least four tons per square foot (4 T/ft\2\ or 8000 lbs/ft\2\). OSHA recognizes that hardpan and caliche can be excavated with verticalsides under some site conditions. However, as pointed out even by the advocatesof this practice, there are many restrictions (see discussion of Issue12) which must apply. Therefore, the Agency declines to include hardpanand caliche in the stable rock classification in all circumstances forthe purpose of this appendix. OSHA wishes to restate and reiterate thateven though appendix A does not allow for it, the employer has the optionof using this practice if approved by a registered professional engineer,or if it is in accordance with tabulated data prepared by a registeredprofessional engineer. Finally, OSHA recognizes that soil with an unconfined compressive strengthover four tons per square foot is, indeed, very stable. However, this measureof strength is only one factor that must be considered when classifyingsoils. (Other factors are discussed under Issue 12.) Hardpan is defined in Exhibit 2-27 as ``a layer of extremely dense <T3>soil</T3>'' (emphasis added), and in ASTM D653-85 (Attachment to Ex.4-17) as ``a hard impervious layer, composed chiefly of clay, cementedby relatively insoluble materials, that does not become plastic when mixedwith water and definitely limits the downward movement of water and roots.''Caliche is defined in the New College Edition of the American HeritageDictionary as ``a hard <T3>soil</T3> layer cemented by calcium carbonate'' (emphasis added). OSHAnotes that all of these definitions recognize hardpan and caliche as asoil (clay is fine grained soil by definition), not as rock. Exhibit 2-27 defines soil as ``sediment or other <T3>unconsolidated</T3> accumulations of <T3>solid particles</T3> produced by physical and chemical disintegrationof rocks, and may or may not contain organic matter'' (emphasis added).Rock is defined in the same exhibit as ``natural solid mineral matter occurringin large masses or fragments.'' These definitions also appear in the updatedversion of ASTM D653-85, attached to Exhibit 4-17.Therefore, by definition, hardpan and caliche are not rock, and for thepurpose of this Appendix are considered Type A soils. The definition of ``Submerged Soil'' is new. ``Submerged soil'' is definedas ``soil which is underwater or is free seeping.'' The rationale for thisnew definition is discussed above. Paragraph (b) of appendix A of the Final Rule also defines the soil classificationsused in this appendix. OSHA has revised these definitions somewhat, based on the record, but hasnot added additional types of soil as requested by the AGC of California(Ex. 24 which was revised by Exs. 28B and 30), and at the public hearings(Tr. 4/19/88 p. 117). OSHA believes that the additional soil types recommended by the AGC ofCalifornia, while they appear to be valid, would complicate this soil classificationand would require a degree of accuracy in soil type determination beyondthe capabilities and limitations of this Appendix. OSHA notes that eventhe use of objective test procedures, such as the pocket penetrameter suggestedby the commenter at the informal public hearing (Tr. 4/19/88 p. 117), orthe torvane shear device, are still only estimates which are subject toerror. One commenter (Ex. 42) points out that Spangler and Hardy, in theirbook ``Soil Engineering,'' Harper and Row, pp. 101-3, 1982, estimate thepocket penetrometer has a andplusmin;20 to andplusmin;40 percent error, andthe authors also discuss some limitations of the torvane shear device.OSHA recognizes the limitations of these methods, as well as those methodsdescribed in appendix A. The Agency believes that any field estimated soiltype must, by necessity, be based on a simple, conservative soil classificationsystem. The A-B-C soil classification scheme given in this Appendix meetsthat need. A more complex system would require far more accurate methodsof determining soil classification to provide sufficient employee protection.OSHA also notes that two commenters (Exs. 36, and 37) and a late submissionby Mr. William Winans of Allied Steel and Tractor Products, Inc. supportedthe use of the A-B-C soil classification, as proposed in appendix A. OSHA emphasizes that the use of this appendix is only required in two ofthe eight options allowed by the Final Rule. In these options (andSection;1926.652 (b)(2) and (c)(1)) the employer cannot substitute other soil classificationsystems. Employers wishing to use other legitimate soil classificationschemes, in conjunction with tabulated data that is in accordance withthe standard, or who wish to use the services of a registered professionalengineer and laboratory testing, can do so under the other permissibleoptions. Paragraph (b) of appendix A defines ``Type A'' as:<ITAG tagnum="21">Cohesive soils with an unconfined compressive strength of 1.5 tonsper square foot (tsf) (144kPa) or greater. Examples of cohesive soils are:clay, silty clay, sandy clay, clay loam and, in some cases silty clay loamand sandy clay loam. Cemented soils such as caliche and hardpan are alsoconsidered Type A. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">However, no soil is Type A if: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) The soil is fissured; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The soil is subject to vibration from heavy traffic, pile driving,or similar effects; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) The soil has been previously disturbed; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) The soil is part of a sloped, layered system where the layersdip into the excavation on a slope of four horizontal to one vertical (4H:1V)or greater; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) The material is subject to other factors that would require itto be classified as a less stable material.</ITAG>This definition is very similar to proposed paragraph (b)(12). However,as discussed above, the Agency has provided additional specific examplesof soils that are considered Type A, to help the user. Additionally, OSHAhas dropped the word ``till'' from the definition, because, as pointedout by one commenter (Ex. 4-17), its use in the proposal was inconsistentwith the ASTM definition. Paragraph (b) of appendix A defines ``Type B'' as:<ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Cohesive soil with an unconfined compressive strength greaterthan 0.5 tsf (48kPa) but less than 1.5 tsf (144kPa); or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Granular cohesionless soils including: angular gravel (similarto crushed rock), silt, silt loam, sandy loam, and in some cases, siltyclay loam and sandy clay loam. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Previously disturbed soils except those which would otherwisebe classed as Type C soil. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Soil that meets the unconfined compressive strength or cementationrequirements for Type A, but is fissured or subject to vibration; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Dry rock that is not stable; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vi) Material that is part of a sloped, layered system where the layersdip into the excavation on a slope less steep than four horizontal to onevertical (4H:1V), but only if the material would otherwise be classifiedas Type B.</ITAG>This definition is very similar to proposed paragraph (b)(13), except thatthe Agency has added specific examples to this definition to assist theuser, as discussed, and has clarified that most disturbed soils are TypeB. OSHA received comments from the AGC of California (Exs. 4-106, 24, 28Band 30) and testimony at the hearing (Tr. 4/19/88 p. 113) recommendingat least one more intermediate soil classification between Type A and TypeC. The Agency declines to act on this suggestion because, as discussedabove, OSHA believes that this appendix does not have the capabilitiesto determine soil type with the degree of accuracy that the addition ofone or more soil types would require. Additionally, the Agency feels thatincorporating a more complex system into this appendix would make the systemless likely to be used properly. Again, OSHA reiterates that employersare allowed to use alternative soil classification systems in accordancewith other options provided by this Final Rule. The ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87 handout) and the BCTD (Ex. 4-17) pointed out thatsome parts of the proposed definitions for both Type B and Type C soilswere inconsistent with proposed table B-1. In particular they noted thatthe definition of Type B included ``granular soil that can stand on a slopeof three horizontal to one vertical,'' while table B-1 allowed a slopeof 3/4:1 short term or 1:1 long term. OSHA now recognizes that this criteria, although used in the NBS document(Ex. 2-5 p. 39), is inconsistent with the rest of this appendix and introducesambiguity into this definition and other places in this Appendix. OSHAhas therefore dropped this evaluation criteria and instead is providingexamples of granular cohesionless soils.Another commenter (Ex. 4-30) noted that the 4:1 ratio of sloped, layeredsystems discussed in proposed paragraph (b)(12)(iv) was somewhat restrictive.The Agency is of the opinion that, while restrictive, this degree of cautionis necessary, because of the limits of this appendix, and declines to revisethis provision. Paragraph (b) of appendix A defines ``Type C'' as:<ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Cohesive soil with an unconfined compressive strength of 0.5 tsf(48 kPa) or less; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Granular soils including: gravel, sand, and loamy sand, or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Submerged soil or soil from which water is freely seeping; or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Submerged rock that is not stable; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Material in a sloped, layered system where the layers dip intothe excavation or a slope of four horizontal to one vertical (4H:1V) orsteeper.</ITAG>This definition is very similar to proposed paragraph (b)(14) except thatthe criteria relating to the slope of three horizontal to one verticalhas been replaced with examples of this type of soil, and ``saturated''has been removed from proposed paragraph (b)(14)(iii). These changes havebeen made to be consistent with similar changes discussed above. In addition to input from the ACCSH and the BCTD, discussed above underType B, OSHA received a comment from R. T. Frankian (Ex. 33), a consultantfor the AGC of California, recommending that the only prudent course forType C soil would be to require shoring with solid sheeting or requirean engineer to evaluate the situation and make recommendations. OSHA believesthis is not necessary and notes that NBS (Ex. 2-5) felt that Type C soil,as defined, could be sloped safely to a maximum of 1\1/2\ horizontal to1 vertical. OSHA also notes that no other commenters made similar recommendationsto those of the AGC of California concerning Type C soils. Paragraph (b) of appendix A defines ``unconfined compressive strength''as ``the load per unit area at which a soil will fail in compression. Itcan be determined by laboratory testing, or estimated in the field usinga pocket penetrometer, by thumb penetration tests, and other methods.''This definition is identical to proposed paragraph (b)(15). OSHA receivedno comment on this definition and carries it forward in the Final Rule.Paragraph (b) of this appendix defines ``wet soil'' as ``soil that containssignificantly more moisture than moist soil, but in such a range of valuesthat cohesive material will slump or begin to flow when vibrated. Granularmaterial that would exhibit cohesive properties when moist will lose thosecohesive properties when wet.'' This definition is identical to proposed paragraph (b)(16). OSHA receivedno comment on this definition and carries it forward in the Final Rule.Paragraph (c)(1) of appendix A provides the requirements for classificationof soil and rock deposits using this appendix. This paragraph states: ``Eachsoil and rock deposit shall be classified by a competent person as StableRock, Type A, Type B, or Type C in accordance with the definitions setforth in paragraph (b) of this appendix.'' This provision is identical to the proposal. OSHA received no comment onthis provision and therefore carries it forward in the Final Rule. Paragraph (c)(2) of appendix A details the basis for soil classificationusing this appendix. This paragraph states: ``The classification of thedeposits shall be made based on the results of at least one visual andat least one manual analysis. Such analyses shall be conducted by a competentperson using tests described in paragraph (d) below, or in other recognizedmethods of soil classification and testing such as those adopted by theAmerican Society for Testing Materials, or the U.S. Department of Agriculturetextural classification system.'' This paragraph is essentially the same as the proposal except that theAgency has clarified that the tests in paragraph (d) are not mandatoryand that other recognized tests and classification are acceptable. OSHA received four comments (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, 4-106, and 4-109) objectingto a requirement for any specific tests, and also objecting to the requirementfor at least one visual and at least one manual analysis. These commentersargued that specific tests would be impractical because of the varietyand subjectivity of such methods and the changing nature of soil conditions.One commenter, the AGC of California (Ex. 4-106), suggested that soil classificationbe based on an evaluation of soil condition and visible factors. OSHA recognizesthat evaluation of soil condition is necessary, and has determined thatthis evaluation must include manual testing as well as visual analysis.Visual analyses alone are not sufficient to classify soil properly. Manualanalyses are needed to confirm the findings of visual analyses and to provideadditional information necessary for more accurate soil classification.OSHA notes that neither the proposal nor the Final Rule requires specifictests/methods. Requiring at least one visual and at least one manual testleaves the employer a great deal of latitude as to which tests are used.In order to clarify this latitude the Agency has revised this provisionto state specifically that other recognized method of analyses are acceptable,and gives examples of some of these other acceptable methods. This revision is in line with the suggestion made at the public hearingby the AGC of California [Tr. 4/19/88 p. 114]. However OSHA has not deletedthe requirement for at least one visual and at least one manual test, forreasons discussed above. The only other commenter (Ex. 4-111) supported OSHA's requirement for botha visual and a manual test. Paragraphs (c)(3) through (c)(5) of appendix A discuss visual and manualanalyses, layered systems, and reclassification of soils using this appendix.These provisons state:<ITAG tagnum="21">(3) <T3>Visual and manual analyses. </T3>The visual and manual analyses, suchas those noted as being acceptable in paragraph (d) of this Appendix, shallbe designed and conducted to provide sufficient quantitative and qualitativeinformation as may be necessary to identify properly the properties, factors,and conditions affecting the classification of the deposits. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) <T3>Layered systems. </T3>In a layered system, the system shall be classifiedin accordance with its weakest layer. However, each layer may be classifiedindividually where a more stable layer lies under a less stable layer.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) <T3>Reclassification. </T3>If after classifying a deposit, the properties,factors, or conditions affecting its classification change in any way,the changes shall be evaluated by a competent person. The deposit shallbe reclassified as necessary to reflect the changed circumstances.</ITAG>These provisions are virtually identical to the proposal except for aneditorial change in paragraph (c)(3). That change, based on input fromthe AGC of California, revises the word ``recommended'' to ``noted as beingacceptable.'' The input from the AGC of California (Tr. 4/19/88 p. 114)was directed to another reference to ``recommended'' test, however, theAgency has also made the change here in order to be consistent. OSHA received no other comments on these provisions and carries them forwardin the Final Rule. Paragraph (d) of appendix A lists some acceptable visual and manual tests.The title of this paragraph has been revised to read ``Acceptable'' ratherthan ``Recommended'' at the request of the AGC of California (Tr. 4/19/88p. 114), who noted that ``recommended'' implied these were the only testsallowed. This was not OSHA's regulatory intent and therefore the Agencyhas made the requested change. Paragraph (d)(1) of appendix A discusses and lists visual tests which areacceptable when using this appendix. This list is not intended to be all-inclusiveand other recognized visual test are also acceptable. Paragraph (d)(1)reads as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">(d) <T3>Acceptable visual and manual tests. </T3>(1) <T3>Visual tests. </T3>Visual analysis is conducted to determine qualitativeinformation regarding the excavation site in general, the soil adjacentto the excavation, the soil forming the sides of the opened excavation,and the soil taken as samples for excavated material. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Observe samples of soil that are excavated and soil on the sidesof the excavation. Estimate the range of particle sizes and the relativeamounts of the particle sizes. Soil that is primarily composed of fine-grainedmaterial is cohesive material. Soil composed primarily of coarse-grainedsand or gravel is granular material. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Observe soil as it is excavated. Soil that remains in clumpswhen excavated is cohesive. Soil that breaks up easily and does not stayin clumps is granular. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Observe the side of the opened excavation and the surface areaadjacent to the excavation. Crack-like openings such as tension crackscould indicate fissured material. If chunks of soil spall off a verticalside, the soil could be fissured. Small spalls are evidence of moving groundand are indications of potentially hazardous situations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Observe the area adjacent to the excavation and the excavationitself for evidence of existing utility and other underground structures,and to identify perviously disturbed soil. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Observe the opened side of the excavation to identify layeredsystems. Examine layered systems to identify if the layers slope towardthe excavation. Estimate the degree of slope of the layers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vi) Observe the area adjacent to the excavation and the sides ofthe opened excavation for evidence of surface water, water seeping fromthe sides of the excavation, or the location of the level of the watertable. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vii) Observe the area adjacent to the excavation and the area withinthe excavation for sources of vibration that may affect the stability ofthe excavation face.</ITAG>These provisions are virtually identical to the proposal except as follows.Paragraph (d)(1)(i) has been revised to read ``composed of fine-grainedmaterial.'' This change drops the word ``clay'' from the proposed language,which reads ``fine-grained clay material.'' This change was made becausetwo commenters, the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87 p. 533) and the BCTD (Ex. 4-17),pointed out that other fine-grained materials such as silt should be included.Based on these comments OSHA is deleting the word ``clay'' and therebyincluding all finegrained materials. Paragraph (d)(1)(iii) of the proposal has been revised to indicate thattension cracks and small soil spalls do not necessarily mean the soil isfissured. This revision is based on input from the BCTD (Ex. 4-17). Additionally,another sentence has been added to alert the users of this Appendix thatsmall spalls are miniature cave-ins and are indications of potentiallyhazardous situations. Paragraph (d)(1)(vii) of the proposal which recommended one type of visualtest, is being deleted. Several commenters (Exs. 4-17, 4-30, 4-91 and 4-111)and the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87 pp. 533-534) all recommended deleting this provisionbecause it was vague, and therefore could be very misleading to the usersof this appendix. OSHA agrees and is therefore deleting this provision,and renumbering proposed paragraph (d)(1)(viii) as paragraph (d)(1)(vii)of the Final Rule. Paragraph (d)(2) of appendix A discusses and lists manual tests which areacceptable when using this appendix. This list is not intended to be all-inclusiveand other recognized manual tests are also acceptable. Paragraph (d)(2)states:<ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Manual test. </T3>Manual analysis of soil samples is conducted to determinequantitative as well as qualitative properties of soil and to provide moreinformation in order to classify soil properly. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) <T3>Plasticity. </T3>Mold a moist or wet sample of soil into a ball andattempt to roll it into threads as thin as \1/8\ inch in diameter. Cohesivematerial can be successfully rolled into threads without crumbling. Forexample, if at least a two inch (50 mm) length of \1/8\ inch thread canbe held on one end without tearing, the soil is cohesive. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Dry strength. </T3>If the soil is dry and crumbles on its own, or withmoderate pressure into individual grains or fine powder, it is granular(any combination of gravel, sand or silt). If the soil is dry and fallsinto clumps which break up into smaller clumps, but the smaller clumpscan only be broken up with difficulty, it may be clay in any combinationwith gravel, sand or silt. If the dry soil breaks into clumps which donot break up into small clumps, and which can only be broken with difficulty,and there is no visual indication the soil is fissured, the soil may beconsidered unfissured. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) <T3>Thumb penetration. </T3>The thumb penetration test can be used to estimatethe unconfined compressive strength of cohesive soils. (This test is basedon the thumb penetration test described in American Society for Testingand Materials (ASTM) Standard designation D2488_``Standard RecommendedPractice for Description of Soils (Visual_Manual Procedure).'') Type Asoils with an unconfined compressive strength of 1.5 tsf can be readilyindented by the thumb, however, they can be penetrated by the thumb onlywith very great effort. Type C soils with an unconfined compressive strengthof 0.5 tsf can be easily penetrated several inches by the thumb, and canbe molded by light finger pressure. This test should be conducted on anundisturbed soil sample, such as a large clump of spoil, as soon as practicableafter excavation to keep to a minimum the effects of exposure to dryinginfluences. If the excavation is later exposed to wetting influences (rain,flooding), the classification of the soil must be changed accordingly.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) <T3>Other strength tests.</T3> Estimates of unconfined compressive strengthof soils can also be obtained by use of a pocket penetrometer or by usinga hand-operated shearvane. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) <T3>Drying test.</T3> The basic purpose of the drying test is to differentiatebetween cohesive material with fissures, unfissured cohesive material,and granular material. The procedure for the drying test involves dryinga sample of soil that is approximately one inch thick (2.54 cm) and sixinches (15.24 cm) in diameter until it is thoroughly dry: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) If the sample develops cracks as it dries, significant fissuresare indicated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Samples that dry without cracking are to be broken by hand. Ifconsiderable force is necessary to break a sample, the soil has significantcohesive material content. The soil can be classified as a unfissured cohesivematerial and the unconfined compressive strength should be determined.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) If a sample breaks easily by hand, it is either a fissured cohesivematerial or a granular material. To distinguish between the two, pulverizethe dried clumps of the sample by hand or by stepping on them. If the clumpsdo not pulverize easily, the material is cohesive with fissures. If theypulverize easily into very small fragments, the material is granular.</ITAG>These provisions are virtually identical to the proposal except for someclarifications suggested by the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87 p. 534) and the BCTD(Ex. 4-17). OSHA received several other comments (Exs. 4-21, 4-23, 4-31, 4-40, 4-42,4-54 and 4-86) suggesting that this section be deleted. All these commentersindicated that this type of analysis can only be done accurately in thelaboratory, and not in the field. These commenters, however, did not indicatewhether they supported a requirement for laboratory testing for all soilanalysis or whether they merely opposed a manual testing requirement foruse in the field. OSHA has determined not to follow these suggestions, since all the acceptabletests listed and other accepted tests not discussed in the standard appearin published literature, and are recognized as methods of providing reasonableestimates of soil properties. OSHA does not believe it is feasible or necessaryto require laboratory analysis of soils for every excavation where AppendixA is used, nor is it realistic to believe that visual analyses alone canprovide sufficient information to classify soils. OSHA recognizes the limitations of each of these testing methods, and hastaken them into account in developing this Final Rule. The Agency stressesthat the results of these tests must be closely tied to a simple, conservativesoil classification system, the A-B-C system which OSHA has provided inthis Appendix. OSHA notes that with regard to manual analyses, that Mr. R.T. Frankian,a consultant for the AGC of California, testified at the public hearing(Tr. 4/19/88 pp. 145-146):<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * I think if you stick with A, B and C, you could probably dothis only with a finger test. I think that would be perfectly okay.</ITAG>In addition, with regard to appendix A, in general, a report by Mr. Frankian,submitted as an attachment to the AGC of California comments (Ex. 4-106)noted:<ITAG tagnum="21">The methods used to identify various soil groups include both visualand test parameters and include assessment based on performance characteristics.In general the methods appear to offer sound and readily understood instructionswhich should lead an experienced person to properly assess the engineeringcharacteristics of earth materials. (p. 2-3)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">And: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The intent of the classification system is to provide a reasonablyaccurate and easily understood method of permitting an experienced person,who may not necessarily be an engineer, to assess the ability of the soilto stand at gradients specified in Table B-1. It is concluded that, ingeneral, the proposed standards would serve that function. (p. 4)</ITAG>OSHA believes that revised appendix A provides more guidance to the userand, therefore, will provide effective employee protection.Appendix B_Sloping and Benching Appendix B sets forth the requirements for sloping and benching when thosemethods are used for protecting employees against cave-ins. Employers are not required in every instance to use this Appendix. Therefore,in this respect, it is not mandatory. This appendix is provided as oneoption that employers can use to meet the requirement to provide cave-inprotection for employees. The option to use this appendix is stated inandSection; 1926.652(b)(2). It is the second option employers may chooseto follow to determine the requirements for sloping and benching protectivesystems. When this option is chosen by the employer, the provisions ofthis Appendix become mandatory. The slopes required by this appendix vary, and are dependent upon the typeof soil in which the excavation is made. To use this appendix, soils mustfirst be classified in accordance with the provisions of appendix A tothis Subpart_``Soil Classification.'' Paragraph (a) of the appendix is a scope and application statement. Paragraph (b) sets forth applicable definitions.  In this appendix, slopes are expressed as maximum allowable slopes. Themaximum allowable slope is the steepest incline from the horizontal thatwill be acceptable under the most favorable site conditions for a particulartype of soil. These slopes vary with the soil type in which the excavationis made. In addition, the depth of the excavation and the length of timethat the excavation is open are specifically taken into account in onlyone instance. In Type A soils, the maximum allowable slope for the short-term(less than 24 hours) can may be used in excavations less than 12 feet (3.6m) in depth. The allowable slopes given for all other exposures in this appendix (intable B-1), coupled with the allowable configurations shown in figure B-1,should provide a greater level of protection to employees than is now providedby the existing standard. Paragraph (c) of this appendix states the requirements for sloping andbenching. Primarily, it is required that soil types be determined in accordancewith appendix A; that the maximum allowable slopes be in accordance withtable B-1 of this appendix B; and that the configurations of the slopingand benching systems be in accordance with the illustrations in figureB-1. Other requirements state when slopes less than the maximum allowableslope must be used. This appendix is intended to replace table P-1 found in the existing standard.The difficulties associated with the use of table P-1, such as a lack ofdefinitions of terms, are a major reason for replacing the table. Anotherreason for replacing the table is to provide a new set of provisions thatare correlated with the soil classification system described in appendixA. The reasons for providing a new soil classification system have beenaddressed earlier in this preamble. This new system is broader than the current standard in that more parametersmust be considered when determining allowable slopes, and in that variousallowable configurations of sloping and benching are illustrated. The systemis based primarily on the recommendations made to OSHA by NBS (Ex. 2-6).OSHA believes that this appendix will provide employers with a realisticand flexible approach to sloping and benching. In OSHA's opinion, the maximumallowable slopes will provide a safe work area for employees in excavationswhen the soils are properly classified and the slopes properly made. OSHA received a great volume of comment on this appendix. However the vastmajority of the comment was directed to proposed table B-1 and figuresBl.1 through Bl.5. Very little comment was received on paragraphs (a),(b) and (c) of this appendix.Paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of appendix B read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="73">Sloping and Benching </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) <T3>Scope and application.</T3> This appendix contains specifications forsloping and benching when used as methods of protecting employees workingin excavations from cave-ins. The requirements of this appendix apply whenthe design of sloping and benching protective systems is to be performedin accordance with the requirements set forth in andSection; 1926.652(b)(2).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) <T3>Definitions.</T3> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Actual slope'' means the slope to which an excavation face is excavated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Distress'' means that the soil is in a condition where a cave-inis imminent or is likely to occur. Distress is evidenced by such phenomenaas the development of fissures in the face of or adjacent to an open excavation;the subsidence of the edge of an excavation; the slumping of material fromthe face or the bulging or heaving of material from the bottom of an excavation;the spalling of material from the face of an excavation; and ravelling,i.e., small amounts of material such as pebbles or little clumps of materialsuddenly separating from the face of an excavation and trickling or rollingdown into the excavation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Maximum allowable slope'' means the steepest incline of an excavationface that is acceptable for the most favorable site conditions as protectionagainst cave-ins, and is expressed as the ratio of horizontal distanceto vertical rise (H:V).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Short term exposure'' means a period of time less than or equalto 24 hours that an excavation is open. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) <T3>Requirements.</T3> (1) <T3>Soil classification.</T3> Soil and rock deposits shall be classifiedin accordance with appendix A to subpart P of part 1926. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Maximum allowable slope.</T3> The maximum allowable slope for a soilor rock deposit shall be determined from Table B-1 of this appendix. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) <T3>Actual slope.</T3> (i) The actual slope shall not be steeper than themaximum allowable slope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The actual slope shall be less steep than the maximum allowableslope when there are signs of distress. If that situation occurs, the slopeshall be cut back to an actual slope which is at least \1/2\ horizontalto one vertical (\1/2\H:1 V) less steep than the maximum allowable slope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) When surcharge loads from stored material or equipment, operatingequipment, or traffic are present, a competent person shall determine thedegree to which the actual slope must be reduced below the maximum allowableslope, and shall assure that such reduction is achieved. Surcharge loadsfrom adjacent structures shall be evaluated in accordance with andSection;1926.651(i). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) <T3>Configurations.</T3> Configurations of sloping and benching systemsshall be in accordance with Figure B-1.</ITAG>These provisions are very similar to the proposal except that proposedparagraph (b)(3) ``long term exposure'' has been deleted, as discussedin Issue 4, above; proposed paragraph (b)(4) and (b)(5) have been renumbered(b)(3) and (b)(4), respectively, to accommodate the above discussed deletion;and, ``short term exposure'' has been redefined to mean 24 hours or less,as discussed under Issue 4. In addition, OSHA received input from the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87 Attached handout),the BCTD (Ex. 4-17), and NIOSH (Ex. 4-30) recommending replacing competentperson in paragraph (c)(3)(iii) of appendix B with registered professionalengineer, particularly in regard to surcharge loads from adjacent structure.OSHA recognizes the potential hazards (collapse of structures or cave-ins)pointed out by the commenters and has revised this provision to directthe user to andSection; 1926.651(i) in situations involving surcharge loadsfrom adjacent structures.Table B-1 of appendix B has been revised to eliminate, in most cases, differentslopes for short term and long term excavations. (See Issue 4 for morediscussion.) Table B-1 now requires: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s25,r25</C>  <H1>Soil or rock type </H1><H1>Maximum allowable slopes (H:V) \1\ for excavations less than 20 feetdeep \3\</H1>  <ITAG tagnum="1">Stable rock <D>Vertical (90anddegrees;). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Type A \2\ <D>\3/4\:1 (53anddegrees;). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Type B <D>1.1 (45anddegrees;). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Type C <D>1\1/2\:1 (34anddegrees;).  </D><F/><T2>Notes: </T2><F>\1\ Numbers shown in parentheses next to maximum allowable slopes areangles expressed in degrees from the horizontal. Angles have been roundedoff. </F><F>\2\ A short-term maximum allowable slope of \1/2\ H:1 V (63anddegrees;)is allowed in excavations in Type A soil that are 12 feet (3.67 m) or lessin depth. Short-term maximum allowable slopes for excavations greater than12 feet (3.67 m) in depth shall be \3/4\ H:1 V (53anddegrees;). </F><F>\3\ Sloping or benching for excavations greater than 20 feet deep shallbe designed by a registered professional engineer.</F></ITAG></ITAG>  This table is similar to proposed table B-1 except that in most cases ``shortterm'' slopes have been deleted. However, the maximum allowable slope forType C soil has been changed to 1\1/2\ H to 1V  which is in line with theslope suggested by NBS (Ex. 2-5 p. 39). An additional note has also beenadded limiting the use of this table to 20andmin172; as suggested by theAGC of California. This is discussed further below. Several commenters (Ex. 4-28, 4-82, 4-102, 4-106, and 4-109) objected todifferent requirements for short term and long term excavations. One commenter,the AGC of California (Ex. 4-106), recommended that the reference to shortterm exposures be deleted and that the table be limited to a maximum depthof twenty feet, with deeper excavations planned by an engineer. OSHA agrees with the suggestion to limit this table to excavations witha maximum depth of twenty feet. This was OSHA's original intent, as evidencedby the limitations on the shoring tables presented in appendix C, but wasinadvertently left out of the proposal. The issue of short term versuslong term excavations is discussed under Issue 4 above. The AGC of California also introduced information concerning additionalsoil types which they felt should be added to appendix A. This suggestionis discussed earlier in the summary and explanation of appendix A. Three of these commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102 and 4-109) objected to thepermitted slopes and table B-1 as being too conservative, arguing thatless conservative slopes were permitted in California. However, in thisregard OSHA notes that Title 8 of the Construction Safety Orders of Californiarequires at least a \3/4\ horizontal to 1 vertical slope in hard compactsoil, the same as OSHA proposed for long term excavations in Type A soilswhich is comparable to hard compact soil. Short term excavations in TypeA soils were proposed to allow a \1/2\ horizontal to 1 vertical slope.The Title 8 Standards do not address short term exposures, rather theyrequire a flatter slope if the soil is not stable, but provide no guidanceas to what that slope should be. OSHA received comment from Granite Construction (Ex. 428), and the AGCof California (Exs. 4-106 and 28) recommending that OSHA revise appendixB, based on a report by R.T. Frankian (Ex. 30). This recommended system,based primarily on a determination of unconfined compressive strength,would add a new soil Type, ``AB'', but would not address soils definedin the proposal as Type C (less than .5 TSF unconfined compressive strength).Mr. Frankian, in a separate comment (Ex. 33), recommended that Type C soilshould be required to have shoring with solid sheeting or be evaluatedby an engineer. The slopes and configurations suggested in this reportare less conservative than those proposed by OSHA, and, indeed, are lessconservative than those permitted under the California regulations (Title8, Construction Safety Order) or under the Construction Safety Standardsof the State of Michigan (Ex. 4-46). Appendix B of the final rule is morein line with these two proven systems. The Agency sees merit in Mr. Frankian's suggested system, but not as areplacement for appendix B. The system is limited to use with cohesivesoils, assumes a uniform soil strength for the full depth of the excavation,and would require a greater degree of accuracy in soil type determinationthan OSHA's appendices A and B. The Agency believes that the suggestedsystem would be more appropriate for use under the new third option forsloping (andSection; 1926.652(b)(3)) or design by a registered professionalengineer (andSection; 1926.652(b)(4)), provided it meets the requirementsof these provisions. The slopes in final table B-1 based on the A-B-C systemare more conservative in most cases than the suggested system. However,OSHA believes this is necessary in order to account for the limitationsof soil testing methods and potential errors in soil classification whichmay result. The slopes in table B-1 are not based on any one safety factor, as wassuggested by Mr. Frankian at the public hearing (Tr. 4/19/88, p. 123).Instead, the slopes in table B-1 have varying safety factors, with higherfactors for steeper slopes and lower factors for flatter slopes, becauseflatter slopes do not pose as much danger of a cave-in as steeper slopes.For example, a cave-in of a bank sloped at 34anddegrees; (1\1/2\H:1 V) fromthe horizontal contains much less soil and will be less likely to entrapworkers than a cave-in of a bank sloped at 54anddegrees; (\3/4\H:1 V). TheAgency does not intend to spell out factors of safety either in this appendixor in the options requiring design by a registered professional engineer.The Agency believes that site conditions vary to such a degree that specifyinga safety factor is inappropriate either for use of the appendices or forany of the other options requiring approval by a registered professionalengineer. In particular, the Agency believes specifying safety factorswould restrict the registered professional engineer from using his or herbest judgement to design tabulated data or a sloping or benching systemto provide adequate employee protection for given site conditions.OSHA also notes that no slope is an absolute value. For example, use ofappendices A and B, while taking into account many factors affecting soilstability and providing ``maximum allowable slopes,'' also requires additionalsloping when the soil shows signs of distress (appendix B paragraph (c)(3)(ii)).The same principle could also apply to slopes designed under the otheroptions with a safety factor. If OSHA did specify a safety factor, designersmight not accurately assess soil stability, the factors affecting thatstability, and might assume that the safety factor would take care of thedifference. On the other hand, OSHA believes it would be inappropriateto require a safety factor of two, for example, if a registered professionalengineer determines that a safety factor of 1.2 is sufficient for the particularsite conditions. In either case OSHA feels that safety factor designedinto the system should be determined by the registered professional engineer.By not requiring a specific safety factor, the Agency believes the designerwill accurately assess the site conditions and will provide a safety factorappropriate for those site conditions. OSHA received a large volume of comment on the configuration in FiguresB 1.2 and B 1.4, which were intended to clarify the Agency interpretationof existing andSection; 1926.652(c). The current standard, andSection; 1926,652(c), has been interpreted by someindividuals as permitting a trench dug in hard or compact soil to be verticalfor the first five feet [1.52 m] level. However, OSHA has always interpretedand enforced this provision to require shoring or a trench shield in theunsloped vertical sided portion of the trench. The proposed rule, in appendixB, Figure B 1.4 was intended to clarify OSHA's intent. The Agency madespecial efforts to draw public attention and comment to this interpretationin the preamble of the proposed rule (52 FR 12291) and again in the noticeof public hearing (53 FR 5281). Many commenters (Ex. 4-5, 4-13, 4-25, 4-28, 4-57, 4-82, 4-102, 4-106, and4-10) objected to Figures B-1.2 and B-1.4. All of these commenters notedthat California permitted excavations to have an unshored vertical sectionof 3.5 feet, with the slope starting at the top of the vertical portionwith no bench. OSHA recognizes that in some instances this configurationwould be desirable in order to limit loading on pipes or other structuresbeing installed. However, OSHA also notes that the California regulationslimit the depth to which this configuration can be used, specify the slopedepending on the prescribed depth limitations, and limit the use of thepractice to hard, compact soil which is equivalent to Type A soil as definedin the proposal. The responses to the hearing notice indicated that some commenters foundthe configuration proposed in Figure B-1 to be too complex to use (Ex.8-6), or suggested allowing a 3.5 foot vertical portion as in California(Ex. 8-7). The AGC of California on the other hand supported deleting therequirement for shoring or shielding the vertical sided portion of theexcavation. However, other commenters ((Ex. 8-14 (Milwaukee ConstructionIndustry Safety Council) and 8-16, (AGC of America)) endorsed a requirementfor the bottom portion of the trench in Figure B-1.4 to be supported unlessthe slope is figured from the toe of the entire excavation, and benched(Fiqure B-1.2), noting that not following this procedure increases therisk of collapses. On the other hand, the State of Texas, and Southern California Gas (Exs.8-25 and 8-27) also supported maintaining the requirement to support thevertical sided portion of the excavation, as proposed. The suggested AGC of California revisions which were developed by R.T.Frankian (Ex. 30), would allow for unsupported vertical sided portionsof excavations, ranging in depth from 5 feet in Type A soil, to 4 feetin Type AB soil and to 3 feet in Type B soil, based on the suggested revisedsoil classification system, and varying excavation depths. OSHA has determined based on the whole record, that some modification toappendix B is appropriate. However, the revision does not go as far assuggested by the AGC of California. The Agency is revising appendix B of the final rule to allow for certainexcavations to have vertical sided bottom portions, with sloping startingat the top of the vertical sided portion. This Appendix will permit thisconfiguration only in the same context as the Title 8, Construction SafetyOrders of the State of California. OSHA has chosen this course because,unlike the suggested Frankian revision, the California standard has actuallybeen in use successfully for several years. The Agency is not denigratingthe suggested revision, and believes that its use may well be appropriateunder andSection; 1926.652(b)(3) of the Final Rule. The Agency feels thatthe slopes permitted under the suggested revision would require a moreprecise soil determination, and that any errors based on the suggestedsystem could be more hazardous because that system would permit steeperslopes in most instances. The slope depicted in proposed Figure B-1.2 is being retained in the FinalRule, because, as noted by several commenter (Ex. 8-25 and 8-27) it isa viable alternative method of sloping when a vertical sided portion ofa trench is needed. However the format of all of Figure B-1 is being revisedto provide more specific examples of acceptable configurations based onsoil type, as suggested by the ACCSH and other commenters. Finally, OSHA has determined that the required two foot set back for spoilswill not be revised (See andSection; 1926.651(j)(2).) The ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87p. 535) and the BCTD (Ex. 4-17) both recommended a minimum 3 foot setback,while NUCA (Ex. 4-91) supported the proposed 2 foot setback. OSHA has nodata to support revising the setback as suggested by ACCSH and BCTD. Therefore, based on the above discussion, OSHA promulgates appendix B,as revised. Appendix C_Timber Shoring for Trenches Appendix C contains information that can be used to provide timber shoringin trenches. Timber shoring is one of several methods that can be usedto provide protection for employees against cave-in hazards. Employers are not required in every instance to use the appendix. Therefore,in this respect, it is not mandatory. The appendix is provided as one optionthat employers can use the provide cave-in protection. The option to usethis appendix is stated in andSection; 1926.652(c)(1). When this option ischosen by the employer, the Appendix becomes mandatory. The appendix is structured as follows: Paragraph (a) discusses the scope of the appendix and its interrelationshipwith the requirements for protective systems in andSection; 1926.652(b) orandSection; 1926.652(c). Paragraph (b) notes that the provisions of appendix A to subpart P mustbe followed for the purposes of soil classification. The configurationsof timber shoring that can be selected using this Appendix are directlytied to the soil classifications described in appendix A. Paragraph (c) describes the information is contained within appendix C.Paragraph (d) describes the basis and limitations of the data containedin appendix C.Paragraph (e) is a description of how to use the tables. Paragraph (f)contains examples to illustrate use of tables, and paragraph (g) containsnotes that apply when using the tables. Paragraph (g) is followed by six tables of data. There are two tables foreach of the three soil types. Stable rock is exempt from shoring requirements.One table for each soil type provides shoring requirements in actual lumbersize, while the other does so in nominal lumber size. This appendix is intended to replace Table P-2, ``Trench Shoring_MinimumRequirements,'' which is found in existing subpart P. This new approachis intended to address the problems detailed earlier in this Preamble concerningsoil classification. It provides a shoring system that is correlated withthe new soil classification system detailed in appendix A. This appendix,however, also provides a greater degree of flexibility than the currentstandard in that the tables can be used to select a greater number of configurationsthan is currently possible with Table P-2. The tables in this appendix have been developed based primarily on recommendationsand data provided to OSHA from NBS (Ex. 2-6), and public comment receivedduring the rulemaking. Data in the tables not specifically recommendedby NBS or by substantive comment are based on traditional practice. NBScould find no evidence that traditional timber practice, if properly executed,is unsafe (Ex. 2-6, p. 65). OSHA received 15 comments and input from the ACCSH on appendix C. Mostof these comments were directed at the proposed tables. The text of appendix C is very similar to the proposal, except for minorexplanatory and editorial changes suggested by the ACCSH (Tr. 8/5/87 pp.539 and 540) and the BCTD (Ex. 4-17), and a revision of the text to incorporatethe addition of shoring tables based on nominal size lumber as suggestedby the AGC of California (Ex. 4-106). The ACCSH and the BCTD questioned OSHA's use of a surcharge load of 20,000pounds resulting from equipment used near excavations in paragraph (d)(2)(ii)(c)of appendix C. The Agency points out that the 20,000 pound weight limitis equivalent to a two foot spoil pile surcharge, and notes that shoringin accordance with the tables will withstand such a surcharge. Several commenters (Exs. 4-21, 4-23, 4-31, 4-40, 4-42, 4-54 and 4-86) recommendedthat the Agency change the reference in the tables from ``Width of trench''to ``Length of Cross Brace,'' citing that this is the actual structuraldimension that is of concern. OSHA recognizes that the length of cross braces is the actual structuraldimension, but notes that the current Table P-2 and the NBS recommendationare both designed using ``width of trench.'' This, in fact, shortens thelength of the cross brace because of the placement of other members ofthe shoring system, and therefore increases the amount of pressure necessaryto cause significant deflection of the cross brace. This increases thestrength of the shoring system. Therefore, OSHA declines to make the suggestedchange. Several other commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, 4-106 and 4-109) argued thatthe use of full size lumber was impractical and excessively expensive.OSHA notes that these commenters are all from the West Coast and recognizesthat standard practice in that area is to use nominal size lumber for shoring,while on the East Coast, full size lumber is normally used for shoring.OSHA also notes that other tables, such as those issued by the Corps ofEngineers, Bureau of Reclamation, and the State of Wisconsin all use nominalsize lumber. Therefore, OSHA has decided to incorporate the nominal tablesrecommended by the AGC of California (Ex. 32) in order to recognize thatnominal size lumber is indeed an acceptable alternative to full size lumberunder the Final Rule. These commenters (Exs. 4-82, 4-102, 4-106, and 4-109) also argued that,based on their experience with the California Table, OSHA's proposed tableswould result in overdesign of the system in some cases, and underdesignin others. However, OSHA notes that the California tables refer to theuse of nominal size, Douglas fir lumber, which has a very high bendingstrength, about 1500 psi. OSHA, on the other hand, proposed tables basedon the NBS data for the use of full size white oak or mixed oak, whichhas a bending strength in the 850 to 875 psi range. This difference accountsfor the preceived ``overdesign'' or ``underdesign'' as addressed by thecommenters. At the public hearing (Tr. 4/19/88 p. 130-133), the AGC of California,suggested various revisions to the proposed timber shoring tables directedprimarily at increasing the timber dimension of the uprights. OSHA hasdecided not to make these changes in the Final Rule. The Agency notes thatthe sizes of the uprights in the proposed tables in appendix C were basedon the recommendations presented by NBS, and were reviewed by a seriesof workshops prior to the rulemaking. The criteria in the tables are comparableto existing Table P 2 in the OSHA standard and section 601 of the WisconsinAdministrative Code covering trenching and excavation, both of which havebeen used succcessfully for many years. Several other commenters (Ex. 4-28, 4-106 and 4-114) suggested that OSHAexpand the standard to address more specifically, hydraulic shoring andother forms of shoring which are in common use throughout the country.OSHA has decided to provide critera for use of hydraulic shoring systemsin a new appendix D, discussed below. The Agency has also added statementsto Appendix C noting that other forms of shoring (for example, hydraulicshoring, trench jacks, and pneumatic shores) are acceptable and may besubstituted for wood if they possess equivalent strength. Appendices D, E and F are new. Appendix D, ``Aluminum Hydraulic Shoringfor Trenches,'' contains criteria that can be used when aluminum hydraulicshoring is used as a method of protection in trenches that do not exceed20 feet (6.1 m) in depth, in the absence of manufacturers' tabulated data.This appendix D is provided for those situations where manufacturers data,as permitted under andSection; 1926.652(c)(2), has been lost or is otherwisenot available. It must be used in conjunction with appendix A, Soil Classification.Additionally, when this appendix is selected, the user must also complywith the basis and limitations of this data as provided in paragraph (d)of appendix D. These data were provided by the Trench Shoring and Shielding Associationof America (Ex. 36) and are being incorporated by OSHA in response to severalcomments recommending that the Agency provide this type of data. OSHA notesthat the State of California also provides very similar data. OSHA received no similar information from this Association concerning trenchjacks, pneumatic shores or shields. However, the Agency notes that airshore and trench jacks can be substituted for timber shoring members ifthey are of equivalent strength or as specified by the manufacturer. Thiswould make generic tables for trench jacks or air shores unnecessary. Shields, on the other hands, are usually designed for specific conditionsand, as noted at the public hearing (Tr. 4/19/88 p. 77-79), the manufacturersprovide data as to shield capacity, how to use the shield safely, and thesoil conditions where the shield can be used. For this reason, the Agencybelieves that it would be impractical to provide ``generic'' tables forshield use. Appendix E gives examples of acceptable alternatives to timber shoring,displayed graphically, to provide guidance to employers and to recognizeexplicitly that alternatives to timber shoring are acceptable means ofcomplying with the requirements of this regulation.This appendix provides illustrations of pneumatic shores, aluminum hydraulicshoring, trench jacks and trench shields. This appendix does not limitthe use of other alternatives which may be developed, because any new alternativebased on new technology can be used in accordance with andSection; 1926.652(c)(2)of this Final Rule. Appendix F of this Final Rule provide a ``decision chart'' for selectionof protective systems. This chart is intended to assist the employer inchoosing appropriate employee protection by showing all available optionsand giving accompanying references to appropriate sections of the standard.Although the current standards for excavations and trenches require employersto implement protective measures such as sloping or shoring, most of the90 cave-in fatalities occurring each year have happened because the employerdid not provide any protection. In these instances, compliance with thecurrent rules would have prevented the accidents. Similarly, the revisedfinal rule published here today will provide protection only if employerscomply with its requirements. OSHA anticipates that the increased clarityand flexibility of the revised standards will provide incentives for employersto provide the necessary protection rather than ignore them completely.However, assuming that many accidents have been caused by employers whohave consciously violated OSHA trenching and excavation rules, these andother employers may continue to put their workers at risk despite thisrevised final rule. If this assumption is correct, OSHA needs to examineways of improving the rate of compliance with these regulations. One way of improving compliance may include additional reporting requirementsfor excavation cave-ins. For example, OSHA could require that employersreport all excavation cave-ins to OSHA within a limited time period. Thisreported information would enable OSHA to evaluate the so-called ``near-misses''to determine whether the employer made an effort to comply with the standard.Such information should allow OSHA to identify those employers who routinelyfailed to shore or shield their trenches and excavations when it is needed.However, a reporting requirement is only one way to increase the rate ofcompliance with these regulations. OSHA solicits comment on whether thereare other means of increasing compliance. In addition, OSHA seeks commenton whether a cave-in reporting requirement should be proposed, and whatelements should be contained in such a requirement. Comments should besent to the Docket Officer, Docket S-204, U.S. Department of Labor, OccupationalSafety and Health Administration, Room N-2634, Frances Perkins Building,Washington, DC 20210. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Final Regulatory Impact Assessment </ITAG>Introduction The Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) has prepared thisFinal Regulatory Impact Assessment (RIA) in compliance with Executive Order12291 and the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980 (Pub. L. 96-353, 94 Stat.1164 [5 U.S.C. 60 et seq.]). In this assessment, OSHA has determined thatthe revised excavation standard (29 CFR part 1926, subpart P) is technologicallyand economically feasible and that the environmental impacts of the amendmentsare not significant. The amendments are estimated to reduce the annual rate of worker fatalitiesby one and of lost workday injuries by 1,107, relative to the current standard.Further, they are estimated to reduce compliance costs by at least $38.0million per year, relative to the current standard. These cost savingswill arise principally by allowing firms the flexibility to select lesscostly methods of providing a safe workplace and therefore are consistentwith the Administration's program to reduce unnecessary burdens on industry.As the net effect of the Subpart P amendment is less than $100 million,this regulatory action does not constitute a ``major rule.'' Regulatory History The Construction Safety Act of 1969 (Pub. L. 91-54) amended the ContractWork Hours Standards Act (40 U.S.C. 333) by adding section 107. This sectionprovided for occupational safety and health standards for constructionemployees working on federal, federally-financed, or federally-assistedprojects. In 1971, pursuant to section 107, the Secretary of Labor issuedsafety and health regulations for construction in 29 CFR part 1518. TheOccupational Safety and Health (OSH) Act (29 U.S.C. 650 et seq.), whichwas passed by Congress on December 29, 1970, and became effective 4 monthslater, ordered the Secretary of Labor to adopt established federal standardsthat were issued under other statutes. In accordance with section 6(a)of the OSH Act, in May 1971, the Secretary adopted the construction standardsthat had been issued under the Construction Safety Act in 29 CFR part 1518.Later in 1971, these standards were redesignated as part 1926. As partof this process, the regulations covering excavation (subpart P, andSection;andSection;1926.650-1926.653) were adopted as OSHA standards. Need for Revision The need to revise subpart P has been recognized since it was first incorporatedas an OSHA standard. Consequently, after review by the Advisory Committeeon Construction Safety and Health (ACCSH) and issuance of a Notice of ProposedRulemaking (NPRM, 36 FR 19083, September 28, 1971), several amendmentswere made to the standard in 1972 (37 FR 3512, February 17, 1972). Afteranother NPRM in 1972 (37 FR 15317, July 29, 1972), the standard was furtheramended (37 FR 24345, November 16, 1972). Complaints and controversy, however, continued to surround the standard.As a result, in 1976, OSHA commissioned the National Bureau of Standards(NBS) to study the standard's compatibility with actual construction practicesand to recommend modifications that could improve the standard's effectiveness.The results of the NBS study were published in several reports during 1979and 1980. These studies, other OSHA and state data, and private sources of informationrevealed the need to modify the standard. Surveys of firms involved inexcavation indicated widespread confusion regarding requirements of thestandard. Many contractors were critical of the standard, claiming thatit was confusing, sometimes inadequate, and often irrelevant. The tableson sloping and shoring procedures were described as confusing and inadequate.Contractors were also unsure about the acceptability of new safety techniques,such as freezing the ground rather than shoring. Morever, they generallybelieved that the standard was too rigid and was insufficiently performanceoriented. In response, OSHA has revised the current standard to clarifyand revise the regulatory language, and expects that these changes willfacilitate compliance. Industry Profile <ITAG tagnum="81">Background </ITAG>Excavation*<NOTE/> projects vary in complexity. For example, a trench may beonly a few feet deep and may be dug in less than one hour by one personusing a backhoe. A small excavation may simply be a hole scooped out bya bulldozer. Alternatively, the construction of a stable 30-foot-deep trenchrequires a knowledge of engineering, geology, and soil mechanics.  <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>* The term ``excavation'' includes trenches.The major occupational hazards of excavation work result from cave-ins,from exposure to underground utilities, and from material or equipmentfalling into the excavation. Precautions to protect against cave-ins includebracing, sloping, benching, using shields, or freezing. However, the properuse of these techniques requires an understanding of the importance ofsuch factors as excavation depth and width, soil type, hydraulic pressure,and other specific conditions present at the worksite. In addition, somenew technologies may result in fewer accidents by reducing the amount oftime that workers are physically exposed to the hazards of trenching. Suchequipment includes trenching machines that dig and lay cable, remote-controlledequipment that compacts the soil in the trench, and systems of ``no dig''trenching, where equipment burrows to lay pipe without an open cut. Trenching is performed primarily by utility contractors who construct gas,sewer, water, and utility lines. Much of this work is performed as a resultof competitive bids from state and local governments or local utilities.Surveys indicate that 70 percent of utility contractors receive about 90percent of their business through competitive bidding. Minimizing costs,including safety-related costs, is therefore very important to these contractors.Larger excavation work is performed for many kinds of construction, includingbuildings, bridges, towers, swimming pools, and port facilities. A number of important economic and technical characteristics separate trenchingfrom other excavation work and make trenching the more hazardous activity.For example, other excavations tend to be adjacent to buildings that wouldcollapse if the excavation were not shored. The probability that damagesuits would result from the collapse of these buildings provides a strongeconomic incentive to shore these excavations. Even where other structuresare not adjacent, large excavations are typically so deep that the riskof incurring the expense of reexcavating following the collapse of an unbracedwall, gives sufficient incentive to contractors to brace the walls. Incontrast, such incentives are greatly diminished for trenching work. Trenchesare less likely to be in close proximity to other structures, structuresadjacent to trenches are less likely to collapse, and the cost of redigginga collapsed trench is far lower than of reexcavating the foundation ofa large building. <ITAG tagnum="81">Industries and Economic Activity </ITAG>Trenching and other excavation occur chiefly in the following 13 four-digitStandard Industrial Classifications (SIC):<ITAG tagnum="15">SIC 1521 General Contractors_Single Family Houses. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">SIC 1522 General Contractors_Residential Buildings Other than SingleFamily Houses </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">SIC 1541 General Contractors_Industrial Buildings and Warehouses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">SIC 1542 General Contractors_Non-Residential Buildings Other thanIndustrial Buildings and Warehouses. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">SIC 1611 Highway and Street Construction Contractors. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">SIC 1622 Bridge, Tunnel, and Elevated Highway Construction. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">SIC 1623 Water, Sewer, Pipeline, Communication and Power Line ConstructionContractors. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">SIC 1629 Heavy Construction Contractors, Not Elsewhere Classified(NEC). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">SIC 1711 Plumbing, Heating (Except Electrical) and Air Conditioning.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">SIC 1771 Concrete Work. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">SIC 1781 Water Well Drilling. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">SIC 1794 Excavation and Foundation Work. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">SIC 1799 Specialty Trade Contractors, NEC.</ITAG>No published data exist that allow the estimation of either the total valueof excavation work or the number of establishments and workers involvedand no additional data has been submitted to the record on this point.Bureau of the Census data [1], however, do exist on the amount of contractednon-trenching excavation work by four-digit SIC code. The data demonstratethat most of such work occurs in SIC 1794 and that most contract work inSIC 1794 is non-trenching excavation work. Excavation work performed underanother contract (e.g., as part of a high-rise apartment) would be includedin another category. Thus. although most contracted non-trenching excavationwork is performed in SIC 1794, it cannot be assumed that most non-trenchingexcavation work occurs in SIC 1794. Moreover, the Bureau of the Censuspublishes no data that specifically identify trenching as a category ofbusiness. For these reasons, OSHA has estimated trenching and other excavationactivity in the following manner. The Associated General Contractors of America (AGC) [2] conducted a surveyof contractors whose work closely corresponded to that in SIC 1623. Theresults of this survey were used to estimate the percentage of revenuesfrom excavation in SIC 1623. The 96 responding firms indicated that 38percent of their revenues were from trenching. Another survey also conductedby AGC [3] on the practices of contractors engaged in excavation foundthat of the 22 firms responding, an average of 36.5 percent of their revenueswere derived from excavation. The majority of these firms would probablybe classified in SIC 1623, as most of their trenching work was for theconstruction of sewer and water lines. Based on these surveys, OSHA assumesthat no more than 45 percent of the revenues in SIC 1623 are derived fromexcavation. It becomes more difficult, however, to develop similar estimates for theother affected SIC categories, and their revenues are derived at a moreaggregate level. For example, most of the excavation activity classifiedwithin SIC 15 involves the excavation of foundations for houses, offices,and warehouses. Foundation work for these types of structures ranges from2 percent of the total costs for single-family houses to 12 percent forindustrial buildings [4]. Because the foundation phase also includes allof the concrete costs not related to excavation, it is assumed that roughly5 percent of the activity in SIC 15 would be affected by subpart P. ForSIC 16, the major affected activity, other than that in SIC 1623, wouldbe highway, bridge, and other heavy construction. To estimate the excavationactivities for this SIC code, a number of bids for these types of jobswere examined [5]. The excavation component of these bids was in the rangeof 1-5 percent of the total project costs. Based on this information, 5percent has been used as a conservative estimate of the percent of revenuesin SIC 16 that are affected by subpart P. In SIC 17, the two main classificationsaffected are SIC 1711 (plumbing, heating and air conditioning) and SIC1794 (excavation and foundation work). A best estimate of 1 percent ofrevenues was used for SIC 1711 based on average plumbing estimates froma construction estimation manual [6], where trenching and backfilling represented0.7 percent of the total time required for the job. For SIC 1794, it wasassumed that 45 percent of revenues are affected by subpart P. This wasbased on the assumption that although SIC 1794 almost exclusively representsfirms doing excavations and foundation work, the actual excavation activityaffected by subpart P is only one phase of the project. Once the wallsare supported, laying the foundation, stripping, etc. are the other majorcost factors. In sum, this approach results in a total industry revenueestimate of $20.07 billion for excavation work (see Table 1).<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>1._<T4>Estimates of Excavation Revenues by Industry, 1987 </T4><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Net revenues (dollars billions) </H1><H1>Proportion subpart P related </H1><H1>Trenching and excavation revenues (dollar billions)</H1>  <ITAG tagnum="1">SIC 15 (Except 1531) <D>78.5 </D><D>.05 </D><D>3.92 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SIC 16 (Except 1623) <D>71.5 </D><D>.05 </D><D>3.57 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SIC 1623 <D>17.0 </D><D>.40 </D><D>6.79 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SIC 1711 <D>46.6 </D><D>.01 </D><D>.47 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SIC 1794 <D>11.8 </D><D>.45 </D><D>5.31</D><R>n,n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D> </D><D> </D><D>20.07  </D><F>Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis.</F></ITAG>    The Revisions to the Standard <ITAG tagnum="81">Introduction </ITAG>This section discusses the revisions to OSHA's current excavation standard.The revisions are intended both to clarify and explain the requirementsof the standard, and to eliminate discrepancies between requirements andcurrent practices where there is no evidence that current practices posea hazard to workers. The following paragraphs describe only those changes that may have significanteconomic impacts. <ITAG tagnum="81">Changes in Format </ITAG>The current standard consists of four main sections: General ProtectionRequirements, Specific Excavation Requirements, Specific Trenching Requirements,and Definitions. The General Protection    Requirements also apply to eachsection of the standard. The use and application of these provisions, however,are not clearly identified in the current standard and some users did notunderstand their intent [2, appendix D]. Consequently, the presentationand format of the standard have been revised in order to clarify the languageand requirements of subpart P. The amended standard includes a sectionon Scope, Application and Definitions, followed by General Requirements,and then by the Requirements for Protective Systems. The existing standardcontains two tables on sloping and shoring, whereas the revised standardcontains six nonmandatory appendices that provide a soil classificationsystem, describe tests for determining soil type, and provide designs forsloping, benching, timber shoring, aluminum hydraulic shoring, a pictorialrepresentation of nontimber shoring methods, and a flow chart of complianceoptions. OSHA expects that this reorganization will clarify the requirementsand the applicability of the various provisions and appendices, and increasethe use of some form of protective system. <ITAG tagnum="81">Changes in Provisions </ITAG>Numerous changes have been made to specific provisions of the standard.In the following discussion, the changes are presented in broad groupingsaccording to their expected effects, and important examples of these groupingsare examined. <T3>Specific Changes. </T3>The first group of changes are called specificchanges because, individually, they affect specific requirements of thestandard. A number of these specific changes are designed to bring therequirements of the standard into conformity with current industry practiceswhen doing so would not compromise safe work practices. Some of the specificchanges are simply definitional in nature. For example, the existing standarddefines ``belled excavations,'' and the revised standard defines and refersto ``belled-bottom pier holes.'' Because belled excavations are actuallycalled belled-bottom pier holes, the change simply brings the terminologyof the standard into conformity with current usage. The specific changes, however, involve more than just changes in wording;many change the actual requirements of the standard. For example, one changealters the definition of a trench shield by stating that it must protectemployees from the hazards of cave-ins, but need not protect against theoccurrence of cave-ins. In another case, the existing definition specifiesthat shields must be composed of steel plates and braces, whereas the revisedstandard allows shields to be made of wood or other materials. Many of the specific changes that OSHA is implementing will lower costsof compliance without increasing worker risk. For example, the existingstandard requires that work must be discontinued in excavations where waterhas accumulated. The revision would allow work to continue under some circumstancesof water accumulation if proper precautions have been taken to protectemployees. Another example of potential cost-savings results from modifyingthe existing provision for the use of emergency rescue equipment whereadverse atmospheric conditions exist. The revised standard no longer requiresthe equipment to be physically ``attended'' by a worker.<T3>General Changes.</T3> The general changes affect several provisionsof the standard. Perhaps the most important general changes are those specifyingalternative acceptable ways for contractors to comply with the requirementsfor protective systems. Although most of the existing standard's provisionsallow the use of alternative means of protection, the availability of theseoptions or alternatives was not generally appreciated. Michael Plank, ofthe Speed Shore Corporation observed:<ITAG tagnum="21">Everyday today if you read the current table P-2, you go to the bottomlines and read the footnotes, there's two footnotes that specifically leaveyou an option to use materials other than timber. But I'll promise youtoday, if I take hydraulics in a new part of the country where it's notcurrently being used, I will fight for weeks on end trying to get themconvinced that aluminum is an accepted standard as an equivalent to thistimber [8, p. 203].</ITAG>In addition, there is some confusion about the minimum standards contractorsmust meet in order to be in compliance. The revisions to the requirementsfor protective systems clarify such requirements. Contractors who chooseto use a support system, must follow one of four basic options: (1) Theycan slope the excavation at no more than 1\1/2\ horizontal to 1 vertical(34 degrees), (2) they may use OSHA's Appendices A and B for soil classificationand supports, shields, or other systems prepared in accordance, (3) theycan use other tabulated data prepared by or approved by a registered professionalengineer, or (4) they can have the system designed by or approved by aregistered professional engineer. These requirements represent a substantial change to the existing standard.The existing standard does not clearly specify the function of Table P-1on sloping and Table P-2 on timber shoring or indicate who may design slopingor support systems. For example, Table P-1 is required as ``a guide'' fortrenches, which appears to imply that it is nonmandatory. Elsewhere, thestandard states that trench banks are required to be ``laid back to a stableslope,'' while excavations, which are defined to include trenches, areto be dug to the ``angle of repose.'' In addition, there has been muchambiguity regarding what is the ``angle of repose''. These requirementsare exceedingly vague. The existing Table P-2 on timber shoring is describedas containing ``minimum requirements,'' but it is unclear whether suchrequirements are to be interpreted as minimum performance requirementsor as exact specifications. Similarly, although the standard defines atrench as a form of excavation, the section on ``Specific Excavation Requirements''contains the statement that support systems must be designed by a qualifiedperson according to accepted engineering practices. However, it is unclearif these requirements would allow a qualified person to design a differenttimber shoring system than that contained in Table P-2. <T3>Changes in Tables.</T3> The final type of amendment that distinguishesthe revised standard from the existing standard will clarify and broadenthe applicability of the material contained in Tables P-1 and P-2 of thecurrent standard. The set of tables in the existing standard not only areconfusing (as noted above), but also lead to inflexibility in application.For example, they contain no information about benching, or the combineduse of sloping and benching practices. Table P-1 on sloping contains thenote that ``clays, silts, loams or nonhomogeneous soils require shoringor bracing,'' thus apparently implying that sloping is inappropriate insuch situations. In addition, although Table P-1 notes the importance ofboth soil type and environmental conditions in determining proper sloping,it contains no method for determining either soil type or environmentalconditions. Finally, Table P-2 on timber shoring for trenches containsonly one set of specifications for a given soil type and depth. The specificationsin Table P-2 would be cost-effective only incidently because the relativeprices of types and grades of lumber vary sharply both over time and geographicregion. In contrast, the new appendices are designed to elminate these problems.For example, the revised standard's appendix A on soil and environmentalclassification is applicable to field use. Appendix B on sloping clearlyapplies to all excavations including trenches, and sloping is allowed forclays, silts, and other soils. In the current standard these applicationswere not clearly identified. Benching and the combined use of sloping andbenching are also discussed in this appendix. Appendix C on timber shoringis also more flexible than the requirements shown in Table P-2 of the currentstandard. This appendix contains as many as four sets of timber shoringprocedures for a given soil classification and trench depth. AppendicesE andamp; F provide further clarification through visual displays and flowcharts.Finally, in the revised standard, the use of these appendices are nonmandatory,unless they are being employed as a compliance option. In addition, while a nonmandatory appendix provides instruction on theproper assembly of timber shoring, the standard no longer centers its regulatorylanguage, with respect to support systems, on timber shoring. Numerouscommentors noted that hydraulic shoring is now more common than timbershoring, primarily because it is frequently more practical and is typicallysafer [7, 8]. OSHA has accordingly added nonmandatory Appendix D, whichprovides guidance for hydraulic shoring. OSHA believes that, overall, these changes will significantly reduce theburden of compliance by increasing the flexibility, clarity, and usefulnessof the standard. Worker Risk The hazardous nature of construction work, especially that related to excavationwork, is well documented. The fatality rate in SIC 1623, which is dominatedby trenching, was estimated by OSHA at 50.8 deaths per 100,000 workersper year for 1984-88, whereas for construction work generally, it was estimatedat 24.8 deaths per 100,000 employees per year during 1982-86 [1, 9, 12].Similarly, trenching cave-in fatalities have been estimated by NIOSH at75 per year, and lost workday injuries due to cave-ins at 1000 per year[11]. The incidence rate for injury among construction workers, includingthose doing excavation work, is about two times the all industry average(i.e., 15.1 injuries per 100 workers in construction compared with 7.7injuries per 100 workers in all industries [12]). Both industry and labor representatives, as well as insurance firms, agreethat shoring, shielding, and sloping to a sufficient angle eliminate orsubstantially diminish the risk of cave-ins. Yet, analysis of data fromOSHA's case files indicate that about 78 percent of all fatalities in excavationcame from cave-ins [10, 16, 36]. A central provision of subpart P is therequirement to provide protection against death or injuries resulting fromcave-ins by using methods that are now in use in the industry and thatwere prompted by the original consensus standards. A study by Johns Hopkins University of 306 trenching cave-in fatalitiesbetween 1974 and 1986 determined that 85 percent of them occurred in trenchesthat did not have shoring of the walls or in which the sides were not adequatelysloped to prevent soil from sliding in [13]. In addition, NIOSH's NationalOccupational Fatality study found an average of 73 deaths per year fromcave-ins [14]. The measures required to prevent deaths from excavationcave-ins have been known for more than 75 years, since the first English-languagestudy of this problem was commissioned by Winston Churchill in 1912 [14].Recently, several states and localities have made significant progressin lowering cave-in deaths. California has been able to cut its numberof cave-in fatalities by more than half [14]. Between 1974 and July l979,the Milwaukee area had 20 fatalities associated with trench cave-ins, thehighest in the region. With the cooperation of local contractors, theyhave managed since 1979 to avoid all cave-in fatalities [15]. In the Dallasarea, there has been a significant reduction in cave-in accidents sincemid-1985 [15]. Clearly, there is significant room for progress in decreasingworker risk in excavation projects. The primary purpose of the revisions is to clarify the requirements andto add flexibility so that firms can tailor their protective measures totheir particular situations. Descriptions of 163 excavation fatalitieswere reviewed by Eastern Research Group (ERG) [16] in order to identifythose which would have been prevented through compliance with the existingor revised standards. The analysis is based on accidents as they were describedin accident inspection abstracts. As a preliminary indication of the typesof accidents which occur, ERG summarized some of the basic characteristicsof the sample of accident narratives. The data indicate that the majorityof fatalities resulted from cave-ins. The effectiveness of the subpartP standards therefore largely depends on its effectiveness in preventingthis type of accident. The other categories with more than one fatalityinclude (1) ``struck by'' accidents, which typically resulted when workerswere struck by pipe or other materials, (2) gas-related accidents (explosionsand asphyxiations), (3) falls, and (4) electrocutions. The pattern of injury incidence was quite similar to that for fatalities.This finding, however, reflects the fact that a large proportion of injuriesin this sample was due to cave-ins because OSHA primarily investigatesfatalities or catastrophes, and includes only the associated injuries inits data base. Thus, these data may not be representative of all injuriesrelated to excavation activities.<ITAG tagnum="81">Fatalities </ITAG><T3>Baseline Incidence Rates. </T3>ERG employed two separate approachestoward estimating the annual number of fatalities in excavations. The firstapproach relied on fatality data from California [17] and Texas [32]. Datafrom these two states account for a large proportion of national constructionactivity in recent years. These states are also distinguished by theirlarge geographic size, which increases the likelihood of encountering variedsoil types. California and Texas reported annual averages for fatalities due to cave-insof 5.3 and 9.3 respectively. The two states combined generate 23 percent,or nearly one-fourth, of national construction receipts as measured inthe 1982 Census of Construction [1]. The cave-in fatalities in these states were extrapolated to the total fatalitiesfrom excavation work using a sample of excavation fatalities reported inthe OSHA fatality/catastrophe reports. ERG reviewed a sample of accidentreports to determine their preventability under the existing and proposedstandards (this sample is described more fully below). The sample was judgedto be a reliable indicator of the relative portion of fatalities in excavationwork due to cave-ins and other causes. Using this sample, it was calculatedthat 78 percent of the fatalities were due to cave-ins. The average cave-inrelated fatalities for the California and Texas data were then increasedby a factor of 1.3 (1.0 divided by 0.78) so that they would represent thetotal fatalities for trenching and excavation work. The combined stateaverage for California and Texas was thus calculated at 19.0 (5.3 plus9.3 times 1.3). Extrapolating to the national level with California andTexas representing 23 percent of national construction receipts in 1982,gives a national total of 83 fatalities. The second estimation procedure was based on the number of fatalities recordedin the OSHA fatality/catastrophe reports. The data used in this study werederived from the years 1978 to 1980 (the most recent complete years forwhich IMIS data related to excavation activity could be retrieved whenERG did their analysis). The total number of fatalities for this time intervalwas 138 (39, 50 and 49). The more recent Johns Hopkins' analysis of OSHA'sIMIS abstracts covering the period 1984 to 1986 found 52, 85 and 75 cave-inrelated fatalities annually for all states with the exception of California,Michigan and  Washington [13]. Recent studies, however, have indicated that underreporting of accidentsis significant in many areas [33, 34]. Companies sometimes choose not toreport fatal accidents or are unaware of the requirement to do so, andOSHA personnel sometimes learn of accidents through news reports and otherunofficial sources. Nevertheless, the extent of underreporting is not knownwith certainty and no adjustment to the data was attempted. The fatality/catastrophe reports used by ERG are not a comprehensive sampleof accident records for the years represented since the reports were filedonly in states with federally operated safety and health programs. Thesestates represent about one-half of all states. Assuming that the fatality/catastrophereports represent half of all fatalities for the years covered, the numericalaverage for 1978-1980 was 92 deaths per year. The growth in constructionemployment over that period was calculated at 5 percent [35]. Applyinga simple growth factor of 5 percent to the fatality estimate produces arevised figure of 97 fatalities per year. ERG based their best estimate on an average of the two approaches. OSHAagrees and concludes that 90 fatalities per year represents a best estimateof the current baseline risk in excavation work. <ITAG tagnum="81">Injuries </ITAG><T3>Cave-In Injuries. </T3>A National estimate of cave-in-related injurieswas derived using data from a special study of California cave-ins [17].Over a 22-year period, the California researchers identified 2,229 lostworkday injuries and 193 fatalities due to cave-ins. The data indicatea ratio of 11.5 lost workday injuries for every cave-in fatality. Thisestimate was assumed to be representative of the relationship for the nationas a whole. An OSHA analysis of 221 trenching fatalities [10] has indicatedthat 78 percent of excavation fatalities are due to cave-ins. Therefore,given the projection of 90 excavation fatalities annually, OSHA estimatedthat there are 70 fatalities annually due to cave-ins. Extrapolating fromthe California incidence rates, OSHA estimates that there are 805 cave-inrelated lost-workday injuries annually in the United States. The approximate range for this estimate was independently confirmed ina separate study by the National Institute for Occupational Safety andHealth (NIOSH) [17]. These researchers reviewed accident reports of theSupplementary Data System of the Bureau of Labor Statistics for 1976 to1981. The NIOSH researchers derived an estimate of approximately 1,000lost workday injuries per year due to cave-ins, including 75 fatalities.An estimate of the noncave-in related lost workday injuries occurring inexcavation activities was developed using a special study of injuries toconstruction laborers prepared by the Bureau of Labor Statistics [l8].That study reviewed survey responses from 658 injured construction laborers.Construction laborers are estimated to constitute one-fifth of the totalconstruction workforce. The BLS survey of construction workers provided two main indicators ofthe share of construction injuries occurring in excavation work. Specifically,the injured workers were asked questions on (1) the type of work beingperformed and (2) the location of the worker at the time of the accident.Numerous other questions were included but none allowed an accurate depictionof excavation work. The survey results indicated that for 6 percent ofthe injured workers, the type of work was identified as ``laying sewerlines or other pipelines''. (Other types of work included constructionof homes, buildings, or other structures and roadways. Some of these, inturn, could have included excavation work. Workers may have selected theseother activity categories even if they were actually doing excavation workrelated to them.) Further, 7 percent of workers reported their locationat the time of injury as ``in trench''. None of the other categories alloweda worker to state that he was in an excavation. Thus, the survey results suggest that at least 7 percent of injuries occurredduring trenching work. Although it is possible that some injuries occurringin excavations have been reported in other categories that do not allowthem to be identified, OSHA has relied on the 7 percent estimate, basedon the location of workers, as the best indication of the proportion ofinjuries occurring during excavation work. Coincidentally, ERG's estimateof the value of excavation work as a share of the value of constructionput in place is also approximately 7 percent. Thus the 7 percent estimatewas judged to be a reasonably accurate estimate of the share of all constructioninjuries occurring in excavation work. The number of lost workday injuries occurring among construction workersin 1986 was estimated at 326,800 based on incidence rates and employmentdata provided by the Bureau of Labor Statistics [12]. This estimate wasderived using an employment level for construction workers in 1986 of 3,890,000workers and a derived incidence rate for lost workday cases of 8.4 per100 full-time workers. Applying the 7 percent estimate, the total lostworkday injuries in excavation work was calculated at 22,876. Since 805injuries have been identified as occurring during cave-ins, the remainingnumber of lost workday cases is calculated to be 22,071. <T3>Prevention Rates. </T3>ERG reviewed a sample of 163 fatalities from1979 to 1985 (115 fatalities from OSHA fatality/catastrophe inspectionreports from 1979-1981 and 48 fatalities from OSHA's Integrated ManagementInformation System (IMIS) abstracts from 1983-1985) for preventabilityunder the existing and revised standards. Fifteen fatalities had to beeliminated because the accident narratives were incomplete or otherwiseinsufficient to allow classification. The remaining 148 fatalities wereclassified as either preventable or not preventable assuming full compliancewith either the existing or revised standards. These reports and abstracts had certain limitations as data sources becausethe amount and specificity of narrative information are inconsistent fromreport to report. For example, in some cases, information on trench orexcavation dimensions, type of soil, and various contributing factors (e.g.,water accumulation, digging in a backfilled area, lack or positioning ofladders) may be suggestive of rule violations, but may not be detailedenough to allow a firm judgment. This was particularly problematic in theanalysis of cave-ins. ERG assumed that, where there was no support system,the cave-in was likely due to the lack of such a system, and that any supportsystem in place at the time of a cave-in was by definition inadequate.In some of these cases, it is possible that the most likely cause of thecave-in was some other factor (such as water accumulation) that was notadequately described. ERG's assumption therefore may have biased theirpreventability assessment in favor of the sections of Subpart P that pertainto support systems, and against other sections of Subpart P. Some of the accident narratives included a listing of the OSHA citationsthat were issued. In a number of cases, however, the relevance of the citationcould not be unambiguously interpreted because the narratives did not correlatevery well with the citation noted. For this reason, the listed citationswere considered, but not totally relied upon, in making preventabilityjudgments.Fatalities that were judged by ERG as preventable accounted for 81.1 percentof the sample under the existing standard and 82.4 percent under the revisedstandard [16]. Cave-ins accounted for the largest percentage of preventablefatalities (72.3 percent under the existing standard and 73.0 percent underthe revised standard). The relevant provisions deal with the lack of orinadequacies in support systems (e.g., sloping, shoring, trench jacks,boxes, and shields), and to a much smaller extent, with problems in installingor removing such systems. In these cases, workers were generally eitherasphyxiated or fatally injured by falling soil or rock. The balance of preventable fatalities are associated with a variety offactors. For example, 2.7 percent of the fatalities that were judged preventableby compliance with the existing standard and 3.4 percent with the revisedstandard are associated with inadequate attempts to locate or support undergroundinstallations, such as water, fuel, and electric lines. These fatalitiesmainly occurred from drowning as a result of a water main breakage, fromelectrocution, or from inhalation of toxic fumes from broken gas mains.Two percent of preventable fatalities under each standard were associatedwith failure to test (or adequately test) or provide adequate ventilation,or eliminate sources of ignition where there are dangerous gaseous conditions(lack of oxygen or presence of toxic gases). In these cases, workers wereeither asphyxiated or fatally injured as a result of explosions. In 1.4 percent of the preventable fatalities under each standard, the stabilityof structures (generally building walls) adjoining the trench or excavationwas not properly assured by appropriate support systems. In these cases,the walls gave way and fell on the workers. Inadequate protection from unintended movement by mobile equipment accountedfor a single preventable fatality under both the existing and revised standards.In this case, a piece of equipment struck and fatally injured the worker.Various other hazards accounted for the balance of the preventable fatalities.Overall, ERG found both the existing and revised standards to be potentiallyeffective for the prevention of most fatalities. The high rate of preventionis due primarily to the effectiveness of these requirements in preventingthe most common type of fatality, those due to a cave-in. The revised standardwas found to offer a slightly higher rate of accident prevention becauseit is more effective against fatalities resulting from the failure to locateunderground installations and to safely install cave-in protection systems.Using the earlier estimate of 90 fatalities and applying ERG's preventabilityestimates of 81.1 percent for the existing standard and 82.4 percent forthe revised standard results in 73 fatalities avoided per year under theexisting standard and 74 per year under the revised standard. To estimate the preventability of nonfatal injuries, ERG reviewed 103 injuriesfrom OSHA fatality/catastrophe inspection reports from 1979-1981. Theyfound a similar pattern to that of fatalities, with cave-ins accountingfor most injuries under both standards. As noted previously, this sampleof injury data includes primarily those injuries caused by cave-ins. Fewaccidents of other types have been included. ERG found 74 of the injuries were due to cave-ins. For each standard, allbut 3 of these injuries (96 percent) were preventable. For the three injuriesnot preventable, a cave-in occurred despite apparently correct slopingof a trench as described in the accident report. For all other classifiableinjuries, 23 in total, the existing and revised standards would prevent6 (26 percent) and 11 (48 percent) respectively. These injuries may notbe representative of all noncave-in injuries since only the more seriousaccidents are investigated by OSHA. These more serious accidents are alsomore likely to be addressed by both the existing and revised standards.ERG therefore estimated that the existing standard would reduce all non-cave-inaccidents by five percent and that the revised standard would reduce themby ten percent. Based on the earlier baseline cave-in injury estimate of 805 annually andapplying the 96 percent preventability estimate results in 773 preventablelost workday injuries per year due to cave-ins under either standard. Fornoncave-in related injuries it was estimated that the existing standardwould prevent 1,104 (.05andmultiply;22,071) and that the revised standardwould prevent 2,207 (.1andmultiply;22,071) lost workday injuries annually.The combined total is 1,909 lost workday injuries prevented per year oran overall injury prevention rate for the existing standard of 8.3 percent(based on a total of 22,876 injuries). Under the revised standard, thetotal reduction in lost workday injuries is 3,012 per year, or 13.2 percent.<ITAG tagnum="81">Quantitative Estimation of Employee Benefits Due to Accident Reductions</ITAG>The accident reductions attributable to a standard have a monetary valueto the employee who would otherwise bear the occupational risk. This reportuses estimates based on the willingness-to-pay approach to represent thedollar amount that employees would be willing to pay to reduce the statisticalprobability of a lost workday injury. Economic studies projecting thesevalues show a high variability, but most estimates range between $23,000and $64,000 [20]. OSHA has chosen $33,000 as a reasonable value for a lostworkday injury [21, p. VI-10]. Based on the above injury preventabilityestimates the value of these lost workdays prevented would be approximately$63.0 million under full compliance with the existing standard and $99.4million under full compliance with the revised standard. <ITAG tagnum="81">Employer Benefits Due to Cost Savings from Accident Prevention </ITAG>The elimination of a fatality or injury generates additional social benefitsthrough the restoration of all productivity losses associated with an accident.These benefits are represented by the cost savings which occur to the firmwhich avoids the accident. The cost savings (or prevented losses) includethe value of lost production time due to job interruption and delay, administrative,paperwork, and investigative costs associated with an accident, rehiringand retraining costs to replace a seriously injured or killed worker, medicalcosts, and costs of re-excavation (in the case of a cave-in) or other propertyloss. Estimates of these costs are presented in this section. Several previous safety studies have examined the costs of work disruptionsand other direct losses due to accidents. ERG selected one such study whichis based on accident investigations in the construction industry. Theseresearch findings were used in estimating the cumulative benefits of theindirect benefits from accident reduction. The study selected was performedat The Construction Institute, Department of Civil Engineering, StanfordUniversity (Levitt et al.) [31]. The authors studied 49 reports of lostworkday and non-lost workday injuries. Only results for the former categoryare used here. Data were assembled on the following items: 1. Insurance company claims handling and administrative fees. 2. Cost of transporting the injured worker to a medical facility. 3. Wages paid to the injured worker for the time not worked. 4. Wages paid to other workers for the time not worked (work interrupted).5. Cost of scheduling and funding overtime necessitated by the accident.6. Cost of loss of crew efficiency. 7. Cost to train and orient a replacement worker. 8. Extra wage cost to rehabilitate the returning worker at a reduced capacity.9. Costs to clean up, repair, or replace damage from the accident. 10. Cost of wages for supervision associated with the accident. 11. Costs for safety and clerical personnel to record and investigate theaccident. Costs of pain and suffering or other non-quantifiable elements were notincluded. The work disruption costs and other losses were found to range from $90to $24,900 for lost workday accidents. The mean losses for the lost workdayinjuries studied (25 of the sample of 49) was $5,380. Identical cost savingswere assumed to apply to avoided fatalities. (It should be noted that evennon-lost workday injuries, which have not been added to the totals here,have notable work disruption costs. The mean estimate of work disruptioncosts for a non-lost workday injury was $1,450.) The cost savings attributable to the existing standard under an assumptionof full compliance were estimated at $5,380 times 1,932 (the sum of 73fatalities and 1,909 lost workday injuries), or $10.7 million. The costsavings for the revised standard were calculated at $5,380 times 3,086(74 fatalities and 3,012 lost workday injuries), or $16.6 million. <ITAG tagnum="81">Incremental Benefits of the Amended Standard </ITAG>The benefits generated under the existing or revised standard consist ofavoided fatalities, avoided lost workday injuries, and cost savings fromavoided work disruptions due to accidents. Full compliance with the revisedstandard will prevent more fatalities (estimated at 1 per year), will preventmore lost workday injuries (estimated at 1,103 more per year) and willgenerate larger cost savings due to accident avoidance (estimated at $5.9million in cost savings per year).Incremental Costs <ITAG tagnum="81">Preliminary Estimates </ITAG>The changes to the current subpart P represent numerous clarificationsand amendments that in most cases will increase the flexibility of andreduce the regulatory burden on private enterprise without impairing workerprotection. On average, the amendment is expected to result in a net reductionin costs. However, particular provisions may result in cost increases forsome firms. There are few available published data on the safety costs related to excavationprojects. Thus, for its Preliminary Regulatory Impact Assessment (PRIA)of the proposed standard, OSHA relied heavily upon the judgement of thosepeople in the contracting business, since they would be in the best positionto know the costs imposed by an OSHA regulation. These individuals clearlyhad no incentive to underestimate such costs. Cost questions were posedto the Associated General Contractors (AGC), who in turn queried a sampleof its members (about two dozen contractors). None were able to provideprecise estimates of either the absolute or relative costs of particularsubpart P requirements. Similarly, a number of representatives of firmswere contacted directly by OSHA and asked if they could estimate the percentof their excavating costs that stemmed directly from OSHA requirements;or conversely, how their costs would be affected were this particular regulationto disappear tomorrow. Once again, none could provide precise estimates,owing in part to the variety of jobs and circumstances. Only after furtherprobing did industry representatives indicate that only under the mostextreme circumstances would subpart P requirements account for 5 percentof total job costs. In a further attempt to isolate these costs, all of the major publishersof construction industry cost indexes, as found in ``Engineering News Record''[22], were contacted in an attempt to determine if either subpart P orsafety costs generally were calculated separately in the compilation ofcosts. Of the 15 firms contacted, all stated that labor and materials costswere considered individually, but that all safety costs were absorbed withinoverhead costs and could not be separately identified. Items such as offsitewages, fringe benefits, financing costs, inventory, other administrativeexpenses, and profit are included in overhead costs. In addition, bidson major construction projects that had been published over several yearsin ``Engineering News Record'' [5] were examined to determine whether safetycosts were a line item in the specifications. None were found. Based uponthe above information, OSHA assumed that all safety costs do not exceedthat portion of the costs represented by overhead. Moreover, the costsassociated with subpart P are only one factor contributing to the totalsafety costs of an excavation job. The most recent Deparment of Labor studies [23] of the distribution ofconstruction contract costs for various types of construction projectsfound that for sewer line construction, overhead and profit accounted for23.3 percent of the total contract costs. Before-tax profit alone accountsfor over 10 percent of the total; all other overhead items account forthe remaining 13 plus percent. From this remainder it was assumed thatno more than 5 percent of the total project cost can be attributed to allsafety items, only a portion of which is a direct result of complying withsubpart P requirements. There were approximately $12.42 billion in annual excavating revenues in1982. OSHA assumed that 5 percent of this total represents costs imposedby the existing standard. Thus, OSHA's PRIA estimated that the cost ofthe existing standard was $621 million annually. Based on discussions withcontractors and their representatives, OSHA's preliminary analysis estimatedthat the amendments would save between 2 and 7 percent of the current costof subpart P. The estimated savings arising from the amendments thereforeranged between $12.42 million and $43.47 million to the economy as a whole.<ITAG tagnum="81">Final Estimates </ITAG>Under contract to OSHA, Eastern Research Group (ERG) [16] developed revisedestimates of the cost of the existing and amended excavation standardsbased upon model projects. They examined sewer line installation trenching,utility hook-up trenching, foundation excavation for suburban office buildingsand residential building excavation. They estimated the likely means ofcompliance under the two standards, and the soil types of these projects.ERG estimated, based on Commerce Department data, that the total valueof construction affected by the standard is $15.8 billion, the majorityof which ($9.2 billion) is in sewer and highway trenches. Based upon OSHAinspection data, sewer and highway trenches were found to have the highestnon-compliance rate with the existing standard. As shown in Table 2, theywere estimated to have a 24 percent non-compliance rate, followed by utilityhook-up trenches at 21 percent. ERG estimated that the greatest cost impacton non-complying firms would fall on suburban commercial and industrialbuilding excavations, where a 26.5 percent cost increase would occur aftercomplying with either the existing or the revised standard. After accountingfor non-compliance rates, utility hook-ups as a group (complying firmsincluded) were estimated to have the highest average percent increase incost, at just under 3 percent. Costs in this sector were attributed tothe relative inability to use sloping as a means of compliance with thestandard, along with relatively little current usage of hydraulic shoringor trench boxes. Given the relative size of the sewer and highway trenchsector, over half the costs of compliance for cave-in protection ($149million per year) were expected to fall in this sector (see Table 3). Again,the majority of these costs were attributed to the added use of trenchboxes, which reduce productivity. Suburban commercial and industrial buildingexcavations were estimated to incur $79 million per year and utility hook-upprojects $52 million per year in compliance costs to avoid cave-ins. Intotal, ERG estimated that cave-in protection would cost $332.0 millionunder the existing standard, and $289.0 under the revised standard.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>6,L2,i1,s100,10,10,10,10,10 </C><T4>Table </T4>2._<T4>Average Percentage Cost Increases for all Trenching and ExcavationProjects</T4><H1> </H1><H1>Estimated non-compliance rate</H1><H1>Percentage cost increase for non-complying model projects</H1><H2>Existing standard</H2><H2>Revised standard</H2><H1>Average percentage increases for all projects</H1><H2>Existing standard</H2><H2>Revised standard</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">Sewer and highway trenches<D>0.24</D><D>8.7</D><D>6.7</D><D>2.0</D><D>1.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Utility hook-ups<D>0.21</D><D>15.6</D><D>14.4</D><D>2.9</D><D>2.7</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Suburban commercial and industrial building excavations and ``other''excavations<D>0.10</D><D>26.5</D><D>26.5</D><D>2.1</D><D>2.1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential building excavations<D>0.05</D><D>21.3</D><D>21.3</D><D>0.9</D><D>0.9 </D><F>Source: ERG estimates. The categories of urban building excavations,gas and other pipeline trenches, and shallow water line trenches were assumedto be in compliance.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>3._<T4>Total Compliance Costs for the General Cave-In Protection Requirements</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[$millions per year] </ITAG><H1>Project category </H1><H1>Estimated total value </H1><H1>Total cave-in protection compliance costs </H1><H2>Existing standard </H2><H2>Revised standard</H2> <ITAG tagnum="1">Sewer and highway trenches \1\ <D>9,200 </D><D>\1\ 188 </D><D>\1\ 149 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Utility hook-ups <D>1,900 </D><D>56 </D><D>52 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Suburban commercial and industrial building excavations and ``other''excavations <D>3,700 </D><D>79 </D><D>79 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential building excavations <D>1,000 </D><D>9 </D><D>9</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>\2\ 15,800 </D><D>332 </D><D>289  </D><F>\1\ Includes trenches for water systems greater than 5 ft. deep. Alsoincludes $8 million in cave-in protection costs incurred due to soil compactionproblems.  </F><F>\2\ The estimated total value shown here does not include the valueof excavations for urban building projects, all of which were assumed tobe in compliance. </F><F>Source: ERG estimates. The categories of urban building excavations,gas and other pipeline trenches, and shallow water line trenches were assumedto be in compliance.</F></ITAG></ITAG> ERG also estimated costs for the other provisions of the standard, includingthose related to inspections, hazardous atmospheres, warning systems formobile equipment, traffic vests and means of access and egress from trenches.They estimated that these would cost $12.0 million to comply with the existingstandard, and $17.0 million for the revised standard. Thus, as shown intable 4, ERG estimated that the total annual cost of compliance, figuringin current non-compliance, would be $344.0 million for the existing standard,and $306.0 million for the revised standard. ERG therefore estimated thatthe revised standard would save $38.0 million.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,i1,s150,r60,7,r60,7</C><T4>Table 4._Summary of Compliance Costs Under Full Compliance With theExisting and Proposed Standard </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[Dollar million per year]</ITAG><H1>Topic </H1><H1>Existing standard paragraphs(s) of part 1926</H1><H1>Annual cost \1\ </H1><H1>Proposed standard paragraph(s) of part 1926</H1><H1>Annual costs \1\</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Cave-in protection \2\ <D>Various </D><D>332.0 </D><D>Various </D><D>289.0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Access and egress;  means of egress from trenches <D>652(u) </D><D>0.4 </D><D>651(c)(2) </D><D>Neg. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Traffic vests <D>650(f) </D><D>0.1 </D><D>651(d) </D><D>0.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Exposure to suspended loads <D>650(u) </D><D>Neg </D><D>651(e) </D><D>Neg. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Warning system for  mobile equipment <D>651(s) </D><D>1.1 </D><D>651(f) </D><D>Neg. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hazardous atmospheres <D>650(g), 651(v) </D><D>4.1 </D><D>651(g)(1) </D><D>4.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Store excavated  materials 2 feet from edge <D>651(i) </D><D>Neg </D><D>651(j)(3) </D><D>Neg. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Inspections <D>650(i), 650(d) </D><D>6.3 </D><D>651(a) </D><D>6.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Paperwork <D>NA </D><D>0.0 </D><D>Various </D><D>6.5</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>  </D><D>344.0 </D><D>  </D><D>306.0  </D><F>\1\ Includes some annualized equipment costs as derived for the generalparagraph requirements. </F><F>\2\ Includes incremental soil compaction costs. </F><F>Neg.=Negligible. </F><F>Source: ERG estimates.</F></ITAG></ITAG>In short, using a model, or `micro' approach of estimating costs of complianceunder both the existing and proposed standards, ERG projected a cost savingsfrom the amendments to subpart P of approximately the same magnitude asthe ``high'' preliminary estimate OSHA produced using an aggregate approach.It should be noted, however, that ERG's analysis examined only the impacton firms that are out of compliance with the current and revised standards.It did not examine the potential for cost savings under the revised standardin firms already in compliance with the current standard. It is possible,therefore, that the revised standard may save more than $38.0 million.In addition to these provisions, there was some concern expressed aboutthe need to hire a certified engineer [24, 25, 26, 27]. The final standard,however, does not require the use of an engineer, but simply allows theirparticipation as an alternative to using the tables provided in the standard.The rule therefore will impose no additional cost and will in fact generatecost savings for those firms that now use engineers. <ITAG tagnum="81">Cost Effectiveness </ITAG>Based on the cost estimates developed by ERG, the monetized savings ofthe revised standard to employers from less work disruption are estimatedat $16.6 million, and the monetized benefits to employees from fewer non-fatalaccidents are estimated at $99.4 million. To derive a cost-effectivenessratio, these monetized benefits were subtracted from the total annualizedcosts of $306.0 million, and this total divided by the expected numberof lives to be saved by the standard. Since full compliance with the revisedstandard is expected to save 74 lives per year, OSHA estimates that thenet cost per 1ife saved is about $2.6 million. <ITAG tagnum="81">Feasibility </ITAG>The above analysis indicates that compliance with the revised standardis easier and less expensive than compliance with the existing standard.Since the analysis also indicates that most firms are currently in compliancewith the existing standard, OSHA concludes that compliance with the revisedstandard is both economically and technologically feasible for these firms.OSHA indicates that additional contractors will comply with the revisedstandard for excavation work because of its increased flexibility and clarityas compared to the existing standard. Based upon the following analysis,OSHA also concludes that the aggregate economic impacts of achieving fullcompliance starting from a baseline of current industry practice are small,as are the impacts to representative excavation firms, and differentialimpacts on small firms. <ITAG tagnum="81">Aggregate Economic Impacts </ITAG>The aggregate economic impacts of enforcing full compliance with the subpartP regulations depend on the extent to which price hikes based on compliancecost increases would cause a decline in the demand for excavation services.Since excavation is an input in the production of construction activities,the demand for excavation services depends ultimately on the demand forconstruction output. Thus, unless cost-based price increases would resultin a reduction in demand for construction outputs, no significant economicimpacts will be borne by the affected industry.<T3>Methodology. </T3>Increasing the price of excavation has two potentialeffects on the demand for such services. First, increasing the price ofexcavation relative to the price of other inputs may result in factor substitutionaway from excavation. The extent to which this would occur depends on thesubstitutability between excavation and other input factors used in theconstruction process. Second, an increase in excavation prices would resultin an increase in the marginal costs of construction output and, therefore,an upward shift in the construction supply curve. This in turn would resultin a higher equilibrium market price and, in general, a reduction in themarket equilibrium level of output. Such a reduction in construction outputwould not result in a decline in the demand for excavation services. It can be shown, in general, that the price elasticity of demand for excavationservices depends directly on (1) the price elasticity of demand for constructionoutput and (2) the share of the value of construction output accountedfor by excavation; and varies inversely with the elasticity of substitutionbetween excavation and other factors of production. The degree of substitutability between inputs depends on the nature ofthe production function. In construction, the substitutability betweenexcavation and other factors is quite low and, therefore, its impact onthe demand elasticity for excavation is of a second order in magnitude.If the elasticity of substitution is assumed to be zero, the price elasticityof demand for excavation is equal to the price elasticity of demand forconstruction multiplied by the share of construction output accounted forby excavation activities. This derived demand relationship is used to assess the economic impactof the estimated compliance cost increases. If the demand elasticity werezero, there would be no effect on output and industry revenues would increasein an amount equal to the cost increase projected in section 3. If thedemand elasticity were greater than zero (in absolute value), output woulddecline and revenues would increase by less than the amount of the projectedcost increases. The difference between those two levels represents theaggregate economic impact of full compliance. It represents the loss inrevenues from that which would be necessary to support excavation workin a full compliance state at the existing level of activity.<T3> Demand for construction. </T3>ERG [16] judged that several categoriesof excavation projects would be impacted by the subpart P regulations.These include work related to sewers, highways, and water supply systems,work associated with non-residential building construction and other non-buildingconstruction, and work associated with residential building construction.This category includes building excavations for basements and foundationsand trenching for utility hook-ups. The demand characteristics of eachof these three construction categories is considered below. <T3>Highway, sewer, and water system construction. </T3>Expenditures forconstruction projects in this category are, as a rule, publicly financed.For this reason, decisions regarding the appropriate level of such investmentsare not made in the private marketplace. Any relationship between the price(cost) of such investments and the level of demand depends, therefore,more on political considerations than on the factors that determine demandfor privately produced goods and services. In the case of highways, no output price exists. Thus, no simple relationshipcan be specified between the level of construction expenditures and theprice of such investments. The cost of sewers and water systems investmentsis often embodied in a sewer or water charge, which is in effect a ``price''.In the absence of a perfect political system, decisions regarding the levelof water and sewer investments will not reflect a price influence in accordancewith demand theory constraints.These considerations imply that the effect of small cost changes on thelevel of construction investments in this category would not be significant,a conclusion reinforced by econometric analyses of expenditures for thesetypes of construction. For example, the Brookings Econometric Model ofthe United States does not include any price or cost variables in its equationsforecasting public expenditures for highways or sewer and water systems.For the purposes of their study on excavating, therefore, ERG concludedthat the price elasticity of demand for these construction categories isnot significantly different from zero. <T3>Non-Residential Building Construction and Other Non-Building Construction.</T3>Included in this category are commercial and industrial building constructionand ``other'' non-building construction (highways, sewer systems, watersupply facilities, gas and other pipelines). In this case, the outputsof construction activity (e.g., commercial buildings) are themselves inputsinto the production of other services (e.g., services that require commercialbuilding space). Thus the elasticity of demand for the construction outputis related to (1) the price elasticity of demand for the final serviceand (2) the importance of the costs of buildings or other constructionin the total costs of the final service. Since the cost of the buildingis likely a small factor in affecting the demand for the service, the priceelasticity of demand for these types of construction is likely to be small.For similar reasons, the derived demand for excavation activities willbe another order of magnitude smaller. Thus, ERG concluded that changesin costs of excavation activities in the ranges projected in the cost analysiswill not have significant impacts on the expenditures for constructionprojects falling within this category. <T3>Residential Construction. </T3>Expenditures for this category of constructionactivities represent investments in the stock of single and multi-familyhousing. A number of studies have examined the price sensitivity of thedemand for housing services. Depending on the data source and estimationmethodology, these studies have estimated the price elasticity of demandfor housing services at values ranging from ^0.4 to ^1.0 [28]. In the long run, it is reasonable to expect the demand for the stock ofhousing to reflect similar levels of price sensitivity. Depending on therate of market adjustment, short-run price sensitivity should be lower.It is also important to consider that housing investments include modifications,renovation, and depreciation (negative investment) to the existing stockas well as new housing construction. For this reason, the elasticity ofdemand for new residential construction is likely to be lower than thatfor residential construction as a whole. Thus, for purposes of the economicimpact analysis, ERG assumed a price elasticity of ^0.5, which is at thelower end of the spectrum of estimated price elasticities. <T3>Aggregate Economic Impacts. </T3>Based on the magnitude of the elasticitydeveloped above, and the small portion of each construction activity composedof excavation work, ERG concluded that no significant impacts should beexpected from compliance-related cost increases for trenches for sewers,highways, and water supply systems and for excavations for commercial andindustrial buildings and other non-building excavations. Only in the case of housing construction does the possibility of a significantimpact exist for excavation work for basements and foundations and trenchwork for residential utility hook-ups. Excavation is estimated to represent0.5 percent of residential construction and utility hook-ups are estimatedto account for 1.0 percent of residential construction. Combining theseshares with the estimated construction price elasticity of ^0.5 suggestsan elasticity of demand with respect to price of ^.003 for residentialconstruction excavations and ^.005 for utility trenches. Economic impacts on excavation contractors will occur to the extent thatcost increases exceed revenue increases. The estimated changes in averageproject costs due to compliance are 0.9 percent for residential foundationexcavations and 2.9 percent for utility hook-ups under the more costlyexisting standard. The revenues from residential foundation excavationsand utility hook-up trenches are $1 billion and $1.35 billion, respectively.The project cost increases (at current levels of activity) will generateaggregate cost increases of $9.0 million and $39.2 million in these twosectors. Revenue increases are derived by applying the revenue elasticity (whichis equal to one plus the price elasticity) to the cost increases. Thiscalculation indicates that the revenue increases fall short of the costincreases by approximately $27,000 in residential excavations and $196,000in utility hook-up trenches. Given the magnitude of these estimates in comparison to total industryrevenues, OSHA believes that no significant impacts on the constructionindustry will result from enforcing full compliance with either versionof the Subpart P standard. Only in residential construction does the possibilityof measurable impacts exist. Even in this case, however, the estimatedaggregate impacts are less than the value of the construction work performedby one typical excavation contractor. As a result, OSHA concludes thatfull compliance with the revised standard is economically feasible. <ITAG tagnum="81">Regulatory Flexibility Certification </ITAG>Pursuant to the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980 (Pub. L. 95-353, 94Stat. 1164 (5 U.S.C. 60 et seq.)), OSHA has assessed the impact of therevisions and concludes that they would not adversely affect a significantnumber of small entities. As is generally known, the burden of regulation, especially the legal andpaperwork burdens, can fall disproportionately on small enterprises. Thisoccurs primarily because larger firms often have the legal and clericalsupport in place to handle the burdens imposed by government regulation.ERG concluded that the sector most likely to incur some revenue loss isresidential construction. Firms providing excavation services for thissector are among the smallest firms in the construction industry. Nevertheless,ERG concluded that the impacts from revenue loss will be minor. In general, the amended standard will not generate differential impactson small firms, but there may be instances in which full compliance willbe more difficult for smaller firms. Full compliance with the Subpart Pstandards will sometimes require contractors to utilize trench boxes ormore expensive means of cave-in protection. This occurs when there is notsufficient space for sloping of the trench sides, or where uneven trenchsides may make the use of hydraulic shores unwieldy. For the smallest contractors,compliance through these methods may be difficult because they lack adequateequipment capabilities, such as a backhoe of sufficient size to pull atrench box. These inequities among firms are ameliorated to the extentthat firms are able to rent the necessary equipment. Technological impacts(e.g., light-weight trench boxes) also help. Rental costs may cut intoprofit margins, however, and as a result small firms may prefer not toparticipate in some excavation jobs. Overall, OSHA believes that thesedisadvantages are minor and will be less evident under full compliancewith the revised standard than with the existing standard because of theadditional flexibility permitted under the former. The primary point of concern registered by smaller contractors dealt withthe possibility of having to have a qualified engineer design cave-in protection.OSHA's <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice on June 16, 1987 asked ``Should OSHA limitall design responsibility to a ``qualified engineer?'' In reponse, severalcommentors suggested this would place a disproportionate impact on smallcontractors. The Underground Contractors Association of Northern Californiastated that:<ITAG tagnum="21">We feel that the most severe impact of this requirement would be onsmall, minority and disadvantaged businesses. From a competitive standpoint,larger firms would hire someone in-house and would integrate the cost intotheir overhead more effectively than the small business who would be requiredto retain a consultant on a very expensive hourly contract rate [29, p.3].</ITAG>As stated earlier, however, employers have several options to choose fromin selecting cave-in protection. The Washington Metropolitan Area ConstructionSafety Association correctly stated, ``With all the options provided, theuse of a [registered professional] engineer should seldom if ever be required''[30]. Other impacts of the revised standard will not create unusual complianceproblems for small firms. The revised standard does not explicitly or implicitlyrequire that small firms have substantial organizational infrastructurefor providing training or other safety-oriented administrative controls.Nearly all compliance can be achieved without a change in normal operatingprocedures. The major compliance issue, cave-in protection, can clearlybe provided by small firms in normal operating circumstances. Similarly, it may be true that the larger excavating firms are less affectedby the requirements than their smaller rivals because the very size ofthe larger firms may have prompted the adoption of companywide constructionpractices that meet or exceed the minimum requirements. It is thereforelikely that the amendments, which serve principally to reduce the costof compliance by increasing the flexibility of the regulations and clarifyingtheir intent, will also benefit smaller firms. Thus, clarifying the standardand explicitly stating the flexibility and choice available to firms willreduce compliance costs to both small and large firms.Some portion of these savings will pass through to the consumers or tothe state and local governments that often are the purchasers of excavationprojects. In sum, economy-wide savings from the revision are estimatedto be $38.0 million. Thus, the overall effect on prices, output. and employmentin the U.S. economy will be small, but favorable. For these reasons, OSHAconcludes that the revised standard is unlikely to have an adverse impacton a significant number of small excavation companies. <ITAG tagnum="81">Additional Impact Measures </ITAG><T3>Impacts on State and Local Governments.</T3> The value of new constructionfinanced by state and local governments totaled approximately $55 billionin 1985 [27, Table S-7]. ERG estimated the incremental compliance costexpenditure on sewer and highway projects at $188 million under the existingstandard. It will be slightly less under the revised standard. This equals0.34 percent of state and local construction investments. <T3>Employment.</T3> The employment impacts of achieving compliance withthe existing or revised standard are dependent upon the general economicimpacts discussed in previous sections. OSHA does not expect significantimpacts for such firms and believes the employment impacts will be negligible.<T3>Foreign Trade.</T3> Changes to the excavation standard or enforcementof full compliance with this standard will not impact U.S. foreign trade.The OSHA standard is applicable to excavation work performed in the U.S.and there is no possibility of substitution to lower cost foreign excavationservices. <ITAG tagnum="81">Environmental Impacts </ITAG>The revisions to subpart P have been reviewed in accordance with the requirementsof the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of 1969 (42 U.S.C. 4231et seq.), the Regulations of the Council on Environmental Quality (CEQ)(40 CFR part 1500), and OSHA's DOL NEPA Procedures (29 CFR part 11). Asa result of this review, the Assistant Secretary for OSHA has determinedthat the amended standard would have no significant environmental impact.Although safety standards rarely influence air, water, or soil quality,plant or animal life, or the use of land or other aspects of the environment,it is appropriate to examine whether the revisions to the OSHA standardon excavation (29 CFR part 1926, subpart P) will alter the environmentexternal to the workplace. Excavation can have significant effects uponlocal environments. For example, erosion, runoff, and similar actions canresult in environmental degradation. These potential impacts can be moreor less severe depending upon how and where the excavation is dug, howlong it is left open, the disposition of the earth that is removed, etc.OSHA has determined, however, that the revisions to subpart P consist primarilyof clarifications in work practices and procedures and are unlikely tohave significant impacts on any of these activities; therefore, these revisionswill have no significant environmental effects. <ITAG tagnum="84">References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. U.S. Department of Commerce. Bureau of the Census. ``1982 Censusof Construction Industries, U.S. Summary''. Washington, DC: GovernmentPrinting Office, December 1984. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Hinze, Jimmie and Carino, Nicholas. ``A Study of Work PracticesEmployed to Protect Workers in Trenches''. Publication No. NBSIR 80-1988,National Bureau of Standards. Washington, DC: U.S. Department of Commerce,March 1980. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Salomone, Lawrence, and Yokel, Felix. ``An Analysis of the Responsesfrom an Associated General Contractors of America (AGC) Survey of Trenchingand Shoring Practices''. Publication No. NBSIR 79-1936. Washington, DC:U.S. Department of Commerce, July 1979. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Cassimatis, P.J. ``Economics of the Construction Industry''. NewYork: National Industrial Conference Board, Inc., 1969. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. ``Eng News Record'': 40, March 8, 1984; 35, May 3, 1984; 40, August16, 1984; 40, September 6, 1984; 55, November 8, 1984; 39, January 3, 1985;14, January 10, 1985; 111, January 24, 1985; 40, January 31, 1985; 50,March 7, 1985; 51, March 14, 1985; 44, March 28, 1985; 45, April 4, 1985;47, April 25, 1985; 39, May 2, 1985; 37, May 9, 1985; 87, May 31, 1985;57, June 27, 1985; 73-74, July 4, 1985. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Pulver, Harvey E. ``Construction Estimates and Costs''. 4th ed.New York, 1969. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Rubert Dunbar. ``Informal Public Hearing In the Matter of ProposedSafety Standards for Excavations In the Construction Industry''. April19, 1988. Washington, DC Docket No. S-204. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. Michael Plank. ``Informal Public Hearing In the Matter of ProposedSafety Standards for Excavations In the Construction Industry''. April19, 1988. Washington, DC, Docket No. S-204. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. U.S. Department of Labor. Occupational Safety and Health Administration.Office of Management Data Systems. Management Information Systems Datafor OSHA fatality reports and associated inspections for 1984-1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. Abramo, Vincent J. ``Case Studies Excavating Trenching and Shoring''.Performed for U.S. Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and HealthAdministration, under Contract No. 41USC252C3. Washington, DC, August 9,1983. (Unpublished). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. Public Health Service.Centers for Disease Control. National Institute for Occupational Safetyand Health. ``Request for Assistance in Preventing Deaths and Injuriesfrom Excavation Cave-ins''. Cincinnati, Ohio: NIOSH, July 1985. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12. U.S. Department of Labor. Bureau of Labor Statistics. ``OccupationalInjuries and Illnesses in the United States by Industry, 1982-6''. Washington,DC: Government Printing Office, 1984-8. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">13. Anthony Suruda, MD. Johns Hopkins University, School of Hygieneand Public Health. Baltimore, MD. ``Epidemiologic Data on Trench and ExcavationFatalities''. Comments received in response to <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice of Wednesday, April 15, 1987. Exhibit4-11, Docket No. S-204. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">14. Suruda, et al. ``Deaths from Trench Cave-in in the ConstructionIndustry''. ``Journal of Occupational Medicine''. Vol. 30, No. 7. July1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">15. U.S. Department of Labor. Occupational Safety and Health Administration.``A Retrospective Look at OSHA's Special Emphasis Program on Trenchingand Excavation''. Docket No. S-204. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">16. Eastern Research Group. ``Economic Impact Analysis of the ProposedRevision to OSHA Subpart P (Section 1926.650-652) Governing Trenching andExcavation Work,'' (Final Report). May 19, 1987. Arlington, MA. DocketS-204. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">17. California Department of Industrial Relations. 1982. Divisionof Labor Statistics and Research. Ditch, Trench, or Excavation Cave-ins''.In ``Work Injuries and Illnesses in California-Quarterly''. IAQ-57. December,1982. pp. 3-4. California Division of Labor Statistics and Research: SanFrancisco, CA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">18. Department of Health and Human Services. National Institute ofOccupational Safety and Health. 1985. ``NIOSH ALERT''. July 1985. DHHSpublication No. 85-110. NIOSH: Cincinnati, OH. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">19. U.S. Department of Labor. Bureau of Labor Statistics. ``Injuriesto Construction Laborers''. Bulletin 2252. March 1986.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">20. Viscusi, W. Kip. Alternative approaches to valuing the healthimpacts of accidents: Liability law and prospective evaluations. ``Lawand Contemp Probl'' 46 (4):49-66, Autumn 1983. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">21. U.S. Department of Labor Occupational Safety and Health Administration.Office of Regulatory Analysis. ``Preliminary Regulatory Impact and RegulatoryFlexibility Assessment of Subpart L_Scaffolds (29 CFR 1926.450 and 1926.460)''.Washington, DC, August 30, 1986. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">22. Building costs remain moderate. ``Eng News Record'' 214(12):92-95,March 21, 1985; and Cost indexes point to rising materials. ``Eng NewsRecord'' 202(12):86-87, March 22, 1979. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">23. U.S. Department of Labor. Labor_Management Services Administration.Office of Construction Industry Services. ``Annual Construction IndustryReport''. Washington, DC: Government Printing Office, April 1980. P. 106.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">24. Breslin, Mark, Comments in response to April 15, 1987 <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice. Exhibit 4-115. Docket No. S-204. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">25. Summers, Bruce G., Comments in response to April 15, 1987 <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice. Exhibit 4-106. Docket No. S-204. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">26. Berty, Melvin, Comments in response to April 15, 1987 <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice. Exhibit 4-109. Docket No. S-204. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">27. Frohmuth, L. Brian. Comments in response to April 15, 1987, <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. Exhibit 4-102. Docket No. S-204. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">28. Mayo, Stephen K. ``Theory and Estimation in the Economics of HousingDemand'', ``Journal of Urban Economics'', 1981, 10, pp. 95-116. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">29. Underground Contractors Association of Northern California. Commentsin response to <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice of April 15, 1987. October 14, 1987. ExhibitNo. 4-115. Docket No. S-204. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">30. Washington Metropolitan Safety Construction Association. Commentsin response to <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice of April 15, 1987. October 12, 1987. ExhbitNo. 4-101. Docket No. S-204. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">31. Levitt, Raymond et al. ``Improving Construction Safety Performance:The User's Role.'' Stanford University. Department of Civil Engineering.Technical Report No. 260. August 1981. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">32. Suarez, L. et. al. 1986. ``Excavation Cave-In Fatalities_Texas,1976-1985.'' ``Morbidity and Mortality Weekly Report''. 35:19. May 16,1986. Centers for Disease Control. Pp. 313-314. U.S Government PrintingOffice. Washington, DC. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">33. Butterfield, Bruce. 1986. ``U.S. Efforts to Compile Data on JobSafety Seen Falling Short'' ``Boston Globe'' November 10, 1986. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">34. Burrough, Bryan, and Lubov, Seth H. ``Credibility Gap_Some ConcernsFudge Their Safety Records to Cut Insurance Costs'' ``Wall Street Journal'',December 2, 1986. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">35. Bureau of Labor Statistics, U.S. Department of Labor. 1987. Informationprovided in response to telephone contracts from ERG. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">36. U.S. Department of Labor. Occupational Safety and Health Administration.Selected Occupational Fatalities Related to Trenching and Excavation asFound in Reports of OSHA Fatality/Catastrophe Investigations. Washington,DC, July 1985. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">V. OMB Approval Under the Paperwork Reduction Act </ITAG>This subpart contains a collection of information in andSection; 1926.652(b)(3) and (4), and (c) (2), (3) and (4). These provisions require employersto maintain a copy of protective systems designs, including tabulated dataand manufacturers data at the worksite and to make these designs or dataavailable to the Secretary. OMB has reviewed these collections and approvedthem through September 30, 1992. The approval number is 1218-0137. Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto average .5 hours per response, including the time for reviewing instructions,searching existing data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed,and completing and reviewing the collection of information. Send commentsregarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of this collection ofinformation, including suggestions for reducing this burden, to the Officeof Information Management, Department of Labor, Room N-1301, 200 ConstitutionAvenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210; and to the Office of Management andBudget Paperwork Reduction Project (1218-0137), Washington, DC 20503. <ITAG tagnum="84">VI. State Plan Standards </ITAG>The 25 states with their own OSHA-approved occupational safety and healthplans must adopt a comparable standard within six months of the publicationdate of the final rule or show OSHA why there is no need for action, e.g.because an existing standard covering this area is already ``at least aseffective'' as the revised federal standard. These states are: Alaska,Arizona, California, Connecticut (for state and local government employeesonly), Hawaii, Indiana, Iowa, Kentucky, Maryland, Michigan, Minnesota,Nevada, New Mexico, New York (for state and local government employeesonly), North Carolina, Oregon, Puerto Rico, South Carolina, Tennessee,Utah, Vermont, Virginia, Virgin Islands, Washington and Wyoming. <ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Federalism </ITAG>The Final Rule has been reviewed in accordance with Executive Order 12612(52 FR 41685; October 30, 1987) regarding Federalism. This Order requiresthat agencies, to the extent possible, refrain from limiting state policyoptions, consult with states prior to taking any actions that would restrictstate policy options, and take such actions only when there is clear constitutionalauthority and the presence of a problem of national scope. The Order providesfor preemption of state law only if there is a clear Congressional intentfor the agency to do so. Any such preemption is to be limited to the extentpossible. Section 18 of the Occupational Safety and Health Act (OSH Act), expressesCongress' clear intent to preempt state laws relating to issues with respectto which Federal OSHA has promulgated occupational safety or health standards.Under the OSH Act; a state can avoid preemption only if it submits, andobtains Federal approval of, a plan for the development of such standardsand their enforcement. Occupational safety and health standards developedby such Plan States must, among other things, be at least as effectivein providing safe and healthful employment and places of employment asthe Federal standards. Where such standards are applicable to productsdistributed or used in interestate commerce, they may not unduly burdencommerce and must be justified by compelling local conditions, <T3>see </T3>section 18(c)(2). The Federal standard on excavations addresses hazards which are not uniqueto any one state or region of the country. Nonetheless, states with occupationalsafety and health plans approved under section 18 of the OSH Act will beable to develop their own state standards to deal with any special problemswhich might be encountered in a particular state. Moreover, because thisstandard is written in general, performance-oriented terms, there is considerableflexibility for state plans to require, and for affect employers to use,methods of compliance which are appropriate to the working conditions coveredby the standard.In brief, this Final Rule addresses a clear national problem related tooccupational safety and health in the construction industry. Those stateswhich have elected to participate under section 18 of the OSH Act are notpreempted this standard, and will be able to address any special conditionswithin the framework of the Federal Act while ensuring that the state standardsare at least as effective as that standard. <ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. Authority </ITAG>This document was prepared under the direction of Gerard F. Scannell, AssistantSecretary of Labor for Occupational Safety and Health, U.S. Departmentof Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210. Accordingly, pursuant to sections 4, 6(b) and 8(c) of the OccupationalSafety and Health Act of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657), section 107 ofthe Contract Work Hours and Safety Standards Act (40 U.S.C. 333), Secretaryof Labor's Order No. 9-83 (48 FR 35736), and 29 CFR part 1911,  part 1926to title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations is amended as set forthbelow.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 29 CFR Part 1926</ITAG>Construction safety, Construction industry, Excavations, Occupational safetyand health, Protective equipment, Safety.<ITAG tagnum="21">Signed at Washington, DC, this 20th day of October, 1989.   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Gerard F. Scannell, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary of Labor. </ITAG>Part 1926 of 29 CFR is amended as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1926_[AMENDED]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart M_[Amended]  </ITAG>1. By revising the authority citation for subpart M of part 1926 to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sec. 107, Contract Work Hours and Safety StandardsAct (Construction Safety Act) (40 U.S.C. 333); Secs. 4, 6, 8, OccupationalSafety and Health Act of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657); Secretary of Labor'sOrder No. 12-71 (36 FR 8754), 8-76 (41 FR 25059), or 9-83 (48 FR 35736),as applicable, and 29 CFR part 1911.</ITAG>2. By revising subpart P of part 1926 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart P_Excavations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1926.650 Scope, application, and definitions applicable to this subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1926.651 General requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1926.652 Requirements for protective systems. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix A to Subpart P_Soil Classification </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix B to Subpart P_Sloping and Benching </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix C to Subpart P_Timber Shoring for Trenches </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix D to Subpart P_Aluminum Hydraulic Shoring for Trenches </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix E to Subpart P_Alternatives to Timber Shoring </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix F to Subpart P_Selection of Protective Systems </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart P_Excavations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 107, Contract Worker Hours and Safety StandardsAct (Construction Safety Act) (40 U.S.C. 333); Secs. 4, 6, 8, OccupationalSafety and Hea1th Act of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657); Secretary of Labor'sOrder No. 12-71 (36 FR 8754), 8-76 (41 FR 25059), or 9-83 (48 FR 35736),as applicable, and 29 CFR part 1911.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1926.650 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope, application, and definitions applicable to this subpart. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Scope and application. </T3>This subpart applies to all open excavationsmade in the earth's surface. Excavations are defined to include trenches. (b) <T3>Definitions applicable to this subpart. </T3><T3>Accepted engineering practices </T3>means those requirements whichare compatible with standards of practice required by a registered professionalengineer. <T3>Aluminum Hydraulic Shoring </T3>means a pre-engineered shoring systemcomprised of aluminum hydraulic cylinders (crossbraces) used in conjunctionwith vertical rails (uprights) or horizontal rails (walers). Such systemis designed, specifically to support the sidewalls of an excavation andprevent cave-ins. <T3>Bell-bottom pier hole </T3>means a type of shaft or footing excavation,the bottom of which is made larger than the cross section above to forma belled shape. <T3>Benching </T3>(Benching system) means a method of protecting employeesfrom cave-ins by excavating the sides of an excavation to form one or aseries of horizontal levels or steps, usually with vertical or near-verticalsurfaces between levels. <T3>Cave-in </T3>means the separation of a mass of soil or rock materialfrom the side of an excavation, or the loss of soil from under a trenchshield or support system, and its sudden movement into the excavation,either by falling or sliding, in sufficient quantity so that it could entrap,bury, or otherwise injure and immobilize a person. <T3>Competent person </T3>means one who is capable of identifying existingand predictable hazards in the surroundings, or working conditions whichare unsanitary, hazardous, or dangerous to employees, and who has authorizationto take prompt corrective measures to eliminate them. <T3>Cross braces </T3>mean the horizontal members of a shoring system installedperpendicular to the sides of the excavation, the ends of which bear againsteither uprights or wales. <T3>Excavation </T3>means any man-made cut, cavity, trench, or depressionin an earth surface, formed by earth removal. <T3>Faces </T3>or <T3>sides</T3> means the vertical or inclined earth surfaces formed asa result of excavation work. <T3>Failure</T3> means the breakage, displacement, or permanent deformationof a structural member or connection so as to reduce its structural integrityand its supportive capabilities. <T3>Hazardous atmosphere</T3> means an atmosphere which by reason of beingexplosive, flammable, poisonous, corrosive, oxidizing, irritating, oxygendeficient, toxic, or otherwise harmful, may cause death, illness, or injury.<T3>Kickout</T3> means the accidental release or failure of a cross brace.<T3>Protective system</T3> means a method of protecting employees fromcave-ins, from material that could fall or roll from an excavation faceor into an excavation, or from the collapse of adjacent structures. Protectivesystems include support systems, sloping and benching systems, shield systems,and other systems that provide the necessary protection.<T3>Ramp</T3> means an inclined walking or working surface that is usedto gain access to one point from another, and is constructed from earthor from structural materials such as steel or wood.<T3>Registered Professional Engineer</T3> means a person who is registeredas a professional engineer in the state where the work is to be performed.However, a professional engineer, registered in any state is deemed tobe a ``registered professional engineer'' within the meaning of this standardwhen approving designs for ``manufactured protective systems'' or ``tabulateddata'' to be used in interstate commerce.<T3>Sheeting</T3> means the members of a shoring system that retain theearth in position and in turn are supported by other members of the shoringsystem.<T3>Shield</T3> (Shield system) means a structure that is able to withstandthe forces imposed on it by a cave-in and thereby protect employees withinthe structure. Shields can be permanent structures or can be designed tobe portable and moved along as work progresses. Additionally, shields canbe either premanufactured or job-built in accordance with andSection; 1926.652(c)(3) or (c)(4). Shields used in trenches are usually referred to as ``trenchboxes'' or ``trench shields.''<T3>Shoring</T3> (Shoring system) means a structure such as a metal hydraulic,mechanical or timber shoring system that supports the sides of an excavationand which is designed to prevent cave-ins.<T3>Sides.</T3> See ``Faces.''<T3>Sloping</T3> (Sloping system) means a method of protecting employeesfrom cave-ins by excavating to form sides of an excavation that are inclinedaway from the excavation so as to prevent cave-ins. The angle of inclinerequired to prevent a cave-in varies with differences in such factors asthe soil type, environmental conditions of exposure, and application ofsurcharge loads. <T3>Stable rock</T3> means natural solid mineral material that can be excavatedwith vertical sides and will remain intact while exposed. Unstable rockis considered to be stable when the rock material on the side or sidesof the excavation is secured against caving-in or movement by rock boltsor by another protective system that has been designed by a registeredprofessional engineer.<T3>Structural ramp </T3>means a ramp built of steel or wood, usually usedfor vehicle access. Ramps made of soil or rock are not considered structuralramps. <T3>Support system</T3> means a structure such as underpinning, bracing,or shoring, which provides support to an adjacent structure, undergroundinstallation, or the sides of an excavation. <T3>Tabulated data</T3> means tables and charts approved by a registeredprofessional engineer and used to design and construct a protective system.<T3>Trench</T3> (Trench excavation) means a narrow excavation (in relationto its length) made below the surface of the ground. In general, the depthis greater than the width, but the width of a trench (measured at the bottom)is not greater than 15 feet (4.6 m). If forms or other structures are installedor constructed in an excavation so as to reduce the dimension measuredfrom the forms or structure to the side of the excavation to 15 feet (4.6m) or less (measured at the bottom of the excavation), the excavation isalso considered to be a trench. <T3>Trench box.</T3> See ``Shield.'' <T3>Trench shield.</T3> See ``Shield.'' <T3>Uprights</T3> means the vertical members of a trench shoring systemplaced in contact with the earth and usually positioned so that individualmembers do not contact each other. Uprights placed so that individual membersare closely spaced, in contact with or interconnected to each other, areoften called ``sheeting.'' <T3>Wales</T3> means horizontal members of a shoring system placed parallelto the excavation face whose sides bear against the vertical members ofthe shoring system or earth. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1926.651 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General requirements. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Surface encumbrances. </T3>All surface encumbrances that are locatedso as to create a hazard to employees shall be removed or supported, asnecessary, to safeguard employees. (b) <T3>Underground installations. </T3>(1) The estimated location of utilityinstallations, such as sewer, telephone, fuel, electric, water lines, orany other underground installations that reasonably may be expected tobe encountered during excavation work, shall be determined prior to openingan excavation. (2) Utility companies or owners shall be contacted within established orcustomary local response times, advised of the proposed work, and askedto establish the location of the utility underground installations priorto the start of actual excavation. When utility companies or owners cannotrespond to a request to locate underground utility installations within24 hours (unless a longer period is required by state or local law), orcannot establish the exact location of these installations, the employermay proceed, provided the employer does so with caution, and provided detectionequipment or other acceptable means to locate utility installations areused.  (3) When excavation operations approach the estimated location of undergroundinstallations, the exact location of the installations shall be determinedby safe and acceptable means. (4) While the excavation is open, underground installations shall be protected,supported or removed as necessary to safeguard employees. (c) <T3>Access and egress</T3>_(1) <T3>Structural ramps. </T3>(i) Structural ramps that are used solely byemployees as a means of access or egress from excavations shall be designedby a competent person. Structural ramps used for access or egress of equipmentshall be designed by a competent person qualified in structural design,and shall be constructed in accordance with the design. (ii) Ramps and runways constructed of two or more structural members shallhave the structural members connected together to prevent displacement.(iii) Structural members used for ramps and runways shall be of uniformthickness. (iv) Cleats or other appropriate means used to connect runway structuralmembers shall be attached to the bottom of the runway or shall be attachedin a manner to prevent tripping. (v) Structural ramps used in lieu of steps shall be provided with cleatsor other surface treatments on the top surface to prevent slipping. (2) <T3>Means of egress from trench excavations. </T3>A stairway, ladder, rampor other safe means of egress shall be located in trench excavations thatare 4 feet (1.22 m) or more in depth so as to require no more than 25 feet(7.62 m) of lateral travel for employees. (d) <T3>Exposure to vehicular traffic. </T3>Employees exposed to public vehiculartraffic shall be provided with, and shall wear, warning vests or othersuitable garments marked with or made of reflectorized or high-visibilitymaterial. (e) <T3>Exposure to falling loads. </T3>No employee shall be permitted underneathloads handled by lifting or digging equipment. Employees shall be requiredto stand away from any vehicle being loaded or unloaded to avoid beingstruck by any spillage or falling materials. Operators may remain in thecabs of vehicles being loaded or unloaded when the vehicles are equipped,in accordance with andSection; 1926.601(b)(6), to provide adequate protectionfor the operator during loading and unloading operations. (f) <T3>Warning system for mobile equipment. </T3>When mobile equipment isoperated adjacent to an excavation, or when such equipment is requiredto approach the edge of an excavation, and the operator does not have aclear and direct view of the edge of the excavation, a warning system shallbe utilized such as barricades, hand or mechanical signals, or stop logs.If possible, the grade should be away from the excavation. (g) <T3>Hazardous atmospheres</T3>_(1) <T3>Testing and controls. </T3>In addition to the requirements set forthin subparts D and E of this part (29 CFR 1926.50-1926.107) to prevent exposureto harmful levels of atmospheric contaminants and to assure acceptableatmospheric conditions, the following requirements shall apply: (i) Where oxygen deficiency (atmospheres containing less than 19.5 percentoxygen) or a hazardous atmosphere exists or could reasonably be expectedto exist, such as in excavations in landfill areas or excavations in areaswhere hazardous substances are stored nearby, the atmospheres in the excavationshall be tested before employees enter excavations greater than 4 feet(1.22 m) in depth. (ii) Adequate precautions shall be taken to prevent employee exposure toatmospheres containing less than 19.5 percent oxygen and other hazardousatmospheres. These precautions include providing proper respiratory protectionor ventilation in accordance with subparts D and E of this part respectively.(iii) Adequate precaution shall be taken such as providing ventilation,to prevent employee exposure to an atmosphere containing a concentrationof a flammable gas in excess of 20 percent of the lower flammable limitof the gas. (iv) When controls are used that are intended to reduce the level of atmosphericcontaminants to acceptable levels, testing shall be conducted as oftenas necessary to ensure that the atmosphere remains safe. (2) <T3>Emergency rescue equipment.</T3> (i) Emergency rescue equipment, suchas breathing apparatus, a safety harness and line, or a basket stretcher,shall be readily available where hazardous atmospheric conditions existor may reasonably be expected to develop during work in an excavation.This equipment shall be attended when in use. (ii) Employees entering bell-bottom pier holes, or other similar deep andconfined footing excavations, shall wear a harness with a life-line securelyattached to it. The lifeline shall be separate from any line used to handlematerials, and shall be individually attended at all times while the employeewearing the lifeline is in the excavation. (h) <T3>Protection from hazards associated with water accumulation.</T3> (1)Employees shall not work in excavations in which there is accumulated water,or in excavations in which water is accumulating, unless adequate precautionshave been taken to protect employees against the hazards posed by wateraccumulation. The precautions necessary to protect employees adequatelyvary with each situation, but could include special support or shield systemsto protect from cave-ins, water removal to control the level of accumulatingwater, or use of a safety harness and lifeline. (2) If water is controlled or prevented from accumulating by the use ofwater removal equipment, the water removal equipment and operations shallbe monitored by a competent person to ensure proper operation. (3) If excavation work interrupts the natural drainage of surface water(such as streams), diversion ditches, dikes, or other suitable means shallbe used to prevent surface water from entering the excavation and to provideadequate drainage of the area adjacent to the excavation. Excavations subjectto runoff from heavy rains will require an inspection by a competent personand compliance with paragraphs (h)(1) and (h)(2) of this section. (i) <T3>Stability of adjacent structures.</T3> (1) Where the stability of adjoiningbuildings, walls, or other structures is endangered by excavation operations,support systems such as shoring, bracing, or underpinning shall be providedto ensure the stability of such structures for the protection of employees.(2) Excavation below the level of the base or footing of any foundationor retaining wall that could be reasonably expected to pose a hazard toemployees shall not be permitted except when: (i) A support system, such as underpinning, is provided to ensure the safetyof employees and the stability of the structure; or (ii) The excavation is in stable rock; or (iii) A registered professional engineer has approved the determinationthat the structure is sufficently removed from the excavation so as tobe unaffected by the excavation activity; or (iv) A registered professional engineer has approved the determinationthat such excavation work will not pose a hazard to employees. (3) Sidewalks, pavements, and appurtenant structure shall not be underminedunless a support system or another method of protection is provided toprotect employees from the possible collapse of such structures. (j) <T3>Protection of emplovees from loose rock or soil.</T3> (1) Adequateprotection shall be provided to protect employees from loose rock or soilthat could pose a hazard by falling or rolling from an excavation face.Such protection shall consist of scaling to remove loose material; installationof protective barricades at intervals as necessary on the face to stopand contain falling material; or other means that provide equivalent protection.(2) Employees shall be protected from excavated or other materials or equipmentthat could pose a hazard by falling or rolling into excavations. Protectionshall be provided by placing and keeping such materials or equipment atleast 2 feet (.61 m) from the edge of excavations, or by the use of retainingdevices that are sufficient to prevent materials or equipment from fallingor rolling into excavations, or by a combination of both if necessary.(k) <T3>Inspections.</T3> (1) Daily inspections of excavations, the adjacentareas, and protective systems shall be made by a competent person for evidenceof a situation that could result in possible cave-ins, indications of failureof protective systems, hazardous atmospheres, or other hazardous conditions.An inspection shall be conducted by the competent person prior to the startof work and as needed throughout the shift. Inspections shall also be madeafter every rainstorm or other hazard increasing occurrence. These inspectionsare only required when employee exposure can be reasonably anticipated.(2) Where the competent person finds evidence of a situation that couldresult in a possible cave-in, indications of failure of protective systems,hazardous atmospheres, or other hazardous conditions, exposed employeesshall be removed from the hazardous area until the necessary precautionshave been taken to ensure their safety. (l) <T3>Fall protection.</T3> (1) Where employees or equipment are requiredor permitted to cross over excavations, walkways or bridges with standardguardrails shall be provided. (2) Adequate barrier physical protection shall be provided at all remotelylocated excavations. All wells, pits, shafts, etc., shall be barricadedor covered. Upon completion of exploration and similar operations, temporarywells, pits, shafts, etc., shall be backfilled. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1926.652</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for protective systems. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Protection of employees in excavations.</T3> (1) Each employee in anexcavation shall be protected from cave-ins by an adequate protective systemdesigned in accordance with paragraph (b) or (c) of this section exceptwhen: (i) Excavations are made entirely in stable rock; or (ii) Excavations are less than 5 feet (1.52m) in depth and examinationof the ground by a competent person provides no indication of a potentialcave-in. (2) Protective systems shall have the capacity to resist without failureall loads that are intended or could reasonably be expected to be appliedor transmitted to the system. (b) <T3>Design of sloping and benching systems.</T3> The slopes and configurationsof sloping and benching systems shall be selected and constructed by theemployer or his designee and shall be in accordance with the requirementsof paragraph (b)(1); or, in the alternative, paragraph (b)(2); or, in thealternative, paragraph (b)(3), or, in the alternative, paragraph (b)(4),as follows: (1) <T3>Option (1)_Allowable configurations and slopes.</T3> (i) Excavationsshall be sloped at an angle not steeper than one and one-half horizontalto one vertical (34 degrees measured from the horizontal), unless the employeruses one of the other options listed below. (ii) Slopes specified in paragraph (b)(1)(i) of this section, shall beexcavated to form configurations that are in accordance with the slopesshown for Type C soil in Appendix B to this subpart. (2) <T3>Option (2)_Determination of slopes and configurations using AppendicesA and B.</T3> Maximum allowable slopes, and allowable configurations forsloping and benching systems, shall be determined in accordance with theconditions and requirements set forth in appendices A and B to this subpart.(3) <T3>Option (3)_Designs using other tabulated data.</T3> (i) Designs ofsloping or benching systems shall be selected from and be in accordancewith tabulated data, such as tables and charts. (ii) The tabulated data shall be in written form and shall include allof the following: (A) Identification of the parameters that affect the selection of a slopingor benching system drawn from such data; (B) Identification of the limits of use of the data, to include the magnitudeand configuration of slopes determined to be safe; (C) Explanatory information as may be necessary to aid the user in makinga correct selection of a protective system from the data. (iii) At least one copy of the tabulated data which identifies the registeredprofessional engineer who approved the data, shall be maintained at thejobsite during construction of the protective system. After that time thedata may be stored off the jobsite, but a copy of the data shall be madeavailable to the Secretary upon request. (4) <T3>Option (4)_Design by a registered professional engineer.</T3> (i) Slopingand benching systems not utilizing Option (1) or Option (2) or Option (3)under paragraph (b) of this section shall be approved by a registered professionalengineer.(ii) Designs shall be in written form and shall include at least the following:(A) The magnitude of the slopes that were determined to be safe for theparticular project; (B) The configurations that were determined to be safe for the particularproject; and (C) The identity of the registered professional engineer approving thedesign. (iii) At least one copy of the design shall be maintained at the jobsitewhile the slope is being constructed. After that time the design need notbe at the jobsite, but a copy shall be made available to the Secretaryupon request. (c) <T3>Design of support systems, shield systems, and other protective systems.</T3>Designs of support systems shield systems, and other protective systemsshall be selected and constructed by the employer or his designee and shallbe in accordance with the requirements of paragraph (c)(1); or, in thealternative, paragraph (c)(2); or, in the alternative, paragraph (c)(3);or, in the alternative, paragraph (c)(4) as follows: (1) <T3>Option (1)_Designs using appendices A, C and D.</T3> Designs for timbershoring in trenches shall be determined in accordance with the conditionsand requirements set forth in appendices A and C to this subpart. Designsfor aluminum hydraulic shoring shall be in accordance with paragraph (c)(2)of this section, but if manufacturer's tabulated data cannot be utilized,designs shall be in accordance with appendix D. (2) <T3>Option (2)_Designs Using Manufacturer's Tabulated Data.</T3> (i) Designof support systems, shield systems, or other protective systems that aredrawn from manufacturer's tabulated data shall be in accordance with allspecifications, recommendations, and limitations issued or made by themanufacturer. (ii) Deviation from the specifications, recommendations, and limitationsissued or made by the manufacturer shall only be allowed after the manufacturerissues specific written approval. (iii) Manufacturer's specifications, recommendations, and limitations,and manufacturer's approval to deviate from the specifications, recommendations,and limitations shall be in written form at the jobsite during constructionof the protective system. After that time this data may be stored off thejobsite, but a copy shall be made available to the Secretary upon request.(3) <T3>Option (3)_Designs using other tabulated data.</T3> (i) Designs ofsupport systems, shield systems, or other protective systems shall be selectedfrom and be in accordance with tabulated data, such as tables and charts.(ii) The tabulated data shall be in written form and include all of thefollowing: (A) Identification of the parameters that affect the selection of a protectivesystem drawn from such data; (B) Identification of the limits of use of the data; (C) Explanatory information as may be necessary to aid the user in makinga correct selection of a protective system from the data. (iii) At least one copy of the tabulated data, which identifies the registeredprofessional engineer who approved the data, shall be maintained at thejobsite during construction of the protective system. After that time thedata may be stored off the jobsite, but a copy of the data shall be madeavailable to the Secretary upon request. (4) <T3>Option (4)_Design by a registered professional engineer.</T3> (i) Supportsystems, shield systems, and other protective systems not utilizing Option1, Option 2 or Option 3, above, shall be approved by a registered professionalengineer. (ii) Designs shall be in written form and shall include the following:(A) A plan indicating the sizes, types, and configurations of the materialsto be used in the protective system; and (B) The identity of the registered professional engineer approving thedesign. (iii) At least one copy of the design shall be maintained at the jobsiteduring construction of the protective system. After that time, the designmay be stored off the jobsite, but a copy of the design shall be made availableto the Secretary upon request. (d) <T3>Materials and equipment.</T3> (1) Materials and equipment used forprotective systems shall be free from damage or defects that might impairtheir proper function. (2) Manufactured materials and equipment used for protective systems shallbe used and maintained in a manner that is consistent with the recommendationsof the manufacturer, and in a manner that will prevent employee exposureto hazards. (3) When material or equipment that is used for protective systems is damaged,a competent person shall examine the material or equipment and evaluateits suitability for continued use. If the competent person cannot assurethe material or equipment is able to support the intended loads or is otherwisesuitable for safe use, then such material or equipment shall be removedfrom service, and shall be evaluated and approved by a registered professionalengineer before being returned to service. (e) <T3>Installation and removal of support</T3>_(1) <T3>General.</T3> (i) Members of support systems shall be securely connectedtogether to prevent sliding, falling, kickouts, or other predictable failure.(ii) Support systems shall be installed and removed in a manner that protectsemployees from cave-ins, structural collapses, or from being struck bymembers of the support system. (iii) Individual members of support systems shall not be subjected to loadsexceeding those which those members were designed to withstand. (iv) Before temporary removal of individual members begins, additionalprecautions shall be taken to ensure the safety of employees, such as installingother structural members to carry the loads imposed on the support system.(v) Removal shall begin at, and progress from, the bottom of the excavation.Members shall be released slowly so as to note any indication of possiblefailure of the remaining members of the structure or possible cave-in ofthe sides of the excavation. (vi) Backfilling shall progress together with the removal of support systemsfrom excavations.(2) <T3>Additional requirements for support systems for trench excavations.</T3>(i) Excavation of material to a level no greater than 2 feet (.61 m) belowthe bottom of the members of a support system shall be permitted, but onlyif the system is designed to resist the forces calculated for the fulldepth of the trench, and there are no indications while the trench is openof a possible loss of soil from behind or below the bottom of the supportsystem. (ii) Installation of a support system shall be closely coordinated withthe excavation of trenches. (f) <T3>Sloping and benching systems.</T3> Employees shall not be permittedto work on the faces of sloped or benched excavations at levels above otheremployees except when employees at the lower levels are adequately protectedfrom the hazard of falling, rolling, or sliding material or equipment.(g) <T3>Shield systems_</T3>(1) <T3>General.</T3> (i) Shield systems shall not be subjected to loads exceedingthose which the system was designed to withstand. (ii) Shields shall be installed in a manner to restrict lateral or otherhazardous movement of the shield in the event of the application of suddenlateral loads. (iii) Employees shall be protected from the hazard of cave-ins when enteringor exiting the areas protected by shields. (iv) Employees shall not be allowed in shields when shields are being installed,removed, or moved vertically. (2) <T3>Additional requirement for shield systems used in trench excavations.</T3>Excavations of earth material to a level not greater than 2 feet (.61 m)below the bottom of a shield shall be permitted, but only if the shieldis designed to resist the forces calculated for the full depth of the trench,and there are no indications while the trench is open of a possible lossof soil from behind or below the bottom of the shield. <ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix A to Subpart P </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Soil Classification </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) <T3>Scope and application_</T3>(1) <T3>Scope.</T3> This appendix describes a method of classifying soil androck deposits based on site and environmental conditions, and on the structureand composition of the earth deposits. The appendix contains definitions,sets forth requirements, and describes acceptable visual and manual testsfor use in classifying soils. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Application.</T3> This appendix applies when a sloping or benchingsystem is designed in accordance with the requirements set forth in andSection;1926.652(b)(2) as a method of protection for employees from cave-ins. Thisappendix also applies when timber shoring for excavations is designed asa method of protection from cave-ins in accordance with appendix C to subpartP of part 1926, and when aluminum hydraulic shoring is designed in accordancewith appendix D. This Appendix also applies if other protective systemsare designed and selected for use from data prepared in accordance withthe requirements set forth in andSection; 1926.652(c), and the use of thedata is predicated on the use of the soil classification system set forthin this appendix. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) <T3>Definitions.</T3> The definitions and examples given below are basedon, in whole or in part, the following: American Society for Testing Materials(ASTM) Standards D653-85 and D2488; The Unified Soils Classification System,The U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA) Textural Classification Scheme;and The National Bureau of Standards Report BSS-121. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Cemented soil</T3> means a soil in which the particles are held togetherby a chemical agent, such as calcium carbonate, such that a hand-size samplecannot be crushed into powder or individual soil particles by finger pressure.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Cohesive soil</T3> means clay (fine grained soil), or soil with a highclay content, which has cohesive strength. Cohesive soil does not crumble,can be excavated with vertical sideslopes, and is plastic when moist. Cohesivesoil is hard to break up when dry, and exhibits significant cohesion whensubmerged. Cohesive soils include clayey silt, sandy clay, silty clay,clay and organic clay. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Dry soil</T3> means soil that does not exhibit visible signs of moisturecontent. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Fissured</T3> means a soil material that has a tendency to break alongdefinite planes of fracture with little resistance, or a material thatexhibits open cracks, such as tension cracks, in an exposed surface.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Granular soil </T3>means gravel, sand, or silt, (coarse grained soil)with little or no clay content. Granular soil has no cohesive strength.Some moist granular soils exhibit apparent cohesion. Granular soil cannotbe molded when moist and crumbles easily when dry. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Layered system </T3>means two or more distinctly different soil orrock types arranged in layers. Micaceous seams or weakened planes in rockor shale are considered layered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Moist soil </T3>means a condition in which a soil looks and feels damp.Moist cohesive soil can easily be shaped into a ball and rolled into smalldiameter threads before crumbling. Moist granular soil that contains somecohesive material will exhibit signs of cohesion between particles. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Plastic </T3>means a property of a soil which allows the soil to bedeformed or molded without cracking, or appreciable volume change. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Saturated soil </T3>means a soil in which the voids are filled withwater. Saturation does not require flow. Saturation, or near saturation,is necessary for the proper use of instruments such as a pocket penetrometeror sheer vane. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Soil classification system </T3>means, for the purpose of this subpart,a method of categorizing soil and rock deposits in a hierarchy of StableRock, Type A, Type B, and Type C, in decreasing order of stability. Thecategories are determined based on an analysis of the properties and performancecharacteristics of the deposits and the environmental conditions of exposure.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Stable rock </T3>means natural solid mineral matter that can be excavatedwith vertical sides and remain intact while exposed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Submerged soil </T3>means soil which is underwater or is free seeping.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Type A </T3>means cohesive soils with an unconfined compressive strengthof 1.5 ton per square foot (tsf) (144 kPa) or greater. Examples of cohesivesoils are: clay, silty clay, sandy clay, clay loam and, in some cases,silty clay loam and sandy clay loam. Cemented soils such as caliche andhardpan are also considered Type A. However, no soil is Type A if: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) The soil is fissured; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The soil is subject to vibration from heavy traffic, pile driving,or similar effects; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) The soil has been previously disturbed; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) The soil is part of a sloped, layered system where the layersdip into the excavation on a slope of four horizontal to one vertical (4H:1V)or greater; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) The material is subject to other factors that would require itto be classified as a less stable material. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Type B </T3>means: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Cohesive soil with an unconfined compressive strength greaterthan 0.5 tsf (48 kPa) but less than 1.5 tsf (144 kPa); or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Granular cohesionless soils including: angular gravel (similarto crushed rock), silt, silt loam, sandy loam and, in some cases, siltyclay loam and sandy clay loam. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Previously disturbed soils except those which would otherwisebe classed as Type C soil. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Soil that meets the unconfined compressive strength or cementationrequirements for Type A, but is fissured or subject to vibration; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Dry rock that is not stable; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vi) Material that is part of a sloped, layered system where the layersdip into the excavation on a slope less steep than four horizontal to onevertical (4H:1V), but only if the material would otherwise be classifiedas Type B. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Type C </T3>means: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Cohesive soil with an unconfined compressive strength of 0.5 tsf(48 kPa) or less; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Granular soils including gravel, sand, and loamy sand; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Submerged soil or soil from which water is freely seeping; or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Submerged rock that is not stable, or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Material in a sloped, layered system where the layers dip intothe excavation or a slope of four horizontal to one vertical (4H:1V) orsteeper. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Unconfined compressive strength </T3>means the load per unit area atwhich a soil will fail in compression. It can be determined by laboratorytesting, or estimated in the field using a pocket penetrometer, by thumbpenetration tests, and other methods. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Wet soil </T3>means soil that contains significantly more moisturethan moist soil, but in such a range of values that cohesive material willslump or begin to flow when vibrated. Granular material that would exhibitcohesive properties when moist will lose those cohesive properties whenwet. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) <T3>Requirements</T3>_(1) <T3>Classification of soil and rock deposits. </T3>Each soil and rock depositshall be classified by a competent person as Stable Rock, Type A, TypeB, or Type C in accordance with the definitions set forth in paragraph(b) of this appendix. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Basis of classification. </T3>The classification of the deposits shallbe made based on the results of at least one visual and at least one manualanalysis. Such analyses shall be conducted by a competent person usingtests described in paragraph (d) below, or in other recognized methodsof soil classification and testing such as those adopted by the AmericaSociety for Testing Materials, or the U.S. Department of Agriculture texturalclassification system. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) <T3>Visual and manual analyses. </T3>The visual and manual analyses, suchas those noted as being acceptable in paragraph (d) of this appendix, shallbe designed and conducted to provide sufficient quantitative and qualitativeinformation as may be necessary to identify properly the properties, factors,and conditions affecting the classification of the deposits. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) <T3>Layered systems. </T3>In a layered system, the system shall be classifiedin accordance with its weakest layer. However, each layer may be classifiedindividually where a more stable layer lies under a less stable layer.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) <T3>Reclassification.</T3> If, after classifying a deposit, the properties,factors, or conditions affecting its classification change in any way,the changes shall be evaluated by a competent person. The deposit shallbe reclassified as necessary to reflect the changed circumstances. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) <T3>Acceptable visual and manual tests._</T3>(1) <T3>Visual tests.</T3> Visual analysis is conducted to determine qualitativeinformation regarding the excavation site in general, the soil adjacentto the excavation, the soil forming the sides of the open excavation, andthe soil taken as samples from excavated material. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Observe samples of soil that are excavated and soil in the sidesof the excavation. Estimate the range of particle sizes and the relativeamounts of the particle sizes. Soil that is primarily composed of fine-grainedmaterial is cohesive material. Soil composed primarily of coarse-grainedsand or gravel is granular material. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Observe soil as it is excavated. Soil that remains in clumpswhen excavated is cohesive. Soil that breaks up easily and does not stayin clumps is granular. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Observe the side of the opened excavation and the surface areaadjacent to the excavation. Crack-like openings such as tension crackscould indicate fissured material. If chunks of soil spall off a verticalside, the soil could be fissured. Small spalls are evidence of moving groundand are indications of potentially hazardous situations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Observe the area adjacent to the excavation and the excavationitself for evidence of existing utility and other underground structures,and to identify previously disturbed soil. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Observe the opened side of the excavation to identify layeredsystems. Examine layered systems to identify if the layers slope towardthe excavation. Estimate the degree of slope of the layers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vi) Observe the area adjacent to the excavation and the sides ofthe opened excavation for evidence of surface water, water seeping fromthe sides of the excavation, or the location of the level of the watertable. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vii) Observe the area adjacent to the excavation and the area withinthe excavation for sources of vibration that may affect the stability ofthe excavation face. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Manual tests.</T3> Manual analysis of soil samples is conducted todetermine quantitative as well as qualitative properties of soil and toprovide more information in order to classify soil properly. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) <T3>Plasticity.</T3> Mold a moist or wet sample of soil into a ball andattempt to roll it into threads as thin as \1/8\-inch in diameter. Cohesivematerial can be successfully rolled into threads without crumbling. Forexample, if at least a two inch (50 mm) length of \1/8\-inch thread canbe held on one end without tearing, the soil is cohesive. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Dry strength.</T3> If the soil is dry and crumbles on its own or withmoderate pressure into individual grains or fine powder, it is granular(any combination of gravel, sand, or silt). If the soil is dry and fallsinto clumps which break up into smaller clumps, but the smaller clumpscan only be broken up with difficulty, it may be clay in any combinationwith gravel, sand or silt. If the dry soil breaks into clumps which donot break up into small clumps and which can only be broken with difficulty,and there is no visual indication the soil is fissured, the soil may beconsidered unfissured. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) <T3>Thumb penetration.</T3> The thumb penetration test can be used to estimatethe unconfined compressive strength of cohesive soils. (This test is basedon the thumb penetration test described in American Society for Testingand Materials (ASTM) Standard designation D2488_``Standard RecommendedPractice for Description of Soils (Visual_Manual Procedure).'') Type Asoils with an unconfined compressive strength of 1.5 tsf can be readilyindented by the thumb; however, they can be penetrated by the thumb onlywith very great effort. Type C soils with an unconfined compressive strengthof 0.5 tsf can be easily penetrated several inches by the thumb, and canbe molded by light finger pressure. This test should be conducted on anundisturbed soil sample, such as a large clump of spoil, as soon as practicableafter excavation to keep to a miminum the effects of exposure to dryinginfluences. If the excavation is later exposed to wetting influences (rain,flooding), the classification of the soil must be changed accordingly.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) <T3>Other strength tests.</T3> Estimates of unconfined compressive strengthof soils can also be obtained by use of a pocket penetrometer or by usinga hand-operated shearvane. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) <T3>Drying test.</T3> The basic purpose of the drying test is to differentiatebetween cohesive material with fissures, unfissured cohesive material,and granular material. The procedure for the drying test involves dryinga sample of soil that is approximately one inch thick (2.54 cm) and sixinches (15.24 cm) in diameter until it is thoroughly dry: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) If the sample develops cracks as it dries, significant fissuresare indicated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Samples that dry without cracking are to be broken by hand. Ifconsiderable force is necessary to break a sample, the soil has significantcohesive material content. The soil can be classified as a unfissured cohesivematerial and the unconfined compressive strength should be determined.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) If a sample breaks easily by hand, it is either a fissured cohesivematerial or a granular material. To distinguish between the two, pulverizethe dried clumps of the sample by hand or by stepping on them. If the clumpsdo not pulverize easily, the material is cohesive with fissures. If theypulverize easily into very small fragments, the material is granular.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix B to Subpart P </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Sloping and Benching </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) <T3>Scope and application. </T3>This appendix contains specifications forsloping and benching when used as methods of protecting employees workingin excavations from cave-ins. The requirements of this appendix apply whenthe design of sloping and benching protective systems is to be performedin accordance with the requirements set forth in andSection; 1926.652(b)(2).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) <T3>Definitions. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Actual slope </T3>means the slope to which an excavation face is excavated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Distress </T3>means that the soil is in a condition where a cave-inis imminent or is likely to occur. Distress is evidenced by such phenomenaas the development of fissures in the face of or adjacent to an open excavation;the subsidence of the edge of an excavation; the slumping of material fromthe face or the bulging or heaving of material from the bottom of an excavation;the spalling of material from the face of an excavation; and ravelling,i.e., small amounts of material such as pebbles or little clumps of materialsuddenly separating from the face of an excavation and trickling or rollingdown into the excavation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Maximum allowable slope </T3>means the steepest incline of an excavationface that is acceptable for the most favorable site conditions as protectionagainst cave-ins, and is expressed as the ratio of horizontal distanceto vertical rise (H:V). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Short term exposure </T3>means a period of time less than or equalto 24 hours that an excavation is open. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) <T3>Requirements_</T3>(1) <T3>Soil classification. </T3>Soil and rock deposits shall be classifiedin accordance with appendix A to subpart P of part 1926. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Maximum allowable slope. </T3>The maximum allowable slope for a soilor rock deposit shall be determined from Table B-1 of this appendix. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) <T3>Actual slope. </T3>(i) The actual slope shall not be steeper than themaximum allowable slope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The actual slope shall be less steep than the maximum allowableslope, when there are signs of distress. If that situation occurs, theslope shall be cut back to an actual slope which is at least \1/2\ horizontalto one vertical (\1/2\H:1V) less steep than the maximum allowable slope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) When surcharge loads from stored material or equipment, operatingequipment, or traffic are present, a competent person shall determine thedegree to which the actual slope must be reduced below the maximum allowableslope, and shall assure that such reduction is achieved. Surcharge loadsfrom adjacent structures shall be evaluated in accordance with andSection;1926.651(i). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) <T3>Configurations. </T3>Configurations of sloping and benching systemsshall be in accordance with Figure B-1.<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illus. 391</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Figure B-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Slope Configurations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(All slopes stated below are in the horizontal to vertical ratio)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">B-1.1 Excavations made in Type A soil.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. All simple slope excavation 20 feet or less in depth shall havea maximum allowable slope of \3/4\:1.<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 392A</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Simple Slope_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Exception: Simple slope excavations which are open 24 hours or less(short term) and which are 12 feet or less in depth shall have a maximumallowable slope of \1/2\:1.<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 392B</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Simple Slope_Short Term</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. All benched excavations 20 feet or less in depth shall have a maximumallowable slope of \3/4\ to 1 and maximum bench dimensions as follows:<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 393A</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Simple Bench<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 393B</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Multiple Bench</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. All excavations 8 feet or less in depth which have unsupportedvertically sided lower portions shall have a maximum vertical side of 3\1/2\feet.<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 394A</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Unsupported Vertically Sided Lower Portion_Maximum 8 Feet in Depth</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">All excavations more than 8 feet but not more than 12 feet in depthwhich unsupported vertically sided lower portions shall have a maximumallowable slope of 1:1 and a maximum vertical side of 3\1/2\ feet.<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 394B</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Unsupported Vertically Sided Lower Portion_Maximum 12 Feet in Depth</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">All excavations 20 feet or less in depth which have vertically sidedlower portions that are supported or shielded shall have a maximum allowableslope of \3/4\:1. The support or shield system must extend at least 18inches above the top of the vertical side.<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 395</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Suported or Shielded Vertically Sided Lower Portion</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. All other simple slope, compound slope, and vertically sided lowerportion excavations shall be in accordance with the other options permittedunder andSection; 1926.652(b).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">B-1.2 Excavations Made in Type B Soil</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. All simple slope excavations 20 feet or less in depth shall havea maximum allowable slope of 1:1.<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 396A</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Simple Slope</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. All benched excavations 20 feet or less in depth shall have a maximumallowable slope of 1:1 and maximum bench dimensions as follows:<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 396B</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Single Bench <G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 397A</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Multiple Bench </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. All excavations 20 feet or less in depth which have verticallysided lower portions shall be shielded or supported to a height at least18 inches above the top of the vertical side. All such excavations shallhave a maximum allowable slope of 1:1.<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 397B</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Vertically Sided Lower Portion</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. All other sloped excavations shall be in accordance with the otheroptions permitted in andSection; 1926.652(b).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">B-1.3 Excavations Made in Type C Soil</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. All simple slope excavations 20 feet or less in depth shall havea maximum allowable slope of 1\1/2\:1.<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 398A</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Simple Slope</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. All excavations 20 feet or less in depth which have verticallysided lower portions shall be shielded or supported to a height at least18 inches above the top of the vertical side. All such excavations shallhave a maximum allowable slope of 1\1/2\:1.<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 398B</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Vertical Sided Lower Portion</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. All other sloped excavations shall be in accordance with the otheroptions permitted in andSection; 1926.652(b).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">B-1.4 Excavations Made in Layered Soils</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. All excavations 20 feet or less in depth made in layered soilsshall have a maximum allowable slope for each layer as set forth below.<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 399</ITAG><G/><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 400</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. All other sloped excavations shall be in accordance with the otheroptions permitted in andSection; 1926.652(b).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix C to Subpart P </ITAG>Timber Shoring for Trenches <ITAG tagnum="21">(a) <T3>Scope. </T3>This appendix contains information that can be used timbershoring is provided as a method of protection from cave-ins in trenchesthat do not exceed 20 feet (6.1 m) in depth. This appendix must be usedwhen design of timber shoring protective systems is to be performed inaccordance with andSection; 1926.652(c)(1). Other timber shoring configurations;other systems of support such as hydraulic and pneumatic systems; and otherprotective systems such as sloping, benching, shielding, and freezing systemsmust be designed in accordance with the requirements set forth in andSection;1926.652(b) and andSection; 1926.652(c). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) <T3>Soil Classification. </T3>In order to use the data presented in thisappendix, the soil type or types in which the excavation is made must firstbe determined using the soil classification method set forth in appendixA of subpart P of this part. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) <T3>Presentation of Information. </T3>Information is presented in severalforms as follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Information is presented in tabular form in Tables C-1.1, C-1.2,and C-1.3, and Tables C-2.1, C-2.2 and C-2.3 following paragraph (g) ofthe appendix. Each table presents the minimum sizes of timber members touse in a shoring system, and each table contains data only for the particularsoil type in which the excavation or portion of the excavation is made.The data are arranged to allow the user the flexibility to select fromamong several acceptable configurations of members based on varying thehorizontal spacing of the crossbraces. Stable rock is exempt from shoringrequirements and therefore, no data are presented for this condition. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Information concerning the basis of the tabular data and the limitationsof the data is presented in paragraph (d) of this appendix, and on thetables themselves. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Information explaining the use of the tabular data is presentedin paragraph (e) of this appendix. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Information illustrating the use of the tabular data is presentedin paragraph (f) of this appendix. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Miscellaneous notations regarding Tables C-1.1 through C-1.3 andTables C-2.1 through C-2.3 are presented in paragraph (g) of this Appendix.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) <T3>Basis and limitations of the data</T3>._(1) <T3>Dimensions of timber members</T3>. (i) The sizes of the timber memberslisted in Tables C-1.1 through C-1.3 are taken from the National Bureauof Standards (NBS) report, ``Recommended Technical Provisions for ConstructionPractice in Shoring and Sloping of Trenches and Excavations.'' In addition,where NBS did not recommend specific sizes of members, member sizes arebased on an analysis of the sizes required for use by existing codes andon empirical practice. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The required dimensions of the members listed in Tables C-1.1through C-1.3 refer to actual dimensions and not nominal dimensions ofthe timber. Employers wanting to use nominal size shoring are directedto Tables C-2.1 through C-2.3, or have this choice under andSection; 1926.652(c)(3),and are referred to The Corps of Engineers, The Bureau of Reclamation ordata from other acceptable sources. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Limitation of application. </T3>(i) It is not intended that the timbershoring specification apply to every situation that may be experiencedin the field. These data were developed to apply to the situations thatare most commonly experienced in current trenching practice. Shoring systemsfor use in situations that are not covered by the data in this appendixmust be designed as specified in andSection; 1926.652(c). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) When any of the following conditions are present, the membersspecified in the tables are not considered adequate. Either an alternatetimber shoring system must be designed or another type of protective systemdesigned in accordance with andSection; 1926.652. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) When loads imposed by structures or by stored material adjacentto the trench weigh in excess of the load imposed by a two-foot soil surcharge.The term ``adjacent'' as used here means the area within a horizontal distancefrom the edge of the trench equal to the depth of the trench. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) When vertical loads imposed on cross braces exceed a 240-poundgravity load distributed on a one-foot section of the center of the crossbrace.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) When surcharge loads are present from equipment weighing in excessof 20,000 pounds. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(D) When only the lower portion of a trench is shored and the remainingportion of the trench is sloped or benched unless: The sloped portion issloped at an angle less steep than three horizontal to one vertical; orthe members are selected from the tables for use at a depth which is determinedfrom the top of the overall trench, and not from the toe of the slopedportion. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) <T3>Use of Tables. </T3>The members of the shoring system that are to beselected using this information are the cross braces, the uprights, andthe wales, where wales are required. Minimum sizes of members are specifiedfor use in different types of soil. There are six tables of information,two for each soil type. The soil type must first be determined in accordancewith the soil classification system described in appendix A to subpartP of part 1926. Using the appropriate table, the selection of the sizeand spacing of the members is then made. The selection is based on thedepth and width of the trench where the members are to be installed and,in most instances, the selection is also based on the horizontal spacingof the crossbraces. Instances where a choice of horizontal spacing of crossbracingis available, the horizontal spacing of the crossbraces must be chosenby the user before the size of any member can be determined. When the soiltype, the width and depth of the trench, and the horizontal spacing ofthe crossbraces are known, the size and vertical spacing of the crossbraces,the size and vertical spacing of the wales, and the size and horizontalspacing of the uprights can be read from the appropriate table. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) <T3>Examples to Illustrate the Use of Tables C-1.1 through C-1.3. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) <T3>Example 1. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A trench dug in Type A soil is 13 feet deep and five feet wide.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">From <T3>Table C-1.1, </T3>for acceptable arrangements of timber can be used.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Arrangement andplusmin;1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 4andmultiply;4 crossbraces at six feet horizontally and four feetvertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Wales are not required. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 3andmultiply;8 uprights at six feet horizontally. This arrangementis commonly called ``skip shoring.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Arrangement andplusmin;2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 4andmultiply;6 crossbraces at eight feet horizontally and fourfeet vertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 8andmultiply;8 wales at four feet vertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 2andmultiply;6 uprights at four feet horizontally. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Arrangement andplusmin;3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 6andmultiply;6 crossbraces at 10 feet horizontally and four feetvertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 8andmultiply;10 wales at four feet vertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 2andmultiply;6 uprights at five feet horizontally. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Arrangement andplusmin;4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 6andmultiply;6 crossbraces at 12 feet horizontally and four feetvertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 10andmultiply;10 wales at four feet vertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Spaces 3andmultiply;8 uprights at six feet horizontally. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Example 2. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A trench dug in Type B soil in 13 feet deep and five feet wide. FromTable C-1.2 three acceptable arrangements of members are listed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Arrangement andplusmin;1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 6andmultiply;6 crossbraces at six feet horizontally and five feetvertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 8andmultiply;8 wales at five feet vertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 2andmultiply;6 uprights at two feet horizontally. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Arrangement andplusmin;2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 6andmultiply;8 crossbraces at eight feet horizontally and fivefeet vertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 10andmultiply;10 wales at five feet vertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 2andmultiply;6 uprights at two feet horizontally. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Arrangement andplusmin;3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 8andmultiply;8 crossbraces at 10 feet horizontally and five feetvertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 10andmultiply;12 wales at five feet vertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 2andmultiply;6 uprights at two feet vertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) <T3>Example 3. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A trench dug in Type C soil is 13 feet deep and five feet wide. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">From Table C-1.3 two acceptable arrangements of members can be used.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Arrangement andplusmin;1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 8andmultiply;8 crossbraces at six feet horizontally and five feetvertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 10andmultiply;12 wales at five feet vertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Position 2andmultiply;6 uprights as closely together as possible. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If water must be retained use special tongue and groove uprights toform tight sheeting. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Arrangement andplusmin;2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 8andmultiply;10 crossbraces at eight feet horizontally and fivefeet vertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 12andmultiply;12 wales at five feet vertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Position 2andmultiply;6 uprights in a close sheeting configuration unlesswater pressure must be resisted. Tight sheeting must be used where watermust be retained. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) <T3>Example 4. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A trench dug in Type C soil is 20 feet deep and 11 feet wide. Thesize and spacing of members for the section of trench that is over 15 feetin depth is determined using Table C-1.3. Only one arrangement of membersis provided. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 8andmultiply;10 crossbraces at six feet horizontally and fivefeet vertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Space 12andmultiply;12 wales at five feet vertically. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Use 3andmultiply;6 tight sheeting. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Use of Tables C-2.1 through C-2.3 would follow the same procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(g) <T3>Notes for all Tables. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Member sizes at spacings other than indicated are to be determinedas specified in andSection; 1926.652(c), ``Design of Protective Systems.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. When conditions are saturated or submerged use Tight Sheeting.Tight Sheeting refers to the use of specially-edged timber planks (e.g.,tongue and groove) at least three inches thick, steel sheet piling, orsimilar construction that when driven or placed in position provide a tightwall to resist the lateral pressure of water and to prevent the loss ofbackfill material. Close Sheeting refers to the placement of planks side-by-sideallowing as little space as possible between them. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. All spacing indicated is measured center to center. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Wales to be installed with greater dimension horizontal. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. If the vertical distance from the center of the lowest crossbraceto the bottom of the trench exceeds two and one-half feet, uprights shallbe firmly embedded or a mudsill shall be used. Where uprights are embedded,the vertical distance from the center of the lowest crossbrace to the bottomof the trench shall not exceed 36 inches. When mudsills are used, the verticaldistance shall not exceed 42 inches. Mudsills are wales that are installedat the toe of the trench side. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Trench jacks may be used in lieu of or in combination with timbercrossbraces. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Placement cf crossbraces. When the vertical spacing of crossbracesis four feet, place the top crossbrace no more than two feet below thetop of the trench. When the vertical spacing of crossbraces is five feet,place the top crossbrace no more than 2.5 feet below the top of the trench.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-M 006</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert Illus. 0 411-416</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-C </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix D to Subpart P </ITAG>Aluminum Hydraulic Shoring for Trenches <ITAG tagnum="21">(a)<T3> Scope. </T3>This appendix contains information that can be used whenaluminum hydraulic shoring is provided as a method of protection againstcave-ins in trenches that do not exceed 20 feet (6.1m) in depth. This appendixmust be used when design of the aluminum hydraulic protective system cannotbe performed in accordance with andSection; 1926.652(c)(2). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b)<T3> Soil Classification. </T3>In order to use data presented in this appendix,the soi1 type or types in which the excavation is made must first be determinedusing the soil classification method set forth in appendix A of subpartP of part 1926. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c)<T3> Presentation of Information. </T3>Information is presented in severalforms as follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Information is presented in tabular form in Tables D-1.1, D-1.2,D-1.3 and E-1.4. Each table presents the maximum vertical and horizontalspacings that may be used with various aluminum member sizes and varioushydraulic cylinder sizes. Each table contains data only for the particularsoil type in which the excavation or portion of the excavation is made.Tables D-1.1 and D-1.2 are for vertical shores in Types A and B soil. TablesD-1.3 and D1.4 are for horizontal waler systems in Types B and C soil.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Information concerning the basis of the tabular data and the limitationsof the data is presented in paragraph (d) of this appendix. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Information explaining the use of the tabular data is presentedin paragraph (e) of this appendix. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Information illustrating the use of the tabular data is presentedin paragraph (f) of this appendix. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Miscellaneous notations (footnotes) regarding Table D-1.1 throughD-1.4 are presented in paragraph (g) of this appendix. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Figures, illustrating typical installations of hydraulic shoring,are included just prior to the Tables. The illustrations page is entitled``Aluminum Hydraulic Shoring; Typical Installations.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d)<T3> Basis and limitations of the data. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Vertical shore rails and horizontal wales are those that meetthe Section Modulus requirements in the D-1 Tables. Aluminum material is6061-T6 or material of equivalent strength and properties. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Hydraulic cylinders specifications. (i) 2-inch cylinders shallbe a minimum 2-inch inside diameter with a minimum safe working capacityof no less than 18,000 pounds axial compressive load at maximum extension.Maximum extension is to include full range of cylinder extensions as recommendedby product manufaturer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) 3-inch cylinders shall be a minimum 3-inch inside diameter witha safe working capacity of not less than 30,000 pounds axial compressiveload at extensions as recommended by product manufacturer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Limitation of application. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) It is not intended that the aluminum hydraulic specification applyto every situation that may be experienced in the field. These data weredeveloped to apply to the situations that are most commonly experiencedin current trenching practice. Shoring systems for use in situations thatare not covered by the data in this appendix must be otherwise designedas specified in andSection; 1926.652(c). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) When any of the following conditions are present, the membersspecified in the Tables are not considered adequate. In this case, an alternativealuminum hydraulic shoring system or other type of protective system mustbe designed in accordance with andSection; 1926.652. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) When vertical loads imposed on cross braces exceed a 100 Poundgravity load distributed on a one foot section of the center of the hydrauliccylinder.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) When surcharge loads are present from equipment weighing in excessof 20,000 pounds. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) When only the lower portion or a trench is shored and the remainingportion of the trench is sloped or benched unless: The sloped portion issloped at an angle less steep than three horizontal to one vertical; orthe members are selected from the tables for use at a depth which is determinedfrom the top of the overall trench, and not from the toe of the slopedportion. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) <T3>Use of Tables D-1.1, D-1.2, D-1.3 and D-1.4.</T3> The members of theshoring system that are to be selected using this information are the hydrauliccylinders, and either the vertical shores or the horizontal wales. Whena waler system is used the vertical timber sheeting to be used is alsoselected from these tables. The Tables D-1.1 and D-1.2 for vertical shoresare used in Type A and B soils that do not require sheeting. Type B soilsthat may require sheeting, and Type C soils that always require sheetingare found in the horizontal wale Tables D-1.3 and D-1.4. The soil typemust first be determined in accordance with the soil classification systemdescribed in appendix A to subpart P of part 1926. Using the appropriatetable, the selection of the size and spacing of the members is made. Theselection is based on the depth and width of the trench where the membersare to be installed. In these tables the vertical spacing is held constantat four feet on center. The tables show the maximum horizontal spacingof cylinders allowed for each size of wale in the waler system tables,and in the vertical shore tables, the hydraulic cylinder horizontal spacingis the same as the vertical shore spacing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) <T3>Example to Illustrate the Use of the Tables:</T3> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Example 1: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A trench dug in Type A soil is 6 feet deep and 3 feet wide. From TableD-1.1: Find vertical shores and 2 inch diameter cylinders spaced 8 feeton center (o.c.) horizontally and 4 feet on center (o.c.) vertically. (SeeFigures 1 andamp; 3 for typical installations.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Example 2: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A trench is dug in Type B soil that does not require sheeting, 13feet deep and 5 feet wide. From Table D-1.2: Find vertical shores and 2inch diameter cylinders spaced 6.5 feet o.c. horizontally and 4 feet o.c.vertically. (See Figures 1 andamp; 3 for typical installations.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) A trench is dug in Type B soil that does not require sheeting,but does experience some minor raveling of the trench face. The trenchis 16 feet deep and 9 feet wide. From Table D-1.2: Find vertical shoresand 2 inch diameter cylinder (with special oversleeves as designated byfootnote andplusmin;2) spaced 5.5 feet o.c. horizontally and 4 feet o.c.vertically, plywood (per footnote (g)(7) to the D-1 Table) should be usedbehind the shores. (See Figures 2 andamp; 3 for typical installations.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Example 4: A trench is dug in previously disturbed Type B soil,with characteristics of a Type C soil, and will require sheeting. The trenchis 18 feet deep and 12 feet wide. 8 foot horizontal spacing between cylindersis desired for working space. From Table D-1.3: Find horizontal wale witha section modulus of 14.0 spaced at 4 feet o.c. vertically and 3 inch diametercylinder spaced at 9 feet maximum o.c. horizontally. 3andmultiply;12 timbersheeting is required at close spacing vertically. (See Figure 4 for typicalinstallation.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Example 5: A trench is dug in Type C soil, 9 feet deep and 4 feetwide. Horizontal cylinder spacing in excess of 6 feet is desired for workingspace. From Table D-1.4: Find horizontal wale with a section modulus of7.0 and 2 inch diameter cylinders spaced at 6.5 feet o.c. horizontally.Or, find horizontal wale with a 14.0 section modulus and 3 inch diametercylinder spaced at 10 feet o.c. horizontally. Both wales are spaced 4 feeto.c. vertically. 3andmultiply;12 timber sheeting is required at close spacingvertically. (See Figure 4 for typical installation.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(g) <T3>Footnotes, and general notes, for Tables D-1.1, D-1.2, D-1.3, and D-1.4.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) For applications other than those listed in the tables, referto andSection; 1926.652(c)(2) for use of manufacturer's tabulated data. Fortrench depths in excess of 20 feet, refer to andSection; 1926.652(c)(2) andandSection; 1926.652(c)(3). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) 2 inch diameter cylinders, at this width, shall have structuralsteel tube (3.5andmultiply;3.5andmultiply;0.1875) oversleeves, or structuraloversleeves of manufacturer's specification, extending the full, collapsedlength. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Hydraulic cylinders capacities. (i) 2 inch cylinders shall bea minimum 2-inch inside diameter with a safe working capacity of not lessthan 18,000 pounds axial compressive load at maximum extension. Maximumextension is to include full range of cylinder extensions as recommendedby product manufacturer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) 3-inch cylinders shall be a minimum 3-inch inside diameter witha safe work capacity of not less than 30,000 pounds axial compressive loadat maximum extension. Maximum extension is to include full range of cylinderextensions as recommended by product manufacturer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) All spacing indicated is measured center to center. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Vertical shoring rails shall have a minimum section modulus of0.40 inch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) When vertical shores are used, there must be a minimum of threeshores spaced equally, horizontally, in a group. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Plywood shall be 1.125 in. thick softwood or 0.75 inch. thick,14 ply, arctic white birch (Finland form). Please note that plywood isnot intended as a structural member, but only for prevention of local raveling(sloughing of the trench face) between shores. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) See appendix C for timber specifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) Wales are calculated for simple span conditions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) See appendix D, item (d), for basis and limitations of the data.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-M 005</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert Illus. 0 425-429</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-C </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Appendix E to Subpart P_Alternatives to Timber Shoring<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 430</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-M 001</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert Illus. 0 431</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-C </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Appendix F to Subpart P_Selection of Protective Systems</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The following figures are a graphic summary of the requirements containedin subpart P for excavations 20 feet or less in depth. Protective systemsfor use in excavations more than 20 feet in depth must be designed by aregistered professional engineer in accordance with andSection; 1926.652(b) and (c).<G/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illustration(s) 432</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-M 002</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-25217 Filed 10-30-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-C</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>